8]<OU 166251 >m 



OSMANIA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY 

Call No. )70 1$ 3 ty f Ai-ccssion No &0 $ if ) 




This book shoulf ! he retur ru\i ( TI - r jcff i e ihc date last marked below. 



PROBLEMS OF ETHICS 



PRENTICE-HAL4 PHILOSOPHY SERIES 
ARTHUR E. Mu\ftHY, PH. D., EDITOR 

PERCEPTION AND AESTHETIC VALUE, by Harold Newton Lee 

FORMAL LOGIC, by Albert A. Bennett and Charles A. Bayhs 

PROBLEMS OF ETHICS, by Moritz Schlick. Translated by David Rynin 



PROBLEMS OF ETHICS 



BY 

MORITZ SCHLICK 



AUTHORIZED TRANSLATION 
BY 

DAVID RYNIN, PH.D 



NEW YORK: 1939 
PRENTICE-HALL, INC. 



COPYRIGHT, 1939, BJ; 
PRENTICE-HALL, 
70 Fifth Avenue, New York 

ALL RIGHTS RESERVED. NO PART OF THIS BOOK MAY 
BE REPRODUCED IN ANY FORM, BY MIMEOGRAPH OR 
ANY OTHER MEANS, WITHOUT PERMISSION IN WRIT- 
ING FROM THE PUBLISHERS. 



PRINTED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 



Foreword 

THE appearance, in English translation, of Professor 
Moritz Schlick's Fragen dcr JLthi\ is timely and 
welcome.- Professor Schlick was the leader of the 
vigorous and influential "Vienna Circle," a group of 
scientists, logicians, and philosophers who attacked in 
a fresh way the persistent problem as to what the 
nature and the significant function of philosophical 
reflection really is. These thinkers, in general, carry 
on the traditions of empiricism and positivism, which 
they have reformulated in the light of certain views 
arising from a logical analysis of language and sym- 
bols. Accordingly, the position which these writers 
represent sometimes goes by the name of "logical 
positivism." The application of the methods and re- 
sults of this type of analysis to some of the traditional 
problems of ethics supplies the substance of this book. 
It will bring home to the mind of the thoughtful 
reader the pressing question as to the real nature of 
ethical problems indeed of all those problems which 
have to do with the appraisal of human values. These 
problems are crucial for us now, both in theory and in 
practice. To have so unambiguous and clear a state- 



vi FOREWORD 

ment of these problems as they appear within the per- 
spective of modern positivism is very much worth 
while. 

GEORGE P. ADAMS 

The University of California 



Translator's Note 

ALTHOUGH this authorized translation of Moritz 
Schlick's Fragen der Ethi\ was read and ap- 
proved, and in part revised, by the author before his 
untimely and tragic death, I accept full responsibility 
for whatever shortcomings may yet characterize it. I 
wish to thank my friends for their assistance in render- 
ing the more difficult passages into readable English, 

DAVID RYNIN 



Vll 



Contents 

PAGE 

FOREWORD, BY GEORGE P. ADAMS v 

TRANSLATOR'S NOTE vii 



PREFACE 



xin 



CHAPTER 

L WHAT Is THE AIM OF ETHICS? .... i 

1. Ethics Seeks Nothing But Knowledge i 

2. The Subject-matter of Ethics .... 2 

3. On the Definition of Good .... 5 

4. Is the Good Indefinable? 8 

5. The Formal Characteristic of the Good 10 

6. Material Characteristics II 

7. Moral Norms and Moral Principles . 14 
& Ethics as a "Normative Science" . . 17 

9. Ethics as Factual Science 20 

10. Ethics Seeks Causal Explanation . . 22 

11. Formulation of the Fundamental Ques- 

tion 26 

12. The Method of Ethics Is Psychological . 28 

* i 

II. WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES OF HUMAN CON- 
DUCT? 31 

1. Activity and Conduct 31 

2. The Nature of the Act of Will ... 33 

ix 



CONTENTS 

HAPTER PAGE 

II. WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES OF HUMAN CON- 
DUCT? (Continued} 

3. The Concept of Will 35 

4. The Law of Motivation 36 

5. In Proof of the Law of Motivation . . 41 

6. The Law of Motivation in the Case of 

Sacrifice 42 

7. The Law of Motivation in the Case of 

Heroism 45 

8. Rebuttal of False Objections and Ex- 

planations 47 

9. The Law of Motivation Is Not Tauto- 

logous 51 

10. The Law Expresses Significant Knowl- 
edge 53 

III. WHAT Is EGOISM? 56 

1. Egoism Is "Immoral" ..*.... 56 

2. Egoism and "Personal Welfare" ... 57 

3. The Nature of Impulse 59 

4. Is Egoism an Impulse? 62 

5. The Possibility of Imagining "Personal 

States" 65 

6. Egoism Is Not the Will to Pleasure . . 69 

7. Egoism and the Impulse of Self-Preser- 

vation 72 

8. Egoism as Inconsiderateness .... 73 

9. Moral Condemnation of Egoism . . 76 

IV. WHAT Is THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" . . 79 

i. The Morality of Demand and the Mo- 
rality of Desire 79 



CONTENTS xi 

HAPTER PAGE 

IV. WHAT Is THE MEANING OF "MORAL ? " ( Con- 
tinued) 

2. Moral Demands as Expressions of the 

Desires of Society 84 

3. Critique of Utilitarianism 87 

4. The Good Appears to Society as the 

Useful 90 

5. The Formulation of Moral Laws Takes 

Place According to the Utilitarian 

Principle 93 

6. Conclusions 96 

V. ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? . . . . 100 

1. The Theory of Objective Values . . 100 

2. Pleasure as the Criterion of Objective 

Value 102 

3. Objective Criteria of Value? .... 103 

4. Subjective Criteria of Value .... 105 

5. Do Value Judgments Have the Validity 

of Logico-Mathematical Propositions? 107 

6. The "Absolute Ought" no 

7. The Emptiness of the Hypothesis of 

Absolute Values 115 

VI. ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS AND VALU- 
ABLE SORROWS? 120 

1. The Relativity of Values 120 

2. The Prejudice Against Pleasure . . 122 

3. Happiness and Sorrow as Mixed States 127 

4. Associative Pleasure in Sorrow . . . 132 

5. Is Sorrow a Necessary Condition of 

Pleasure? 134 

6. The Bliss of Suffering 136 



xii CONTENTS 

CHAPTER PAGE 

VII. WHEN Is A MAN RESPONSIBLE? ... 143 

1. The Pseudo-Problem of Freedom of the 

Will 143 

2. Two Meanings of the Word "Law" . 146 

3. Compulsion and Necessity .... 148 

4. Freedom and Indeterminism .... 149 

5. The Nature of Responsibility .... 151 

6. The Consciousness of Responsibility . 154 

7. Causality as the Presupposition of Re- 

sponsibility 156 

VIIL WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? .... 159 

1. What Are the "Natural" Impulses? . 162 

2. New Formulation of the Question . . 165 

3. Moral Suggestion 169 

4. Motive Feelings and Realization Feelings 173 

5. The Assimilation of Motive Feelings to^ 

Realization Feelings 177 

6. The Foundation of Hedonism . . . 179 

7. Happiness and the Capacity for Hap- 

piness 182 

8. The Happiness Value of Social Impulses 185 

9. Virtue and Happiness 191 

10. The Moral Principle: Be Ready for Hap- 

piness 195 

11. Morality Without Renunciation . . . 199 

12. Personality and Kindness 202 

13. Ethics of Duty and Ethics of Kindness 205 

INDEX 211 



Preface 1 

ETHICS is generally considered to be a part of philos- 
ophy. But according to the view here represented, 
philosophy is not a science, that is, it is not a system 
of propositions. Its task consists in making clear the 
content of scientific propositions, that is, in determin- 
ing or discovering their meaning. The final determi- 
nation of the meaning of propositions cannot itself 
be made by means of assertions, cannot thus itself 
form a science, because in that case we would have to 
ask ever anew for the meaning of the explanatory 
proposition, and would thus arrive at an infinite re- 
gress. Every statement of a meaning (called "defini- 
tion") must, generally through a series of sub-defini- 
tions, finally lead to a direct exhibition of what is 
meant. This exhibition can only be the result of an 
actual operation, a physical or psychic act. Thus the 
determination of the ultimate meaning is always the 
result of an activity. This activity constitutes the es- 
sence of philosophy; there are no philosophical propo- 
sitions, but only philosophical acts. 



1 [The irrelevant first paragraph of the original is 
omitted.] 



xiv PREFACE 

How, then, is a philosophical book possible at all, 
since one cannot put activities into the pages of a book? 
What can a treatise on ethics contain? For if ethics 
really were philosophy it could consist only of those 
acts by means of which the meaning of moral judg- 
ments would be discovered and explained. 

Concerning this, two things are to be said. 

First, in so far as this treatise is "philosophical" (and 
it would like actually to make such a claim), its 
sentences function not as actual propositions which 
communicate definite facts or laws, but as stimuli for 
the reader to carry out those acts by virtue of which 
certain propositions obtain a clear meaning. (That 
such stimuli can be much more important than any 
correct judgments can be disputed by no one who be- 
lieves in the power of philosophy.) Those proposi- 
tions are such as occur in daily life (for example, 
"This man is well-intentioned"; "That man was com- 
pletely responsible for his act."); they will not be 
formulated in this treatise, but constitute the subject- 
matter for consideration. 

In the second place, however, the book would like 
to claim for certain of its sentences that they are real 
propositions. Thus I believe that in the following 
pages I communicate some truths in my opinion not 
unimportant ones. If this is not an illusion, the book 
may also be called scientific, for, according to what 
was said previously, true judgments may be systema- 
tized; they constitute a part of science. Since those 



PREFACE xv 

propositions concern the behavior of men, the scien- 
tific field to which they belong is psychology. 

I hope, then, to have contributed, first, to philo- 
sophical activity and, secondly, to psychological 
knowledge by the answers which the book gives to 
fundamental ethical problems, and by the observations 
leading to these answers. This contribution points 
to a very different orientation from that which now 
prevails in the literature of German moral philosophy 
and seems to me for this reason all the more im- 
portant. 

MORITZ SCHLICK 

Vienna, September 1930. 



CHAPTER I 

What Is the Aim of Ethics? 
z. Ethics Seel(s Nothing But Knowledge 

If there are ethical questions which have meaning, 
and are therefore capable of being answered, then 
ethics is a science. For the correct answers to its ques- 
tions will constitute a system of true propositions, and 
a system of true propositions concerning an object is 
the "science" of that object. Thus ethics is a system of 
knowledge, and nothing else; its only goal is the truth* 
Every science is, as such, purely theoretical; it seeks 
to understand; hence the questions of ethics, too, are 
purely theoretical problems. As philosophers we try 
to find their correct solutions, but their practical ap- 
plication, if such is possible, does not fall within the 
sphere of ethics. If anyone studies these questions in 
order to apply the results to life and action, his dealing 
with ethics has, it is true, a practical end; but ethics 
itself never has any other goal than the truth. 

So long as the philosopher is concerned with his 
purely theoretical questions, he must forget that he has 
a human interest as well as a cognitive interest in the 
object of his investigation. For him there is no greater 



2 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

danger than to change from a philosopher into a moral- 
ist, from an investigator into a preacher. Desire for 
the truth is the only appropriate inspiration for the 
thinker when he philosophizes; otherwise his thoughts 
run the danger of being led astray by his feelings. 
His wishes, hopes, and fears threaten to encroach upon 
that objectivity which is the necessary presupposition 
of all honest inquiry. Of course, the prophet and the 
investigator can be one and the same person; but one 
cannot at the same moment serve both interests, for 
whoever mixes the two problems will solve neither. 

A glance at the great ethical systems will show how 
necessary these remarks are. There is hardly one in 
which we do not occasionally find an appeal to the 
feeling or the morality of the reader where a scientific 
analysis would have been appropriate. 

Nevertheless, I do not point out the purely theoreti- 
cal character of ethics merely to warn my reader, and 
myself. I do it also because it will help us to define 
the problems with which ethics is concerned and which 
we shall try to solve. 

2. The Subject-matter of Ethics 

To what object, or realm of objects, do the questions 
of ethics relate ? This object has many names, and we 
use them so often in daily life that one might think we 
should know exactly what we mean by them. The 
ethical questions concern "morality/* or what is mor- 
ally "valuable," what serves as a "standard" or "norm" 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 3 

of human conduct, what is "demanded" of us; or, 
finally, to name it by the oldest, simplest word, ethical 
questions concern the "good." 

And what does ethics do with this object ? We have 
already answered this question: ethics seeks to under- 
stand it, to gain knowledge of it, and would and can 
under no circumstances do anything else with it. Since 
ethics is, in essence, theory or knowledge, its task can- 
not be to produce morality, or to establish it, or call it 
to life. It does not have the task of producing the 
good neither in the sense that its business is to invest 
the good with reality in human affairs, nor in the sense 
that it has to stipulate or decree what the word "good" 
ought to signify. It creates neither the concept nor 
the objects which fall under the concept, nor does it 
provide the opportunity of applying the concept to the 
objects. All this it finds, as every science finds the 
materials it works with, in experience. It is obvious 
that no science can have any other beginning. The 
misleading view (introduced by the "Neo-Kantians") 
according to which objects of a science are not simply 
"given" to it but are themselves always "given as prob- 
lems" will not lead anyone to deny that whoever wishes 
to understand anything must first know what it is he 
wishes to understand. 

Where and how, then, is "the good" of ethics given? 

We must from the outset be clear on the point that 
here 'there is only one possibility, the same that lies be- 
fore all other sciences. Wherever an instance of the 
object to be known occurs, there must be exhibited a 



4 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

certain mark (or group of marks) which characterizes 
the thing or event as one of a certain definite kind, thus 
distinguishing it from all others in a special way. If 
this were not so we would have no opportunity and 
no motive to call it by a special name. Every name 
which is used in discourse for communication must 
have a meaning capable of being indicated. This 
is indeed self-evident, and it would not be doubted of 
the object of any other science only in ethics has it 
sometimes been forgotten. 

Let us consider some examples outside the field of 
ethics. Biology, the science of life, finds its sphere 
limited by a group of characteristics (a special kind of 
motion, regeneration, growth, and so forth) which be- 
long to all living things, and stand out so clearly for 
every-day observation that apart from certain critical 
instances the difference between the animate and in- 
animate is very sharply distinguished, without the use 
of any scientific analysis. It is only because of this that 
the concept of life could have first been formed, and 
obtained its special name. If the biologist succeeds, 
with progressive knowledge, in establishing new and 
sharper definitions of life, in order better to bring the 
events of life under general laws, this means only more 
precision in, and perhaps extension of, the concept, 
without however altering its original meaning. 

Similarly the word "light" had a definite meaning 
before there was a science of light, that is, optics, and 
this meaning determined the subject-matter of optics. 
The distinguishing mark was in this case that immedi- 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 5 

ate experience which we call "light-sensation," that is, 
a not-further-definable datum of consciousness, known 
only to the perceiver, the occurrence of which again 
apart from critical instances indicates the presence of 
those events which constitute the subject-matter of op- 
tics. The fact that optics in its modern developed 
form is the science of Roentgen rays and radio-tele- 
graphic waves as well (because their laws are identical 
with the laws of light) enlarges the meaning of the 
word "optics" without changing its basis. 

As certainly, then, as the expression "moral good" 
makes good sense, just as certainly rhust we be able to 
discover it in a way analogous to that by which one 
discovers the meaning of the word "life" or "light." 
But many philosophers see in this a serious difficulty of 
ethics, indeed the difficulty, and they are of the opinion 
that the sole task of ethics is the discovery of the defi- 
nition of "good." 

3. On the Definition of Good 

This view can be interpreted in two ways. In the 
first place, it could mean that the task of the philoso- 
pher is exhausted in describing exactly the sense in 
which the word "good" or ban or gut or buono 
or dya$6v in its moral signification is actually used. 
It would concern itself merely with making clear the 
already well-known meaning, by a strict formulation 
of it in other words (were it not already well known 
one would not know that, for example, "good" is the 



6 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

translation of bonum). Is this really the goal of 
ethics? The statement of the meaning of words by 
definitions is (as G. E. Moore in his Principia Ethica 
has pointed out in a similar connection) the business 
of the science of language. Ought we really to believe 
that ethics is a branch of linguistics? Perhaps a 
branch that has split off from it because the definition 
of "good" harbors special difficulties we meet in no 
other word? A very peculiar case, that a whole sci- 
ence should be necessary to find merely the definition 
of a concept! And in any case, who is interested in 
mere definitions ? They are, after all, only means to 
an end; they stand at the beginning of the real cog- 
nitive task. If ethics ended with a definition it would 
be at most the introduction to a science, and the phi- 
losopher would interest himself only in what comes 
after it. No, the real problems of ethics are certainly 
of a very different sort. Even though the task of 
ethics could be formulated as that of stating what the 
good "really is," this could not be understood as con- 
sisting in the mere determination of the meaning of a 
concept (as also, in our example, optics does not strive 
for a mere definition of "light"). Rather it would 
have to be understood as the task of explanation, of 
complete cognition of the good which presupposes 
that the meaning of the concept is already known and 
then relates it to something else, orders it in more gen- 
eral connections (just as optics does with light, which 
tells us what light "really is" by pointing out the place 
in the sphere of natural events to which the well- 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 7 

known phenomenon belongs, by describing to the last 
detail its laws, and by recognizing their identity with 
the laws of certain electrical events). 

Secondly, the view according to which the goal of 
ethics consists of a correct determination of the concept 
"good" could be interpreted as not being concerned 
with the formulation of the content of the concept, 
but rather with giving it a content. This would, 
however, be exactly that view which we have from the 
start recognized to be quite senseless. It would mean 
that the philosopher made, or created, the concept of 
the good, while without him there existed merely the 
word "good." He would of course have to invent it 
quite arbitrarily. (But inasmuch as in formulating his 
definition he could not act completely arbitrarily, since 
he would be bound by some norm, some guiding prin- 
ciple, the concept of the good would already be deter- 
mined by these norms. The philosopher would have 
merely to find a formulation of it, and we should have 
before us the previously considered case.) However, it 
would be quite absurd to demand of ethics nothing but 
the arbitrary establishment of the meaning of a word. 
That would be no achievement at all. Even the 
prophet, the creator of a new morality, never forms a 
new concept of morality, but presupposes one, and as- 
serts only that other modes of behavior are subsumed 
under it than those which people have believed up to 
that time. In logical terms, the prophet holds that the 
acknowledged content of the concept has a different 
range from that supposed. This alone can be the 



8 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

meaning when he declares: "Not that is 'good* which 
you have held as such, but something else!" 

Thus we see the view confirmed that in no way is 
the formulation of the concept of the moral good to be 
considered as the final task of ethics; it cannot be re- 
garded as anything but a mere preparation. 

To be sure, this preparation is not to be neglected; 
ethics ought not to spare itself the task of determining 
the meaning of its concept, even though, as we have 
said, the meaning of the word "good" may in one sense 
be assumed as known. 

4. & the Good Indefinable? 

It is very dangerous to withdraw from this task 
under the pretext that the word "good" is one of those 
whose meaning is simple and unanalyzatye, of which 
therefore a definition, a statement of the connotation, is 
impossible. What is demanded here need -not be a 
definition in the strictest sense of the word. It is suffi- 
cient to indicate how we can get the content of the 
concept; to state what must be done in order to become 
acquainted with its content. It is, strictly speaking, 
also impossible to define what the word "green" means 
but we can nevertheless fix its meaning unambigu- 
ously, for example, by saying it is the color of a sum- 
mer meadow, or by pointing to the foliage of a tree. 
We mentioned above that a "light-sensation" which 
furnishes us with the fundamental concept of optics is 
not definable; however, we know exactly what is meant 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 9 

by it, because we can give the exact conditions under 
which we have a light-sensation. In the same way, in 
ethics we must be able to give the exact conditions 
under which the word "good" is applied, even though 
its fundamental concept be indefinable. In this man- 
ner it must be possible to give the meaning of any 
word, for otherwise it would have no meaning at all. 
It must even be capable of being given easily; profound 
philosophical analysis cannot be necessary for this, for 
the matter concerns merely a question of fact, namely, 
a description of those conditions under which the word 
"good" (or its equivalent in other languages, or its con- 
trary, "evil") is actually used. 

It is difficult for many philosophers to stick to the 
realm of facts even temporarily, without immediately 
inventing a theory to describe the facts. And thus the 
theory has been frequently propounded that the funda- 
mental concept of ethics is given as is the fundamental 
concept of optics. Just as we possess a special sense, 
namely the sense of sight, for the perception of light, so 
it is supposed that a special "moral sense" indicates the 
presence of good or evil. Accordingly, good and evil 
would be objective characters, to be determined and 
investigated as are the physical events which optics in- 
vestigates, and which it considers to be the causes of 
light-sensations. 

This theory is of course wholly hypothetical. The 
moral sense is merely assumed; its organs cannot be 
pointed out as can the human eye. But the hypothesis 
is also false; it fails to account for the variations in 



io WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

moral judgment among men, since the further assump- 
tion that the moral sense is poorly developed in many 
persons, or completely absent, does not suffice to explain 
these variations. 

No, it is not the distinguishing characteristic of the 
subject-matter of ethics that it is the object of a special 
kind of perception. Its characteristics must be capable 
of exhibition by simply pointing to certain known 
facts, without any artifice. This can happen in differ- 
ent ways. Two ways are here distinguished: first, one 
can seek for an external, formal characteristic of good 
and evil; and, second, one can search for a material 
characteristic, one of content. 

5. The Formal Characteristic of the Good 

The formal characteristic, on which Kant placed the 
whole weight of his moral philosophy, and which he 
made prominent by his greatest eloquence, is this: the 
good always appears as something that is demanded, or 
commanded; the evil, as something forbidden. Good 
conduct is such as is demanded or desired of us. Or, 
as it has generally been expressed since Kant: those 
actions are good which we ought to do. Now, to 
a demand, a claim, or a desire there belongs someone 
who demands, claims, or desires. This author of the 
moral law must also be given in order that the character- 
ization by means of the formal property of the com- 
mand be unambiguous. 

Here opinions differ. In theological ethics this au- 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? it 

thor is God, and according to one interpretation the 
good is good because God desires it; in this case the 
formal characteristic (to be a command of God) would 
express the very essence of the good. According to an- 
other, perhaps profounder, interpretation, God desires 
the good because it is good. In this case its essence 
must be given by certain material characters previously 
to and independently of those formal determinations. 
In traditional philosophical ethics the opinion prevails 
that the author is, for example, human society (utili- 
tarianism) or the active self (eudaimonism) or even no 
one (the categorical imperative). From this last pro- 
ceeds Kant's doctrine of the "absolute ought," that is, 
a demand without a demander. One of the worst 
errors of ethical thought lies in his belief that the con- 
cept of the moral good is completely exhausted by the 
statement of its purely formal property, that it has no 
content except to be what is demanded, "what should 
be." 

6. Material Characteristics 

In opposition to this, it is clear that the discovery of 
the formal characters of the good constitutes only a 
preliminary step in the determination of the content 
of the good, in the statement of material characteristics. 
If we know that the good is what is demanded, we 
must still ask: What is it then that is actually de- 
manded? In answer to this question we must turn to 
the author of the command and investigate his will 



12 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

and desire, for the content of his desire is that which 
he wishes to happen. When I recommend an action to 
someone as being "good," I express the fact that I 
desire it. 

So long as the lawgiver is not known with certainty, 
we must stick to the laws as they are generally ob- 
served, to the formulations of moral rules as we find 
them among men. We must discover which ways of 
acting (or dispositions, or whatever be the term used) 
are called "good" by different people, at different 
times, by different wise men or religious writers. Only 
in this way do we come to know the content of this 
concept. From the content it may then be possible to 
infer the lawgiving authority, if it cannot be ascer- 
tained otherwise. 

In grouping together the individual cases in which 
something is designated as morally good* we must 
search for the common elements, the characters in 
which these examples agree or show similarities. 
These similar elements are the characters of the con- 
cept "good"; they constitute its content, and within 
them must lie the reason why one and the same word, 
"good," is used for the several cases. 

To be sure, one will at once come upon cases in 
which nothing common can be found, in which there 
seems to be a complete incompatibility; one and the 
same thing for example, polygamy will be consid- 
ered moral in one community, and in another a crime. 
In such a situation there are two possibilities. First, 
there could be several irreducibly different concepts of 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 13 

"good" (which agree in the purely formal property 
of being somehow "demanded") ; if this were so there 
would not be a single morality, but many. Or, sec- 
ond, it could be that the divergence in moral judgments 
was only apparent and not final; that, namely, in the 
end one and the same goal was approved, but that a 
difference of opinion prevailed as to which way leads 
to it, which actions should therefore be demanded. 
(For instance, polygamy and monogamy are not in 
themselves judged morally. The real object of valu- 
ation is perhaps the peace of family life, or the least 
troublesome order of sexual relationships. One per- 
son believes that this end can be attained only through 
monogamous marriage, and considers it, therefore, to 
be morally good; another believes the same of polyg- 
amy. One may be right, the other wrong; they dif- 
fer, not by their final valuations, but only by virtue of 
their insight, capacity of judgment, or experience.) 

Whether there is actually among men a multiplic- 
ity of moralities incompatible with one another, or 
whether the differences in the moral world are only 
specious, so that the philosopher would find every- 
where, under the many disguises and masks of moral- 
ity, one and the same face of the one Good, we can- 
not now decide. In any case, there are wide regions 
in which the unanimity and security of moral judg- 
ments is substantiated. The modes of behavior which 
we group together under the names reliability, help- 
fulness, sociability are everywhere judged to be "good," 
while, for example, thievery, murder, quarrelsomeness 



14 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

pass for "evil" so unanimously that here the question 
of the common property can be answered with prac- 
tically universal validity. If such characters are found 
for a large group of actions, then one can apply him- 
self to the "exceptions" and irregularities, that is, to 
those cases in which the same behavior evokes diver- 
gent moral judgments in different times, among dif- 
ferent peoples. Here one finds either that there is no 
different ground for the judgment from that in all 
ordinary cases, but that it is merely more remote, hid- 
den, or applied under altered circumstances; or one 
must simply note the fact as indicating a new or am- 
biguous meaning of the word "good." And finally, 
it happens, of course, that certain individuals hold dif- 
ferent opinions regarding good and evil from those 
held by people of their time and community. In these 
cases it is quite as important to make out*the content 
and causes of their opinions as in any other more reg- 
ular cases, if the persons in question are important as 
prophets, moral writers, or morally creative men; or if 
their teachings disclose hidden currents or impress 
their moral judgments on humanity and the future. 

7. Moral Norms and Moral Principles 

The common characteristics which a group of "good" 
acts or dispositions exhibits can be combined in a rule 
of the form: A mode of action must have such and 
such properties in order to be called "good" (or "evil"). 
Such a rule can also be called a "norm." Let it be 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 15 

understood at once, however, that such a "norm" is 
nothing but a mere expression of fact; it gives us only 
the conditions under which an act or disposition or 
character is actually called "good," that is, is given a 
moral value. The setting up of norms is nothing but 
the determination of the concept of the good, which 
ethics undertakes to understand. 

This determination would proceed by seeking ever 
new groups of acts that are recognized to be good, and 
showing for each of them the rule or norm which all 
of their members satisfy. The different norms, so ob- 
tained, would then be compared, and one would order 
them into new classes such that the individual norms 
of each class had something in common, and thus 
would all be subsumed under a higher, that is, a more 
general, norm. With this higher norm the same pro- 
cedure would be repeated, and so on, until, in a perfect 
case, one would at last reach a highest, most general 
rule that included all others as special cases, and would 
be applicable to every instance of human conduct. 
This highest norm would be the definition of "the 
good" and would express its universal essence; it would 
be what the philosopher calls a "moral principle." 

Of course, one cannot know beforehand whether one 
will actually arrive at a single moral principle. It 
might well be that the highest series of rules to which 
the described way leads simply shows no common 
characte'r, that one has, therefore, to stop with several 
norms as highest rules, because despite all attempts 
none higher can be found to which these could be re- 



16 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

duced. There would then be several mutually inde- 
pendent meanings of the expression "moral good/' sev- 
eral mutually independent moral principles which only 
in their totality would determine the concept of moral- 
ity, or perhaps several different concepts of the moral, 
depending upon the time and the people. It is signifi- 
cant how little these possibilities have, in general, been 
considered by philosophers; almost all have at once 
sought a single moral principle. Quite the contrary is 
true of the practical moral systems, which ordinarily do 
not attempt to establish an all-inclusive principle; as in 
the case of the catechism, which stops at the ten com- 
mandments. 

For those who believe that the sole task of ethics 
consists in the determination of the concept of the 
good, that is, in the establishment of one or several 
moral principles, the completion of the described pro- 
cedure would exhaust the theme of ethics. It would 
be a pure "normative science"; for its end would lie in 
the discovery of a hierarchy of norms or rules which 
culminated in one or several points, the moral prin- 
ciples, and in which the lower levels would be ex- 
plained or "justified" by the higher. To the question, 
"Why is this act moral?" the explanation can be given, 
"Because it falls under these definite rules"; and if one 
asks further, "Why are all the acts falling under this 
rule moral?" this would be explained by saying, "Be- 
cause they all fall under that next higher rule." And 
only with the highest norm with the moral principle 
or moral principles is the knowledge of the validating 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 17 

grounds, a justification, no longer possible in this way. 
There ethics is at an end for him who sees it as a mere 
normative science. 

8. Ethics as a "Normative Science" 

We now see clearly what meaning the phrase "nor- 
mative science" can have, and in what sense alone 
ethics can "justify" an act or its valuation. In modern 
philosophy since Kant, the idea repeatedly appears that 
ethics as a normative science is something completely 
different from the "factual sciences." It does not ask, 
"When is a person judged to be good?" or, "Why is 
he judged to be good ?" These questions concern mere 
facts and their explanation. But it does ask, "With 
what right is that person judged to be good?" It does 
not trouble itself with what is actually valued, but asks: 
"What is valuable? What should be valued?" And 
here obviously the question is quite different. 

But this manner of opposing normative and factual 
sciences is fundamentally false. For if ethics furnishes 
a justification it does so only in the sense just explained, 
namely, in a relative-hypothetical way, not absolutely. 
It "justifies" a certain judgment only to the extent that 
it shows that the judgment corresponds to a certain 
norm; that this norm itself is "right," or justified, it 
can neither show nor, by itself, determine. Ethics 
must simply recognize this as a fact of human nature. 
Even as a normative science, a science can do no more 
than explain; it can never set up or establish a norm 



i8 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

(which alone would be equivalent to an absolute jus- 
tification). It is never able to do more than to dis- 
cover the rules of the judgment, to read them from the 
facts before it; the origin of norms always lies outside 
and before science and knowledge. This means that 
their origin can only be apprehended by the science, 
and does not lie within it. In other words: if, or in so 
far as, the philosopher answers the question "What is 
good?" by an exhibition of norms, this means only that 
he tells us what "good" actually means; he can never 
tell us what good must or should mean. The question 
regarding the validity of a valuation amounts to asking 
for a higher acknowledged norm under which the 
value falls, and this is a question of fact. The ques- 
tion of the justification of the highest norms or the 
ultimate values is senseless, because there is nothing 
higher to which these could be referred. Since mod- 
ern ethics, as we remarked, often speaks of *this abso- 
lute justification as the fundamental problem of ethics, 
it must be said, unfortunately, that the formulation of 
the question from which it proceeds is simply mean- 
ingless. 

The perversity of such a formulation of the question 
will be exhibited by a famous example. John Stuart 
Mill has often been justly criticized because he thought 
himself able to deduce from the fact that a thing was 
desired that it was in itself desirable. The double 
meaning of the word desirable ("capable of being de- 
sired" and "worth desiring") misled him. But his 
critics were also wrong, for they rested their criticism 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 19 

upon the same false presupposition (expressly formu- 
lated by neither), namely, that the phrase "in itself 
desirable" had a definite meaning (by "in itself" I mean 
"for its own sake," not merely as a means to an end) ; 
but in fact they could give it no meaning. If I say of 
a thing that it is desirable, and mean that one must 
desire it as a means if one desires a certain end, then 
everything is perfectly clear. If, however, I assert that 
a thing is desirable simply in itself, I cannot say what I 
mean by this statement; it is not verifiable and is there- 
fore meaningless. A thing can be desirable only with 
respect to something else, not in itself. Mill believed 
himself able to deduce what is in itself desirable from 
what actually is desired; his opponents held that these 
had nothing to do with one another. But ultimately 
neither side knew what it said, for both failed to give 
an absolute meaning to the word "desirable." The 
question whether something is desirable for its own 
sake is no question at all, but mere empty words. On 
the other hand, the question of what actually is desired 
for its own sake is of course quite sensible, and ethics 
is actually concerned only with answering this ques- 
tion. Mill succeeded in arriving at this real question, 
in the passage criticized, and thus freed himself of the 
senseless form of the question, to be sure, less by his 
false argument than by his healthy instinct, while his 
opponents remained tied to it and continued to search 
for an absolute justification of desire. 



20 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

9. Ethics as Factual Science 

Such norms as are recognized as the ultimate norms, 
or highest values, must be derived from human nature 
and life as facts. Therefore, no result of ethics can 
stand in contradiction to life; ethics cannot declare as 
evil or false those values which lie at the foundation 
of life; its norms cannot demand or command anything 
that is in a real opposition to those final norms recog- 
nized by life. Where such opposition occurs it is a 
sure sign that the philosopher has misunderstood his 
problem, and has failed to solve it; that he has un- 
wittingly become a moralist, that he feels uncomfort- 
able in the role of a knower and would prefer to be a 
creator of moral values. The demands and claims of 
a morally creative person are merely subjects for in- 
vestigation for the philosopher, mere objects for cogni- 
tive consideration; and this holds also if he should by 
chance, at other times, be this creative man himself. 

We just said that there could be no real opposition 
between the meaning of the word "good" that is 
actually accepted in life, and the meaning found by 
the philosopher. An apparent difference can of course 
occur, for language and thought are very imperfect in 
daily life. Often the speaker and valuer is himself not 
clear as to what he expresses, and often his valuations 
rest on a false interpretation of the facts, and would at 
once change with a correction of the mistake. The 
philosopher would have the task of discovering such 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 21 

errors and faulty expressions, and would have to rec- 
ognize the true norms that lie at the root of moral 
judgments, and place them in opposition to the appar- 
ent ones which the agent, or valuer, believes himself 
to follow. And in so doing he would, perhaps, find it 
necessary to delve deep into the human soul. Always, 
however, it would be an actual, already fundamental 
norm that he would find there. 

The ultimate valuations are facts existing in human 
consciousness, and even if ethics were a normative 
science it would not cease because of this to be a science 
of facts. Ethics has to do entirely with the actual; 
this seems to me to be the most important of the propo- 
sitions which determine its task. Foreign to us is the 
pride of those philosophers who hold the questions of 
ethics to be the most noble and elevated of questions 
just because they do not refer to the common is but 
concern the pure ought. 

Of course, after one is in the possession of such a 
system of norms, of a system of applications of the 
concepts good and evil, one can consider the connec- 
tions of the members of the hierarchy, the order of the 
individual rules, quite independently of any relation to 
actuality; one can investigate merely the inner struc- 
ture of the system. And this holds even if the norms 
are not the really valid ones, but are falsely considered 
such, or are freely imagined and arbitrarily established. 
The last case would indeed possess only the interest 
of a game and would make no claim to the name of 
"ethics." Ethics as a normative science would, how- 



22 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

ever, furnish a hierarchical order of rules, in which all 
acts and attitudes and characters would possess a defi- 
nite place with respect to their moral value. And of 
course this would be true not only of existing acts and 
attitudes, but also of all possible ones; for if the system 
is to be of any value it must beforehand supply a place 
for every possibility of human behavior. After becom- 
ing acquainted with the highest norms, one can con- 
sider the whole system without any reference to actual 
behavior, by merely considering the possible. Thus 
Kant emphasized that for his moral philosophy it was 
indifferent whether or not any moral will actually 
existed. Hence ethics conceived as a theory of norms 
would exhibit the characteristics of an "ideal science"; 
it would have to do with a system of ideal rules, which 
could, of course, be applied to actuality, and would 
only thereby possess any interest, but the rules would 
have meaning quite independently of this*application, 
and could be investigated in their relations to one an- 
other. Thus someone might have invented the rules 
of chess, and might have considered their application 
to the individual matches even if the game had never 
been played, except in his mind, between imaginary 
opponents. 

10. Ethics Seefa Causal Explanation 

To recapitulate: We began with the position that the 
task of ethics is to "explain the moral good," and we 
asked, first, what sort of thing this "good" is which we 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 23 

want to explain. We found that this subject-matter of 
ethics is not given to us as simply as, say, the subject- 
matter of optics, light, that is, by a mere sensation; but 
that for its determination the discovery of a "moral 
principle" or a whole system of principles or rules is 
necessary. If we call a discipline that concerns itself 
with such a system a "normative science," we see that 
this theory of norms affords nothing more than the 
discovery of the meaning of the concept "good." In 
this it exhausts itself. There is no question in it of a 
real explanation of the good. It offers ethics only the 
object which is to be explained. Therefore we have 
from the outset rejected the view of those philosophers 
who consider ethics to be merely a normative science. 
No, only where the theory of norms ends does ethical 
explanation begin. The former fails completely to see 
the important, exciting questions of ethics, or, worse, 
turns them aside as foreign in essence to ethics; in 
truth it fails, except through mistakes, to get beyond 
the mere linguistic result of determining the meanings 
of the words "good" and "evil." 

It does of course also give us a kind of pseudo- 
explanation, namely, that which we call justification. 
Explanation always consists of the reduction of what is 
to be explained to something else, to something more 
general; and actually the norms are thus referred back 
to one another, until the highest are reached. These, 
the moral principles (or the moral principle), accord- 
ing to definition, cannot be referred to other ethical 
norms, and cannot therefore be morally justified. 



24 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

But this does not mean that all further reduction 
must be impossible. It might be that the moral good 
could be shown to be a special case of a more general 
kind of good. Actually the word "good" is used in an 
extra-moral sense (one speaks not only of good men, 
but also of good riders, good mathematicians, of a good 
catch, a good machine, and so forth); it is therefore 
probable that the ethical and the extra-ethical meanings 
of the word are somehow connected. If the moral 
good can in this manner be subsumed under a wider 
concept of the good, then the question, "Why is moral 
behavior good?" could be answered by, "Because it is 
good in a more general sense of the word." The high- 
est moral norm would be justified by means of an extra- 
moral norm; the moral principle would be referred back 
to a higher principle of life. 

Possibly the reduction could go on a few more steps, 
but the final norm, the highest principle, can In no way 
be justified, for the very reason that it is the last. It 
would be senseless to ask for a further justification, a 
further explanation. It is not the norms, principles, or 
values themselves that stand in need of and are capable 
of explanation, but rather the actual facts from which 
they are abstracted. These facts are the acts of giving 
rules, of valuation, of approbation in human conscious- 
ness; they are thus real events in the life of the souL 
"Value," "the good," are mere abstractions, but valua- 
tion, approbation, are actual psychic occurrences, and 
separate acts of this sort are quite capable of explanation, 
that is, can be reduced to one another, 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 25 

And here lies the proper task of ethics. Here are 
the remarkable facts which excite philosophic wonder, 
and whose explanation has always been the final goal 
of ethical inquiry. That man actually approves of 
certain actions, declares certain dispositions to be 
"good," appears not at all self-explanatory to the philos- 
opher, but often very astonishing, and he therefore asks 
his "Why?" Now, in all of the natural sciences every 
explanation can be conceived as a causal explanation, 
a truth which we need not prove here; therefore the 
"why" has the sense of a question concerning the 
cause of that psychical process in which man makes a 
valuation, establishes a moral claim. (We must make 
clear that when we speak of the discovery of the 
"cause," we mean by the term "cause" only a popular 
abbreviation for the statement of the complete laws 
governing the event to be known.) 

In other words, the determination of the contents of 
the concepts of good and evil is made by the use of 
moral principles and a system of norms, and affords a 
relative justification of the lower moral rules by the 
higher; scientific \nowledge of the good, on the other 
hand, does not concern norms, but refers to the cause, 
concerns not the justification but the explanation of 
moral judgments. The theory of norms asks, ''What 
does actually serve as the standard of conduct?" Ex- 
planatory ethics, however, asks "Why does it serve as 
the standard of conduct?" 



26 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

ii. Formulation of the Fundamental Question 

It is clear that in essence the first question is a dry, 
formal matter that could win little interest from man 
did it not have such importance for practice, and if the 
path to its answer did not offer so many opportunities 
for profound insight into human nature. The second 
question, however, leads directly to these profundities. 
It concerns the real grounds, the actual causes and 
motives that drive one to distinguish between good 
and evil, and call forth the acts of moral judgment. 
Not only judgments, but also conduct, for this follows 
upon judgment. The explanation of moral judgment 
cannot be separated from the explanation of conduct. 
To be sure, one should not believe, without further 
reason, that everyone arranges his conduct according 
to his moral judgments. Obviously, that would be a 
false assumption. The connection, although indissol- 
uble, is more complicated. What a man values, ap- 
proves, and desires is finally inferred from his actions 
better from these than from his assertions, though 
these, too, are kinds of action. What kind of demands 
one makes of himself and others can only be known 
from one's conduct. A man's valuations must some- 
how appear among the motives of his acts; they cannot, 
in any case, be discovered anywhere else. He who 
traces the causes of conduct far enough must come 
upon the causes of all approbation. The question of 
the causes of conduct is, therefore, more general than 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 27 

that of the grounds of moral judgments; its answer 
would give more comprehensive knowledge, and it 
would be methodologically profitable to start with it 
even if it were not necessary to begin with the study 
of conduct as the only thing observable. 

Therefore, we may and should replace the question 
raised above, "What motives cause us to establish moral 
norms?" by the other question, "What are the motives 
of conduct in general?" (We formulate the question 
in this general way and do not at once restrict it to 
moral actions because, according to what has been said, 
it might be possible to deduce valuations and their 
motives just as well, if not better, from immoral or 
neutral acts.) We are the more warranted in relating 
our question at once to conduct, since man interests 
himself in valuations only because conduct depends 
upon them. If moral approbation were something that 
remained enclosed in the depths of the heart, if it could 
never appear in any way and could not exert the least 
influence on the life, happiness and unhappiness of 
man, no one would bother himself with it, and the 
philosopher would become acquainted with this un- 
important phenomenon only by an act of introspec- 
tion. That wonder concerning the moral judgments 
of man, which we have described as the earliest impulse 
leading to the formulation of ethical questions, is above 
all wonder at his own actual moral behavior. 

Therefore, we inquire into the causes, that is, the 
regularity and order, of all human actions, with the 
aim of discovering the motives of moral actions. And 



28 WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

we profit in so doing because we can postpone the 
question regarding the essence of morality, the moral 
principle, until we solve the problem of the natural 
law governing behavior in general. When, however, 
we come to know about action in general, it will cer- 
tainly be much easier to learn what is peculiar to moral 
actions and to define the content of the concept "good" 
without difficulty. Perhaps it will turn out that we no 
longer feel the necessity of determining a sharp bound- 
ary for it (just as, after the physical explanation of 
light, the question of how and whether the concept of 
"light" is to be distinguished from that of heat radia- 
tion or ultra-violet radiation loses all interest). 

12. The Method of Ethics Is Psychological 

* 

Thus the central problem of ethics concerns the 
causal explanation of moral behavior; all others in 
relation to it sink to the level of preliminary or subor- 
dinate questions. The moral problem was most clearly 
formulated in this way by Schopenhauer, whose sound 
sense of reality led him to the correct path here (if not 
in the solution) and guarded him from the Kantian 
formulation of the problem and from the post-Kantian 
philosophy of value. 

The problem which we must put at the center of 
ethics is a purely psychological one. For, without 
doubt, the discovery of the motives or laws of any kind 
of behavior, and therefore of moral behavior, is a purely 



WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 29 

psychological affair. Only the empirical science of the 
laws which describe the life of the soul can solve this 
problem. One might wish to derive from this a sup- 
posedly profound and destructive objection to our for- 
mulation of the problem. For, one might say, "In 
such case there would be no ethics at all; what is called 
ethics would be nothing but a part of psychology!" 
I answer, "Why shouldn't ethics be a part of psychol- 
ogy?" Perhaps in order that the philosopher have his 
science for himself and govern autonomously in this 
sphere ? He would, indeed, thereby be freed of many 
burdensome protests of psychology. If he laid down a 
command, Thus shall man act," he would not have 
to pay attention to the psychologist who said to him, 
"But man cannot act so, because it contradicts psycho- 
logical laws!" I fear greatly that here and there this 
motive, though hidden, is at work. However, if one 
says candidly that "there is no ethics," because it is not 
necessary to label a part of psychology by a special 
name, then the question is merely terminological. 

It is a poor recommendation of the philosophical 
spirit of our age that we so often attempt to draw strict 
lines of division between the sciences, to separate ever 
new disciplines, and to prove their autonomy. The 
true philosopher goes in the opposite direction; he does 
not wish to make the single sciences self-sufficient and 
independent, but, on the contrary, to unify and bring 
them together; he wishes to show that what is common 
to them is what is most essential, and that what is 



3 o WHAT IS THE AIM OF ETHICS? 

different is accidental and to be viewed as belonging to 
practical methodology. Sub specie aeternitatis there is 
for him only one reality and one science. 

Therefore, if we decide that the fundamental ques- 
tion of ethics, "Why does man act morally?" can be 
answered only by psychology, we see in this no degra- 
dation of, nor injury to, science, but a happy simplifica- 
tion of the world-picture. In ethics we do not seek 
independence, but only the truth. 



CHAPTER II 

What Are the Motives of Human 
Conduct? 

i. Activity and Conduct 

As we learn from experience, not every human ac- 
tion allows of moral judgment; the greater part of our 
lives is filled with activities which, considered in them- 
selves, are beyond good and evil. All our daily activi- 
ties, work and play, necessities as well as amusements, 
are formed of a vast number of complicated move- 
ments which may be executed well or poorly, but 
which cannot be called "good" or "evil." How we 
place our feet when walking, hold a pen when writing, 
or move our fingers in piano-playing is, from the 
ethical point of view, perfectly indifferent. The ex- 
ceptions in which activities of this sort are subjected to 
moral judgment are easily shown to be merely appar- 
ent. If, for example, a pianist pains his audience 
because of clumsy finger movements, his errors are, 
under certain conditions, morally disapproved; but 
closer examination shows that the judgment refers not 
to the activity of the hands themselves, but only to the 
prior resolution to appear before the public with in- 
sufficient technique. 

31 



32 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

This holds in general. Ethics has to do only with 
"resolutions." Certain acts against which the stream 
of activity breaks stand out in the regular flow of ac- 
tivity that fills our existence (and is morally irrelevant). 
These acts represent the decisions of life; they alone 
deserve the name of "conduct"; all else is mere "activ- 

ty" 

How is conduct distinguished from mere activity? 
To begin with, the personality is much more impli- 
cated in conduct; it rises from greater depths, while 
activity is external, more superficial, and often fails to 
come to the light of consciousness. But the difference 
must be more sharply drawn. Psychology offers us a 
means of doing this, since it applies to genuine con- 
duct the significant title of "acts of will." In mere 
activity no act of will or decision occurs. Such activity 
occurs as immediate, although not necessarily uncon- 
scious, reactions to definite stimuli. In playing the 
piano the perception of written notes calls forth the 
corresponding finger movement without any interven- 
ing act of will. The player does not continuously 
decide, "Now I shall move this finger, now that, and 
now my arm," and so forth. The action proceeds 
according to the "ideo-motor" pattern, that is, an idea 
or a perception or some sensation functions directly as 
a stimulus; or, speaking psychologically, a stimulus of 
the sensory centers of the nervous system flows directly 
into the motor centers and brings forth the correspond- 
ing movement without delay. 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 33 

2. The Nature of the Act of Will 

This is the normal course of all our acts. It would 
never be disturbed, our whole life would run color- 
lessly on in mere activity, and there would be no acts 
of will, if at any time only one stimulus were at work. 
In such a case we would never have formed the con- 
cept of "will," we would have had no occasion for, or 
possibility of, doing so. What we call an act of will 
occurs only where several stimuli are at work simul- 
taneously, to which one cannot respond at the same 
time, because they lead to incompatible activities. 
What happens in such a case of "conflicting motives ?" 
In general, the following: there occurs a peculiar oscil- 
lation of events of consciousness, namely, a more or less 
rapid shift of ideas, which alternately appear and dis- 
appear, as weaker and stronger, clearer and more 
confused. They are the imaginative pictures of the 
results of the different activities aroused by the stimuli, 
which in this manner attempt, so to speak, to triumph 
over one another, dispute the possession of the field of 
attention, and mutually inhibit one another. 

Let us consider a very simple case. I decide to leave 
the room. I go to the door and press the latch. All 
this occurs automatically; the walking, the movement 
of my arm and hand, proceed without any act of will 
being necessary. Now I press the latch and pull on 
the door but it does not open! The usual course of 
events is disturbed. While hitherto, perhaps, I have 



34 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

been thinking of very different matters, now my atten- 
tion is centered upon the door. I shake it vigorously, 
sense the tightening of my muscles, and experience 
exertion against what opposes me. The idea of open- 
ing the door stands firmly and clearly before me as an 
image of my goal. I "will" to open the door. 

I believe that the specific experience of "willing" in 
the whole affair is nothing but the "feeling of exertion" 
(whether this is simply a feeling of tenseness in the 
muscles or some special "innervation-sensation" does 
not concern us here). If the door offers opposition for 
a long time, the question occurs to me, shall I not 
desist, and wait until the perhaps inadvertently closed 
door is opened, or shall I rather seek another exit from 
the room? In this way the outer inhibition leads to 
an inner one; the conflict between the end-in-view and 
the perceived state of affairs turns into a conflict be- 
tween ideas, between that of exit by forte, and that of 
remaining, or of leaving by the window. These ideas 
oppose each other; one will triumph, and this triumph 
is obviously a "decision," an "act of will." 

In any act of will we find a struggle against an inner 
or outer check, which ends with triumph or surrender. 
For ethics, only the case of inner checks is of any im- 
portance; therefore we restrict ourselves to the investi- 
gation of those acts of will in which a definite idea 
(motive, or end-in-view) is in conflict with another or 
several, and which finally dominates it or them, that 
is, actually leads to overt activity. 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 35 

3. The Concept of Will 

We are accustomed, under the circumstances just 
described, to speak of an "act of choice," and to say 
that the person has chosen between different possibili- 
ties, that he has come to a definite decision; and a 
primitive psychology under the influence of the idea 
of substance treats the matter as if the choice or deci- 
sion in the conflict of motives were made by a special 
power, the "will," which, watching the struggle from 
without, intervenes and bestows the prize of victory 
upon one or the other of the contestants. But we have 
nothing to do with such uncritical thinking. Exper- 
ience fails to disclose any such substratum which stands 
behind the appearances, and its hypothetical assump- 
tion contributes nothing at all to the comprehension of 
the matter. It leads rather, among other things, to an 
irresolvable circle; for, on the one hand, we say that 
the "will" decides between the motives, and, on the 
other hand, we can give no answer to the question, 
"What determines the will in its decision?" except, 
"the motives themselves." 

No, there is present no "act of will" that, added to 
the oscillation of the ends-in-view, and the final 
triumph of one of them, decides which shall triumph; 
but the whole process that we have described is itself 
the act of will. To which, again, we add the conjec- 
ture that what is specific and striking in the whole 
experience may lie in a particular kind of innervation 



36 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

or sensation of tenseness in the muscles. 1 It is well 
known that the latter is present also when the agent 
has to overcome a purely inner check or restraint, such 
as the rejection of certain ends-in-view. The body 
musculature strains (the hands clench, the face takes 
on a "determined expression") and the characteristic 
feeling of exertion, of overcoming, is present. 

4. The Law of Motivation 

Be that as it may, the question which here concerns 
us as philosophers is, "What determines whether a 
certain idea triumphs or succumbs in the conflict of 
motives? What properties distinguish the prevailing 
motive?" Or, in a more appropriate formulation, 
"Under what conditions does a definite idea gain the 
upper hand ?" The answer to this question tells us why 
a man does this rather than that, why In general he 
prefers something, "wills" something. It is the answer 
to the question, "What are the motives of human 
conduct?" 



1 For this assumption the following surprising experiment 
furnishes clear evidence. If one stands sideways with his 
shoulder against a wall, his arm hanging vertically alongside 
his body, and presses for some time very strongly against the 
wall with his arm, as if he were trying to lift it to the horizon- 
tal position, which the wall prevents, and then suddenly steps 
away from the wall, his arm rises at once as if "of its own self" 
into the horizontal position, without any decision of the will. 
The cause of this is that the effort of raising the arm is now so 
small in comparison with the immediately preceding effort that 
it fails to register in consciousness. 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 37 

In many, indeed most, situations of life the answer 
is easy to find; it lies so clearly at hand that it can be 
correctly given without further trouble by any un- 
prejudiced judge, that is, by any man not led astray by 
philosophizing and moralizing. Such a person will 
tell us that, at least in general, in a conflict of several 
ends-in-view, a man will act in the direction of the most 
pleasant. 

What does this statement mean? 

Every idea, every content of our consciousness, as we 
learn from experience, possesses a certain tone. And 
this has the consequence that the content in question 
is not something completely neutral, or indifferent, but 
is somehow characterized as agreeable or disagreeable, 
attractive or repellent, joyful or painful, pleasant or 
unpleasant. We adopt the last mentioned terminology 
and say, every experience has an emotional tone that is 
pleasant or unpleasant, or, in the substantival language 
of psychology, in every experience there is a feeling of 
pleasure or of pain. The essence of these feelings is of 
course indescribable every simple experience is beyond 
all description and one can only make clear what is 
meant by appropriate indications. Here we should note 
that we use the words "pleasant" and "unpleasant" in 
the widest possible sense. All further questions, such 
as whether there are different kinds of pleasantness and 
unpleasantness, or only different grades, we put aside; 
most of them, like the one just mentioned, seem to me 
to be improperly formulated. Of course, I have very 
different experiences when I stroke soft silk, when I 



38 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

attend a performance of Midsummer Night's Dream, 
when I admire an heroic act, when the proximity of a 
beloved person makes me happy; but in a certain re- 
spect there is undoubtedly a similarity in the mental 
dispositions in all these cases, and we express this when 
we say that all of them have pleasant emotional tones, 
or that all of them are joyful. On the other hand, 
however different my feelings may be when I cut my 
finger, when I hear a violinist play a false note, when I 
think of the injustice of the world, when I stand at the 
bier of a friend, there is some kind of similarity in all 
these cases which still justifies me in considering them 
all as belonging to a single class, and in saying they are 
unpleasant feelings. 

The enumeration of these examples should not be 
misunderstood. In exceptional cases it may very well 
be that the last mentioned situations are pleasant, and 
those mentioned first unpleasant. Sensations of bodily 
pain can be pleasant (perversion), false violin tones 
can amuse and please me (as in the case of intended 
comedy), indeed, a pessimistic philosopher can even be 
pleased with the injustice of the world, viewing it 
triumphantly as a confirmation of his views: "I told 
you so!" No definite emotional tone belongs to a 
specific experience as such; it depends upon the whole 
situation, just as a white object can appear in any color, 
depending upon the lighting. 

After these explanations we can state that the deci- 
sion of the will proceeds in the direction of the most 
pleasant end-in-view, in the following manner: of the 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 39 

ideas which function as motives, that one gains the 
upper hand which finally possesses the highest degree 
of pleasant emotional tone, or the least unpleasant tone, 
and thus the act in question is unambiguously de- 
termined. 

Two remarks must be introduced here. First, the 
decision occurs only after the difference in emotional 
tone reaches a certain point, because without this 
assumption it is obvious that no oscillation in "choice" 
could ever occur. The second remark is that when I 
describe the conflict of motives as an opposition of 
ideas, this is to be considered as a way of speaking only, 
and not as anything binding or compromising. Per- 
haps other psychic acts are involved, but this question 
can remain undecided for our purposes. 

Before we discuss the validity of the above proposi- 
tion, we must devote a moment to the difficulties which 
lie hidden in the notion of "most pleasant," or "least 
unpleasant." The use of these phrases obviously pre- 
supposes that one can compare the different pleasant 
and unpleasant situations, and can speak of more or 
less with respect to feelings. However, this seems to 
be impossible, because the intensity of feelings (or any 
other psychical state) certainly cannot actually be 
measured, cannot be determined quantitatively. This 
is doubtless true; a calculus of pleasure and pain with 
sums and differences of feelings would be meaningless. 
Still, we can carry through the comparison of ideas 
with respect to their "pleasure value" or their "motiva- 
tive power/' which is necessary for the understanding 



40 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

of acts of will. This follows from the fact that in 
every-day life we constantly say with sense and under- 
standing, "I prefer this to that, but not as much as I 
like the other," and so forth. It seems to me that the 
matter sums up as follows: When two ends-in-view, 
a and b, appear alternately before one, they are not 
directly balanced one against the other; but we find 
that, for example, the transition from a to b is an un- 
pleasant experience, while the transition from b to a is 
pleasant. Thus we are able to say, by way of defini- 
tion, that a with respect to b is the more pleasant or the 
less unpleasant idea. In general, we must not consider 
the genesis of acts of will as a static balancing, but 
rather as a dynamic process, a flux, in which the wax- 
ing and waning and shifting of the images is at least 
as much tinged with feeling as are the images them- 
selves. Thus we see how one can speak sensibly of 
more or less with respect to pleasure and pain, without 
actually presupposing quantitative differences. We re- 
quire nothing more than the opposition of pleasure 
and pain in the transition from one idea to another. 
Among a number of motives present the most attrac- 
tive or least unattractive end-in-view is distinguished 
by the fact that every departure from it to any one of 
the others is joined with an inhibiting pain. Thus it 
represents a summit, appears as such in the center of 
consciousness, and draws conduct toward itself. 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 41 

5. In Proof of the Law of Motivation 

Having thus become clear regarding the meaning of 
the law, that in the conflict of motives the decision goes 
to the most pleasant or least unpleasant, we turn now 
to the question of its validity. 

I have already remarked that, for the majority of 
cases of every-day acts of will, its validity is indispu- 
table and obvious. When a child reaches for the largest 
of several cakes offered it, when I take a walk in the 
open air instead of going to a faculty meeting, when I 
reflect whether the destination of a summer's trip shall 
be the sea or the mountains, when one wavers between 
a visit to the opera or to a concert, between buying 
black or brown shoes then, normally, in all these 
cases and in a thousand similar ones, there is not the 
shadow of a doubt that the decision is determined by 
the agreeableness or disagreeableness, by the pleasure 
quality of the end-in-view, and that it takes place in the 
described way. 

But in order to pursue the study of ethics, indeed to 
understand the mechanism of conduct at all, we are 
little served by a rule that holds good in the majority 
of cases only; we need a law, that is, a description of 
relationships that fits all cases. Now the familiar 
method always used by science is to ask whether a rule 
verified in many cases may not itself be a law, that is, 
actually hold for all cases. At any rate, one begins 
with this assumption and often finds it verified, in that 



42 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

all cases which at first sight seem not to fit the rule are 
apparent exceptions only, their actual subsumption 
under the law being hidden by complicated circum- 
stances. 

Applying this method to our problem, we express 
the provisional assumption that the rule governing 
many cases of motivation may itself be a law, that is, 
we examine whether or not in every case of an act of 
will the decision be not determined in the direction of 
the most pleasant, or least unpleasant, motive. 

6. The Law of Motivation in the Case of Sacrifice 

At first sight this seems not to be the case at all. It 
happens that a well-bred child chooses the smallest 
cake, even though it obviously would "rather have" the 
largest; and do we not very often find ourselves in the 
situation of the child and trudge toward a painful, 
unpleasant goal ? Does this not happen whenever we 
"make a sacrifice?" The fact is, many, if not most, 
philosophers believe that in such situations the prevail- 
ing motive is certainly not the most pleasant, and is 
often extremely unpleasant. Therefore, they do not 
consider the law to be universally valid; they deny it 
represents the law of motivation, and say it is not at all 
true that a man can desire only that the idea of which 
possesses relatively greater pleasure for him. They 
hold that he can desire simply anything, and many of 
them (including Kant) are of the opinion that al- 
though human conduct is determined by pleasant or 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 43 

unpleasant feelings in the described manner in all 
other cases, this is simply not so in the case of moral 
acts. The latter, according to them, form an exception 
and are, indeed, defined and distinguished by this fact. 
Hence we see the extent and importance of our prob- 
lem, and we cannot be content before learning whether 
our law of motivation holds only in the limited sphere 
of the trivial acts of every-day life, or whether it is a 
true law governing every act of will without exception. 
Let us not hesitate to analyze more closely the case 
of the child who has to choose between its several cakes. 
If the child takes the smallest in order to leave the 
larger ones for its companions, one may well consider 
this to be a "moral" act. Can its behavior really not 
be explained in terms of the law that the most pleasant 
end-in-view determines the will? I believe that we 
must admit that this is very easily done. For how is 
the state of mind of this child distinguished from that 
of the other who thoughtlessly takes the largest? We 
said before that even the child who here decides to make 
a "sacrifice" would "rather have" a larger piece of cake 
than a smaller one. But what is the significance of 
this? Obviously, that under otherwise similar con- 
ditions the idea of the larger cake is more pleasant (in 
the sense previously defined) than is that of the smaller. 
But conditions here are not the same, since in the mind 
of the child who renounces, because of his education 
or natural propensities, certain events are happening 
which are absent in the other child; and these act so 
that the original emotional tone of the conflicting ends- 



44 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

in-view is entirely altered. They are events of associa- 
tion by means of which there enter, more or less clearly, 
into consciousness ideas of pleased or displeased par- 
ents, their words of praise or censure, or the ideas of 
happy or disappointed companions. The strong emo- 
tional tones that belong to all these ideas are trans- 
mitted to the motive with which they are associated, 
and completely modify its initial pleasure value. The 
image of a larger piece of cake is indeed more pleasant 
than that of a smaller one if both stand side by side 
unaccompanied by other ideas, but here each is joined 
by a complex of other ideas together with their feelings, 
and these feelings are transferred, as experience shows, 
to those images, even when the ideas to which they 
originally belonged no longer appear in consciousness. 
By this process the idea of the lesser good can easily 
become more pleasant than that of the greater, and the 
apparently paradoxical decision occurs in complete 
conformity with our law of motivation. Every one 
admits that the act of will could take place as it did 
only because of certain external influences, for no one 
believes that a child can choose the smaller cake merely 
because it likes the larger one more. And pedagogical 
experience teaches us that these influences are of the 
sort described. Since this suffices to explain the fact 
completely, we need no further hypothesis. Thus our 
law of motivation has here been entirely verified; and 
it is verified in all other cases we may choose to con- 
sider. Having dealt with a very simple example, we 
do well now to turn our attention to those acts of will 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 45 

in which the very highest matters are at stake, and 
which have from olden times been drawn into the fore- 
ground of ethical inquiries. Such are the cases of 
seemingly-greatest renunciation, or self-sacrifice. 

7. The Law of Motivation in the Case 
of Heroism 

The idea of personal destruction is, in general, one of 
the most terrifying; not the most terrifying, for there 
are enough miseries in comparison with which death 
is felt as a soothing relief. Yet we observe, in life and 
history, acts of will whose fatal and miserable conse- 
quences are not only inevitable for the performer, but 
are clearly seen by him to be involved as the goal of his 
action. The martyr accepts pain and death for the 
sake of an idea, a friend gives his life or "happiness" 
for his friend. Can any one in earnest say of such 
persons that their decisions are determined by the mo- 
tives which possess the most pleasant or the least un- 
pleasant emotional tones? 

According to my firm conviction, one cannot say 
anything else if one would tell the truth, for such are 
the facts. Let us then try to analyze and understand 
the motive of heroism. The hero acts "for the sake of 
a cause"; he desires to carry out an idea or realize a 
definite goal. It is clear that the thought of this goal 
or that idea dominates his consciousness to such an 
extent that there is in it hardly room for any other 
thoughts. At least this holds in the case of inspiration, 



46 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

from which alone an heroic act can arise. It is true 
that the idea of his own painful destruction is present, 
but, however burdened with pain it may be in itself, it 
is inhibited and repressed by the predominant end-in- 
view, which finally triumphs in an "act of will," in an 
effort which becomes stronger and sharper the longer 
and more clearly the thought of the unavoidable catas- 
trophe confronts him. What is the source of the 
astonishing force of the decisive end-in-view ? Whence 
the power of this affect? Without doubt this is due 
to emotion. Inspiration is the greatest pleasure that 
can fall to the lot of man. To be inspired by some- 
thing means to be overcome by the greatest joy in the 
thought of it. The man who, under the stress of in- 
spiration, decides to help a friend or save another crea- 
ture from pain and destruction, whatever the cost, finds 
the thought of this act so profoundly jojtful, so over- 
whelmingly pleasant that, at the moment, the idea of 
the preservation of his own life and the avoidance of 
pain cannot compare with it. And he who fights for 
a cause with such inspiration that he accepts all perse- 
cution and insult realizes his idea with such elevated 
pure joy that neither the thought of his miseries nor 
their actual pain can prevail aught against it. The 
notion of giving up his purpose because of pain is, for 
him, more unpleasant than the pain itself. 

Thus the correctness of our law of the will is shown 
in even the most extreme case, and quite naturally, 
without any auxiliary hypothesis. It is, in fact, uni- 
versally true that the will follows the motive which has 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 47 

the greatest degree of pleasant feeling connected with 
it. 

8. Rebuttal of False Objections and Explanations 

It was, of course, a gross error to try, as men did on 
the basis of a naive psychology, to explain the action of 
the martyr by saying that his behavior is determined 
by a hope of reward in another world, beyond; in this 
fashion apparently subsuming it under our law of the 
will. This explanation may often fit, but certainly not 
always, for there have been unbelieving martyrs, con- 
cerned only with this world. Indeed, it does not hold 
even in the majority of cases, even though Schiller has 
the Maid of Orleans die with the words, "The pain is 
brief, the joy is everlasting." ["Kurz ist der Schmerz, 
und ewig ist die Freude"] 

No, it is not at all necessary that the prevailing 
pleasant idea be of one's personal condition. Why 
should this be assumed ? Perhaps because one believes 
that, in general, only ideas of one's own condition can 
be pleasant, or, at least, that only such ideas can be 
intensely pleasant? This would be a gross misunder- 
standing of the psychological fact, for the commonest 
experiences teach us the opposite. They also teach that 
a man is not nearly so much concerned with his own 
future good and evil as many older ethical systems 
would have us believe. For example, one can easily 
see this in the way a man harms himself by being im- 
moderate. When he squanders his future happiness 



48 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

for a mess of pottage, why should he not risk it for the 
sake of the joy given him in saving some unfortunate ? 

If we are not clear in this, we run the danger of 
establishing our law of motivation in an erroneous 
manner, and hence missing its truth. In fact, such 
mistaken notions at this point are to blame for the fact 
that many hold our law to be false. They suppose it 
to be absurd to say that the martyr suffers and dies 
because of "pleasure," since in this way one seems to 
wipe out, either in fact or at least terminologically, all 
difference between the pleasant and the unpleasant. 

When it comes to the confusion of the facts I believe 
that our representation has avoided just that to which 
our opponents have fallen victim. It is not a confusion, 
but on the contrary a finer distinction, if we emphasize 
that an ordinarily painful experience can, under special 
conditions, become pleasant, and vice ver$a. It is this 
fact that is overlooked by the opponents of our view 
when they say that a man can act in the direction of any 
end-in-view, and not only toward a pleasant one. To 
be sure, any end can be desired, but this does not mean 
that it has nothing to do with the pleasure tone of the 
end-in-view, but only that any end can become pleasant. 
It is as if one said, "Whoever is not blind can see any 
visible thing." Of course, but only if it be illuminated! 

The will can no more direct itself toward an end, the 
idea of which is simply unpleasant and has absolutely 
nothing attractive, alluring, or noble in it, than the eye 
can see an object clothed in utter darkness. In ethical 
considerations we often come upon the assertion that 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 49 

man can desire that which is in every respect painful 
and unenjoyable to him; but all examples that can be 
offered of such a desire show upon analysis that the 
end is imagined as in some way still something noble, 
great, necessary, propitiative, or valued, no matter how 
much woe may be connected with it. As soon as one 
succeeds (which is not so easy) in imagining an end 
that appears to be completely unpleasant, repulsive, 
disgusting, bringing suffering, and hateful without 
compensation, without any possibility of transfigura- 
tion, exhaltation or admiration, then one sees at once 
with complete certainty that such an end cannot be 
desired. It is an inescapable law that the absolutely 
repulsive and unpleasant is not a possible object of 
desire. Martyrs are of course often fanatics, and a 
fanatic often inclines toward perversion; hence bodily 
pain can then be pleasant for him. But this case is 
very rare, although it frequently happens that the idea 
of an ordinarily painful state is a joyful one for him. 

With this we arrive at a second factual distinction, 
which is frequently neglected by those who deny our 
law of the will. It is the distinction between the 
pleasant idea of a state and the idea of a pleasant state. 
That is, one can imagine only a thing, a state, or an 
event, but not the pleasure connected with the things; 
whether the idea itself is joyful or painful does not at 
all depend on whether the imagined things, when they 
are actually present, have pleasant or unpleasant con- 
sequences. As is well known, Dante thought that 
there was no greater pain than that connected with 



50 WHAT AKE THE MOTlVJiS 

the idea of a pleasant state if this lay in the past, 
Nessun maggior dolore . . . Our law is concerned 
only with whether an idea is pleasant, and not with 
whether it is the idea of something pleasant. 

Regarding the objection, often raised, that the law 
of motivation can be maintained only by a trick of 
terminology, since one extends the concept of pleasure 
too widely and designates very different things by the 
one word, we must say that the real reason for our 
usage, in grouping together everything which is pleas- 
ant or satisfying, lies in the facts. The usage is per- 
fectly natural, and is subsequently justified because it 
leads to a simple formulation of a fundamental law. 
And how else would one define the concept of 
pleasure? The objection raised above cannot be con- 
sidered a serious one. Of course, we could agree to 
call only the satisfaction of hunger, thirst, and the 
sexual impulse "pleasure" which, perhaps, certain 
moralists would prefer but in so doing we should 
merely satisfy certain prejudices, and it would be 
necessary to give up the adequate formulation of the 
law of motivation. 

No serious danger, then, threatens our law from this 
quarter; and one actually finds the conviction of its 
validity very widespread. Even many philosophers 
who explicitly oppose it, implicitly presuppose its 
validity. The institutions of human society all show 
the universal belief in the validity of the law. For no 
religion, no system of education, no public institution 
knows any other means of influencing human action 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 51 

than to strive to make the idea of the end whose realiza- 
tion is desired as pleasant as possible, and the idea of 
the undesired unpleasant. The clumsiest means of 
doing this is the promise of reward and the threat of 
punishment, but there are also more refined, indirect 
means. 

9. The Law of Motivation Is Not Tautologous 

Such being the case, it is unnecessary to defend the 
truth of the law of motivation any further; we even 
find it considered almost self-evident. But we must 
again be careful not to consider it too self-evident, 
which is indeed often done. Some think the law says 
nothing whatever, others that for ethics, at least, it has 
no significance. We shall begin by examining the 
first opinion. 

We often hear it said that if a man decides in favor 
of something it is clear that he "prefers" it to some- 
thing else, that he considers it in some sense better. 
But this holds only because "to prefer" and "to con- 
sider better" are different expressions of the same fact. 
Our "law" has therefore (it is said) no factual content; 
it is merely an analytical proposition, a tautology, and 
affords us no knowledge. 

But this argument is false. It rests upon a confusion 
of "to desire" and "to will." The expressions "to 
consider better," "to find more satisfying," "to imagine 
with pleasure," and similar ones, may be treated as 
synonyms of "to desire." John Stuart Mill saw this 



52 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

clearly when he wrote that to find something pleasing 
and to desire it are only different ways of expressing 
the same fact. But "to will" is something else, some- 
thing more. No reaction need follow mere desire, but 
volition is inseparably joined to action and conduct; 
volition is identical with the primary, inner stage of 
conduct, the exertion, the innervation. (Whether this 
actually leads to bodily motion and to further external 
effects depends upon external circumstances and can 
no longer be attributed to him who wills, to the self.) 
That something imagined with the maximum amount 
of pleasure is actually willed, that is, leads to innerva- 
tion, is anything but self-evident; it is simply a fact of 
experience. We are so accustomed to this fact that we 
are inclined to believe it is part of the very concept of 
the willed that it be also something desired. How- 
ever, we see that here we are concerned with an em- 
pirical fact, with a law established &y experience; 
because we can very well imagine a different state of 
affairs. The child with the piece of cake could, for 
example, very well observe the larger piece with much 
greater pleasure and still make the discovery that when- 
ever a smaller or less tasty piece was offered its hand 
always reached for the latter. And it could be so uni- 
versally: whenever several ends-in-view of different 
pleasure values compete with one another the reaction 
might unhesitatingly proceed in the direction of the 
least pleasant. This is quite conceivable. That man 
always wills what he least desires would be a possible 
law of the will. Of course, under such circumstances, 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 53 

if the world remained as it now is, an individual subject 
to this law would be destroyed in a very short time. 
Our actual law of motivation would appear to be a 
tautology if one defined as the most pleasant idea that 
which actually leads to conduct; but this is certainly not 
relevant, since we have assumed from the beginning 
that by pleasure is meant an indefinable quality imme- 
diately known to everyone and different from pain. 
Only observation can determine that those ideas are 
the deciding motives which are most richly endowed 
with this quality; it is not self-evident. 

10. The Law Expresses Significant Knowledge 

A word now concerning the attempt, mentioned 
above, to show our law of the will to be insignificant. 
It may be admitted, one says, that man can will only 
what appears in some way attractive to him. But what 
of that ? The noble man will find the good pleasing, 
and will do it, while the scoundrel will prefer evil, both 
according to the same law; and consequently we shall 
learn nothing regarding the difference between good 
and evil, concerning the distinction between moral and 
other conduct. This distinction and everything that 
ethics is interested in could remain the same even if 
some other law of the will were true; knowledge of the 
law leaves us no wiser than we were before concerning 
ethical matters. 

We answer that of course we learn nothing positive 
concerning what is unique in moral volition, but we 



54 WHAT ARE THE MOTIVES 

learn at least something negative, namely, that the 
peculiarity of good conduct does not consist in the fact 
that the pleasure and pain of the agent have nothing 
to do with his motivation. And, since this has often 
been maintained, and indeed from it has been derived 
the opinion that moral behavior proceeds in the direc- 
tion opposite to the most pleasant motive (William 
James says that moral conduct is conduct in the line of 
greatest resistance), we must consider it an important 
insight to note that our law holds for every volition 
without exception, and therefore for moral volition. 

But more than this is gained. When one asks, why 
does A behave morally and B the opposite? we can 
now answer: because the idea of a certain end is joined 
with pleasure for A, but with its opposite for B (both, 
of course, taken relative to the pleasure-value of the 
contrary ways of acting). But, one will say, the ques- 
tion is given no final answer in this way; it is only put 
off. For now one must ask: why, then, is the same 
idea pleasant for the one and not for the other? 
Exactly! The question is only put off, but perhaps to 
a point at which one can hope to answer it easily! We 
now know where we have to search. It is necessary 
to make out the laws of feelings, the rules that govern 
their growth and decline, according to which they 
work together and against each other, but above all to 
understand the process whereby they are joined to 
ideas. Perhaps psychology already knows these laws. 
As soon as we are in possession of them we shall be 
able to refer to their ultimate causes the predispositions 



OF HUMAN CONDUCT? 55 

of men to a certain way of acting; we shall be in posi- 
tion to understand their differences and their origin, 
and, finally, to give the means whereby their develop- 
ment can be influenced. We shall, with this, have 
acquired just that knowledge which ethics seeks. 



CHAPTER III 

What Is Egoism? 

i. Egoism Is "Immoral" 

Many philosophers have thought that a will de- 
termined in the described manner, by the maximum 
pleasure, must be called egoistic; because it is supposed 
to be egoistic, or selfish, to "seek one's own pleasure." 
And this holds even of those thinkers, like Spinoza, 
who had a presentiment of the validity of our law, as 
well as of those, such as Kant, who denied it. The 
former merely desired to express a fact, but in so doing 
gave to the word "egoism" so broad a meaning that it 
became quite useless; the latter desired to discredit the 
law of the will. They used the word "egoism" with the 
uncomplimentary meaning which it has in everyday 
life; but they did not realize that in this sense conduct 
is certainly not at all egoistic when it occurs in accord- 
ance with our law of motivation. For no unbiassed 
person will call an act egoistic which, for example, 
arises out of joy in the satisfactions of another person. 

There is no doubt that in everyday speech this word 
is used with the intention of blaming; that is, when 
someone calls certain conduct egoistic he desires to call 

56 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 57 

up an unpleasant idea of this conduct. Also there is 
no doubt that such condemnation is intended as moral 
condemnation: the word "egoistic" signifies a concept 
subsumed under the concept of the "immoral." Thus 
egoism is a subspecies of immorality. By learning 
what is meant by egoism we learn in part what is 
meant by "immorality," and this gives us a clue to the 
meaning of "morality," its opposite. If those philoso- 
phers were right who hope to derive all immorality 
from "egoism," and who see in it the source of all evil, 
then with the discovery of the meaning of the word 
the whole question of the nature of the moral would 
practically be answered; for it would only be necessary 
to separate what is indifferent (if anything of the sort 
exists) from what is not egoistic to find the moral in 
the remainder. 

But, however this may be, in any case the inquiry 
concerning the nature of egoism can only consist in 
determining the sense in which the word is actually 
used. It cannot determine that a certain kind of be- 
havior is "really" egoism, and that nothing else can 
bear this name. 

2. Egoism and "Personal Welfare" 

The most convenient, easiest assertion that a philoso- 
pher can make about egoism is that it is an "impulse." 
Thus we find Schopenhauer saying that all human 
conduct can be explained by the existence of three 
"main-springs" of conduct, namely, egoism, malice, 



5 8 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

and sympathy. This would be an extremely simple 
mechanism, and further explanation of the three im- 
pulses does appear at first very simple. Egoism (ac- 
cording to Schopenhauer and many others) aims at 
"one's own welfare"; sympathy aims at "another's 
welfare" and corresponds to altruism; and malice aims 
at "harm to others." Thus, according to this teaching, 
one's own welfare and the welfare or harm of others 
constitute the three situations possessing human inter- 
est. The "satisfaction" of an impulse would consist in 
the realization of its corresponding situation. Is it not 
significant that in this list there is no impulse directed 
toward "one's own harm?" 

It is easy to see that in this manner it is impossible to 
get a definition of egoism, or even to understand the 
nature of an impulse in general. For one must know 
first what one's "own welfare" is. Does,it not consist 
in the fact that one's own desires are fulfilled, that is, 
that one's impulses are satisfied ? Consequently, if one 
is sympathetic, the other's welfare means at the same 
time the realization of one's own desires; if a man is 
malicious he is satisfied in knowing the other to suffer, 
and thereby his own welfare is increased. In other 
words, an act springing out of malice or sympathy 
would be just as egoistic as conduct motivated by 
egoism. 

We learn from this paradox that by "welfare" one 
cannot mean the realization of all personal desires, the 
satisfaction of all of one's own impulses, without giving 
up the definition of egoism as the impulse aiming at 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 59 

"personal welfare." One of the two at least must be 
given up. In fact, both must be abandoned in order to 
obtain a clear idea that will do justice to the actual use 
of the word. For if one tries to improve Schopen- 
hauer's thought, retaining his way of looking at the 
matter, by saying that "welfare" means the realization 
of all desires with the exception of those arising from 
malice or sympathy, then we must ask: with what right 
are such different activities as striving for power, 
knowledge, sexual pleasure, enjoyment of art consid- 
ered to be expressions of one impulse, namely "ego- 
ism?" This cannot be justified by linguistic usage, for 
the desires directed, for example, toward knowledge 
or aesthetic enjoyment are not usually called egoistic; 
nor can it be grounded in the facts, for evidently we 
have here a large variety of different "impulses," and 
the word "egoism" would only be a collective name 
for them. It would not be coordinated with the im- 
pulses, but would stand, as it were, behind or over 
them, as an impulse of a higher order. Such an 
impulse, which aimed at the satisfaction of impulses, 
would of course be a meaningless notion; and thus we 
discover the extreme carelessness of the usual formula- 
tion of the concept, carelessness that makes it impossi- 
ble to talk clearly and sensibly concerning this matter. 

3. The Nature of Impulse 

Therefore, before carrying our considerations any 
further, we must ask what it is we wish to designate 



60 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

by the term "impulse." Linguistically the word obvi- 
ously means something that pushes, impels, or thrusts; 
and so one generally thinks of a force (a "spring") 
which in turn is imagined as analogous to muscular 
exertion or work. If, however, one is to make the 
nature of an impulse clear, one does well to replace 
such images by an abstract formulation. And this 
must obviously be: an impulse is a human disposition 
by means of which man's desires and volitions are 
directed toward a definite goal. This formulation, 
which, like every statement about "dispositions," "pro- 
pensities," or "faculties," says but little, obtains a con- 
crete content if we remember that we already know, 
from the preceding chapter, how a definite goal comes 
to be desired. This desire consists in the fact that the 
idea of the goal is pleasant; l thus we may say that an 
impulse exists whenever an idea (or perception) is 
accompanied by a feeling of pleasure. The disposition 
which constitutes the essence of impulse is, then, the 
inherited or acquired propensity to react to certain 
stimuli with feelings. These can of course be un- 
pleasant feelings, for an impulse can be negative in 
nature; an unpleasant idea has the tendency to lead to 
a movement of avoidance or flight. 



1 1 do not think that this definition of desire is too broad. 
If one objects: "The sight of the moon is pleasant, but we do 
not desire the moon," we should answer: "We do desire the 
sight of the moon." And again we must warn against a con- 
fusion of desire with volition. What is desired is willed only 
if no other stronger desires are present. 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 61 

We sec at once that an impulse need not be an 
enduring, fixed orientation of the soul; it can be 
temporary and changeable. Because of a passing dis- 
position an idea can come to possess a certain emotional 
tone even though in general it possesses quite a differ- 
ent one, or none at all. 

An impulse is, like a force, characterized by a certain 
direction and a certain magnitude. The former is 
given by the particular idea (or class of ideas) to which 
the pleasant or unpleasant feelings are joined, the 
latter by the intensity of the feeling, by which is meant 
its relative strength in relation to the emotional tones 
of other alternative ideas. (One should bear in mind 
what was said in the previous chapter on the compari- 
son of feelings of pleasure.) 

Impulses, then, are not to be compared to actual 
tensions or potential energy. The nervous energy that 
is spent in every act has its seat, so to speak, in the 
whole organism, not in an individual impulse; the 
latter merely determines the path it takes. The 
"strength" of an impulse only conditions its prepon- 
derance over other impulses; the intensity of the act, 
the power with which it is carried out, depends upon 
the total energy which is available to the agent. The 
word "inclination," which Kant always used in place 
of "impulse," offers less occasion for the confusion of 
impulse and expanding force, and therefore is the 
better expression. For an impulse does not actually 
"impel," but "inclines" or directs a tendency. When 
we attribute to anyone an inclination toward certain 



62 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

things, conditions, or activities, this is only another way 
of expressing the fact that the idea of those things or 
activities is pleasant for him. And since there is hardly 
any idea, or perception, or any psychic event to which 
a feeling is not joined, we can say that in every moment 
of our conscious life some inclination is active: our 
whole life is a life of impulse. This is the empirical 
basis upon which rests the notion of many philosophers 
that the essence of life is the "will." (According to 
Schopenhauer, it is the essence of the whole universe.) 
If we connect what is said above on the nature of 
"impulse" with the law of the will enunciated in the 
preceding chapters, we realize the important truth that, 
no matter what one's conduct is, one always follows 
some inclination. One can do and will only what one 
has an impulse to will and do. For the law of the will 
asserts that one can act only toward tl^at end whose 
idea is most pleasant for one, and this means in the 
direction of the strongest impulse. Thus Kant's cate- 
gorical imperative, which demands that one act wholly 
independently of one's inclinations, demands what is 
impossible. It goes contrary to the facts of psychology 
and therefore has no interest for us. Moral conduct is 
either impossible or it is derived from natural in- 
clinations. 

4. Is Egoism an Impulse? 

After making clear the meaning of the term "im- 
pulse," the question whether egoism is an impulse 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 63 

obtains a clear meaning, and we can now answer it. 
If egoism or selfishness were one inclination among 
others, this would mean that certain definite ideas were 
pleasant to the egoist which for other men would be 
unpleasant or without any emotional tone whatever. 
Which ideas could these be? 

Here we must consider the concept of "personal 
welfare," already touched upon. Is there an idea of 
"personal welfare?" Obviously there is not, for an 
idea is always an intuited, given content of conscious- 
ness, while "welfare," on the contrary, is something 
extremely abstract; hence there is no idea of "welfare" 
in general. If we assign someone the task of imagin- 
ing his own welfare he cannot carry it out; he can only 
picture definite situations in which he would say that 
he is satisfied. 

Can we deduce from this that only those inclinations 
are possible which are directed upon particular imagin- 
able situations or things, that there can be no impulse 
directed toward the abstraction "personal welfare," 
and that therefore egoism must be something else? 
Such a conclusion would be premature, for there are 
undoubtedly such impulses as the will to power, the 
will to wealth, and yet power and wealth are wholly 
abstract, and not directly imaginable. 

Shall we say that a general concept such as "power" 
can also be emotionally colored, like an actual idea, and 
thereby constitute the nucleus of an impulse? This 
would be a psychological error that would make us 
guilty of the rationalization of ethics, from which all 



64 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

systems in the history of philosophy have suffered; in. 
stead of investigating the individual cases of actual 
psychic processes connected with moral feeling they 
deal at * once with abstractions and generalizations 
which, just because they originate in the thought 
of everyday life, are to be tested doubly carefully. 
"Power" in general cannot be pictured by anyone, but 
only the activities in which it manifests itself. The 
man who longs for power sees himself carry admiring 
multitudes before him in a fiery speech, sees how he 
gives commands to cringing subordinates, how he 
stands majestically before humbled opponents, and so 
forth. He who strives for wealth cannot imagine this 
directly, but pictures the individual things which con- 
stitute, represent, or symbolize it: a castle, a park, a 
steam-yacht, a dollar bill, a table loaded with delicacies, 
and similar things. The sight and thpught of such 
things are saturated with feelings, as is characteristic 
for the process of desire. How greatly powerful desire 
is dependent upon the liveliness and concreteness of 
the exciting idea or perception is known to all poets 
(indefinite "yearning" is a very different thing from 
desire); philosophers should also learn this in order 
that they might not replace the actual human soul by 
artificial constructions having nothing to do with real 
life. 

That, despite the psychological facts described, we 
still may speak of "the" will to wealth, and must do 
this (for its resolution into an inclination toward bank 
notes, another toward automobiles, and so forth, would 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 65 

be absurd) rests upon the fact that something is com- 
mon to all these desired things; namely, their high 
money-value, and that, conversely, all things possessing 
this common property are desired by the same individ- 
ual. This indicates that in all these cases, somehow, a 
common cause can be made responsible for the fact 
that just those objects which belong to the class defined 
by the common property arouse desire when imagined 
or perceived by a certain individual. The presence of 
this common element, or this cause, is now expressed 
as the presence of an "impulse," and for this reason the 
referring of the conduct to impulse signifies a kind of 
explanation or knowledge, for knowledge consists in 
discovering what is common to different entities. 

5. The Possibility of Imagining "Personal States" 

We are now prepared to answer the question, "Is 
there an impulse that is directed toward 'personal 
welfare/ and which therefore may be called egoism?" 
The question must be answered in the affirmative if 
there is a special class of objects of desire whose com- 
mon characteristic consists of the fact that all of them 
are states of personal welfare; otherwise it must be 
denied. 

In fact we do not succeed in delimiting a class of 
states in the desired manner. Try it! If one meant 
this, is the first attempt by a state of welfare simply 
any pleasant state, the following would result: we 
should have to separate out all of the acts of will of an 



66 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

individual in which the prevailing (and therefore 
relatively pleasant) idea was the idea of a state of the 
agent himself. From these acts we should have to 
select again those (for they would not be all) in which 
the imagined personal state was pleasant; then we 
should have to say that these last, finally selected acts 
proceeded from the egoism of the individual. 

Both selections meet with insuperable difficulties. 
The first, which would select the cases in which the 
idea of a personal state functions as motive, faces the 
epistemological difficulty of clearly distinguishing the 
ego from the environment the difficulty, namely, of 
deciding whether an idea is really only of a state of 
oneself, or whether it includes something else, say, the 
external conditions of the internal state. For example: 
suppose someone would like to hear the "Eroica" and 
decides to attend a certain concert. In general, the 
events proceed so that, as a result perhaps of an an- 
nouncement of the concert in a newspaper, the person 
imagines certain sounds and melodies of Beethoven; 
in addition he imagines the orchestra playing, pictures 
the conductor, the lighted hall, perhaps musical notes, 
and so forth; all these ideas or images are very pleasing 
and in the end lead to action (the purchase of tickets, 
and so forth). And now suppose someone asserting 
that the whole process might take place differently, so 
that the person does not think of the concert hall nor 
the orchestra nor the conductor nor the tones of the 
symphony, but only pictures his own state of musical 
enjoyment. In the first case the impulse to which the 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 67 

action corresponds would be the requirement of or 
desire for music; in the second it would be egoism! 

Such an opposition of the two cases is untenable, for 
the following reasons: First (and this is the most fun- 
damental), it is doubtful whether a case of the second 
sort is at all possible. I do not believe that it is. I fail 
to discover how anyone can imagine himself in a state 
of musical enjoyment without somehow also imagin- 
ing the conditions and the object (the composition) of 
his enjoyment. It seems to me that the process must 
always take place in the manner first described, or 
similarly, because the state of the self cannot be isolated 
from the "impressions" which call it forth; for in fact 
these impressions belong to the state. Every idea pre- 
supposes a perception to which it is related as a copy or 
secondary experience. Since there is no perception of 
the personal state (but only the state itself, which can 
also be a perception), it follows that there is no idea of 
it. One could at best attempt to distinguish the second 
case from the first, and consider it exceptional, by 
admitting that in both cases the process is essentially 
the same, but that in the second is added the thought, 
"All these events of the musical performance come to 
my attention as a result of and only in so far as they 
produce a special condition in me." But what of it? 
This accompanying thought would be a noteworthy 
additional fact, a peculiarity of the individual, but no 
special new "impulse" would be given with it; nothing 
would be altered in the act of the will. One cannot 
say, "The man would not have gone to the concert 



68 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

unless he had that thought, and therefore the impulse 
lay in it," for, according to the presupposition, the 
musical impulse is already present (because otherwise 
the concert would fail to produce a pleasant state in 
him) ; and if the impulse is present and there are no 
hindrances, the action must follow even without the 
accessory thought, and therefore this plays no part in 
the motivation. 

In the second place, suppose that a pure idea of 
nothing but one's personal state were possible, and 
occurred sometimes as a motive: this would be a very 
special orientation of consciousness, it would be an 
extraordinary case, and therefore cannot constitute the 
case of "egoism"; for egoism is not at all rare, but an 
everyday matter. There is no doubt that the thought 
of one's own states is exceptional, and could occur only 
in hyperacute, sophisticated men. And it is just as 
clear that a natural man who thinks very little can be a 
robust egoist; and therefore that thought cannot be the 
characteristic property of the egoist. One realizes this 
most clearly by picturing the disposition of an egotisti- 
cal person. Suppose that such a person robs his com- 
panions of something, and appropriates it all without 
thinking of the others. Does he not act selfishly in all 
such cases, or is he selfish only when he continuously 
pictures to himself, during his violent or cunning pro- 
cedure, how pleased he will be when he gets the 
object? 

We have restricted our observations to certain ex- 
amples, but the result holds generally. However hard 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 69 

one tries, one fails to find a pure idea of a personal 
state; and whenever this does seem to occur one sees 
at once that there is nothing new in the situation as a 
whole, but only a special thought is added. Our 
thoughts seem above all to be directed upon ourselves 
when we imagine our future bodily state. But this of 
course would not be an idea of the "self" at all, but of 
something external. Still, apart from this, egoism 
could not be so defined; the concept would have, in 
comparison with common usage, a far too restricted 
scope. He who interested himself in nothing but his 
meals would certainly be called an egoist, but he need 
never think of his "self"; his soul (if this word is 
appropriate to such a man) would be concerned with 
nothing but ideas of his favorite food and drink. The 
object, not the subjective condition of satisfaction 
which its possession produces, is alone desired. Some- 
thing analogous holds in the case of a believer in after 
life, who imagines a state of personal blessedness, and 
in all similar cases. 

6. Egoism Is Not the Will to Pleasure 

Thus we have determined that we cannot discover 
any conduct whose motivating idea is the idea of a 
state of the agent himself; and since this characteristic 
is found in no actions, it cannot be present in the case 
of "egoistic" actions. If our investigation had not led 
to this negative result we should now have to inquire 
whether egoistic behavior is classified with that in 



70 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

which the motive is the idea of a pleasant personal 
state. But we may now ignore this question; neither 
a pleasant nor unpleasant state of the self is ever actu- 
ally imagined. 

This attempt to analyze and conceive egoism as an 
impulse is no longer relevant. A similar attempt, 
undertaken by many philosophers, which proceeds 
from the formula that those acts are egoistic which are 
directed upon personal pleasure as the final goal, fares 
even worse. 

Having determined, in the previous chapter, what 
role pleasure really plays in volition, we recognize at 
once the mistake of this formulation; however, we are 
now in position to form a final judgment regarding it 
by means of the considerations just presented. While, 
according to the view criticized, a volition is called 
egoistic when the idea of a pleasant personal state func- 
tions as motive, according to the neW formula the 
motive must be an idea of pleasure itself. This idea 
of pleasure must itself be pleasant, and egoism would 
thus be the impulse which is directed toward pleasure. 

Do we really mean this by the word "egoism" ? In- 
deed, is there any such thing? Is such a thing con- 
ceivable? If it is probable that in general no given 
personal state is in itself imaginable, this certainly also 
holds of pleasure. For pleasure and pain as emotional 
tones are most intimately connected with the self, with 
the states of the self. Psychologists usually define the 
feelings as contents of the consciousness of "states," in 
opposition, for example, to perceptions as the contents 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 71 

of the consciousness of "objects." And they are almost 
all agreed that there is no such thing as the "idea of a 
feeling." Thus I can only feel pleasure and pain, I 
cannot think or imagine them. It is impossible to 
realize the pleasure that one has, for instance, in the 
sight of a beloved face, except by imagining this face 
itself; then one feels pleasure (generally less than in 
the presence of the corresponding perception) ; a feel- 
ing is itself present, it is lived through, actually had, 
not merely imagined. Moreover, one cannot imagine 
an idea, but can only have it. It appears to me to be 
certain that in the strict sense pleasure and pain are 
unimaginable; in order to intuit them one must each 
time provide them in the original. Similarly, of wrath, 
fury, love, and other affections, there are really no ideas 
possible. The experiences of accompanying phenom- 
ena must serve as substitutes: the outer manner of 
reaction, the characteristic sensations of strain, and so 
forth; in short, all that which is perceptual, and con- 
nected with the affection. For every idea presupposes 
some perception as its pattern. 

If there is no idea of pleasure, then it cannot appear 
as a motive; in other words, there is no impulse toward 
pleasure, and hence egoism cannot be such. Pleasure 
is never desired, but only that which is imagined with 
pleasure. Therefore, it is impossible to assert that ego- 
ism is the impulse directed toward one's personal wel- 
fare and that "personal welfare" can be identified with 
pleasure. 



72 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

7. Egoism and the Impulse of Self-Preservation 

We need mention only one other attempt to treat 
selfishness as an impulse. It is its identification with 
the so-called "impulse of self-preservation," an idea 
that one may find, for example, in Spinoza. First, 
concerning this, we should note that the language of 
everyday use does not justify the equivalence; for we 
try to distinguish clearly between egoism and the ef- 
fort of self-preservation. To begin with, not every act 
of self-preservation is considered "egoistic," for ex- 
ample, the normal care of one's health, the avoidance 
of unnecessary danger, defense of one's life against 
robbers; and, in the second place, not all "egoistic" con- 
duct is directed toward self-preservation. The egoist 
thinks much more of enjoyment than of life, and can, 
through inconsiderate pursuit of the former, very well 
put the latter in jeopardy; indeed, one can think of 
suicide proceeding from egoism, for example, in the 
cases in which a life, whose preservation is of the great- 
est importance for others, is wilfully ended because of 
ennui. 

These facts make it impossible to conceive egoism as 
an impulse of self-preservation. But even if a close 
connection existed between the two notions, egoism 
would not thereby become an "impulse"; for one can- 
not speak of an effort of self-preservation as an impulse 
in our sense. This would only be possible if there were 
an intuitive idea of "self-preservation," which because 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 73 

of its pleasure tone would incite certain kinds of con- 
duct. But obviously "self-preservation" is such an ab- 
stract concept that there is certainly no intuitive emo- 
tional idea of it. Actually, the modes of behavior 
which are considered typical expressions of the effort 
of self-preservation are to be considered manifestations 
rather of a fear of death or destruction, and this too 
is not a simple impulse (because "destruction" also is 
a much too general concept), but a collective name for 
a class of dispositions to react with powerful unpleasant 
feelings in certain dangerous situations. 

8. Egoism as Inconsiderateness 

Inevitably, then, we arrive at the conclusion that ego- 
ism is not an impulse, and that to this word corre- 
sponds a complicated meaning. This meaning is of 
great importance for ethics, and we must inquire into 
it further. 

Following the preceding considerations, we need no 
longer pursue the possibility that "egoism," although 
not a single impulse, might mean a common property 
of a series of different impulses. For these considera- 
tions showed us that the mere striving for something, 
the fact that some idea awakens feelings of pleasure is 
not itself enough to constitute "selfishness." We can- 
not, for example, separate out a group of "sensual im- 
pulses" and call these egoistic. (This has often been 
tried, apparently in the hope of finding in sense-pleas- 
ure the readiest substitute for the difficult concept of 



74 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

"personal welfare.") In this connection one always 
thinks of hunger, thirst, and the sexual impulse. And 
in fact one cannot extend the concept of sensual desire 
much further without obtaining wholly indeterminate 
boundaries, since the senses play an important role in 
the other impulses, too, as in the aesthetic ones; and 
the distinction between "interested" and "disinterested" 
pleasure, as Kant wished to formulate it is, I think, in- 
capable of being completely carried out. Every man 
has these so-called sensual inclinations, and could not 
exist without them; but they do not make an egoist 
of him, not even in the moments when they determine 
his action. In eating, drinking and procreating a man 
is far from conducting himself egoistically. 

Something altogether different is needed in addition. 
Selfishness is neither an impulse nor a collective name 
for a group of impulses. The satisfaction of an im- 
pulse is never in itself egoistic; but only the manner in 
which this occurs, only the circumstances in which it 
takes place can give rise to that fact which we wish 
to characterize by the disparaging word "egoism." 

And thus we attain the important insight (perhaps 
first expressed in the ethics of Bishop Butler) that by 
the word "selfishness" a fairly complex fact is desig- 
nated, namely, the existence of a certain relative strength 
between the inclinations. For when we charge some- 
one with egoism we do not blame him for the presence 
of a certain impulse, as when we accuse him of envy or 
cruelty, but we condemn him because under the given 
conditions just this impulse led to action; we would 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 75 

have demanded the omission of this act, or the commis- 
sion of another. However, he would have been able 
to act otherwise only if some other inclination had been 
present to repress the original impulse and direct voli- 
tion toward another goal; but such opposing inclina- 
tions were absent or too weak with respect to the first. 
Which are these impulses whose absence or weakness 
lead to selfish conduct? They are obviously the "so- 
cial impulses." These are the impulses whose essence 
consists in the fact that the perception or imagination 
of modes of behavior or states of fellow men leads 
directly to feelings of pleasure or pain. One may 
well describe them as the altruistic impulses, but this 
will entail an asymmetry in the use of the words "ego- 
ism" and "altruism." A man in whom the altruistic 
inclinations are absent has no immediate interest in 
the weal and woe of other creatures; their joys and 
sorrows, even their existence, are indifferent to him so 
long as he is not required indirectly (that is, by the ex- 
citement of his other impulses) to take them into con- 
sideration. And this is in fact the peculiar character- 
istic of the egoist inconsiderateness. It is not the fact 
that he follows his special impulses that makes him 
hateful and blamable, but that he does so quite un- 
troubled by the desires and needs of others. When he 
pursues his ends with such inconsiderateness that he 
coldly ignores the joys and sorrows of his neighbors (in 
so for as he sees no connection with his own aims), when 
he remains deaf and blind and cold to the happiness 
and misfortune of his neighbor, then we consider him 



76 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

to be an egoist, and frequently so even when otherwise 
we do not in the least condemn his aims. 

Thus, in principle, we discover the nature of that tend- 
ency which we call by the reproachful name of selfish- 
ness; it is constituted by inconsiderateness, which is 
based upon the fact that among the existing inclina- 
tions the altruistic ones are relatively underdeveloped. 
It would, obviously, be vain labor to try to determine 
separately and exactly the relationship of impulses that 
must hold in order to designate a man as egoistic, or 
to ascribe to him a definite degree of this quality. Here 
we cannot distinguish strictly or discriminate exactly, 
not to speak of measuring, for we have to do through- 
out with vague concepts. In ethical statements we 
never get beyond relative, vague, qualitative compar- 
isons. It is necessary to keep this in mind so that we 
may not hunt for an apparent exactness at the wrong 
place, which can lead to nothing but delusion. 

9. Moral Condemnation of Egoism 

Why have we troubled so much with determining 
the meaning of the concept of egoism? Because we 
have here a suitable starting point from which we can 
ascertain the true meaning of moral predicates in gen- 
eral. 

Egoistic volition is for us the example of immoral 
volition, volition that is condemned. To condemn an 
act means always to desire that it should not occur. 
And the desire that something should not happen means 



WHAT IS EGOISM? 77 

(according to our earlier explanation of desire) that 
the idea of its happening is unpleasant. Thus, when 
we ask, "Why do I condemn egoistic behavior?" the 
question is identical in meaning with, "Why does the 
idea of such behavior cause me pain?" To find an an- 
swer to this is very easy. It is, "Because the selfishness 
of another actually causes me pain directly." For its 
essence is just inconsiderateness with respect to the in- 
terests of fellow men, the pursuit of personal ends at 
the cost of those of others. But since I belong among 
these others, I am in danger of suffering a restriction 
of my joys and an increase of my sorrows at the hands 
of the egoist, at least in so far as his conduct enters into 
my sphere of life. Where this is not the case it affects 
at least the feelings and lives of our fellow men, and 
I share in these by virtue of my social impulses; because 
of them I feel as my own pain the damage done to 
others by the egoist. His conduct means in every in- 
stance, either directly or indirectly, the increase of my 
feelings of pain; no wonder, then, that the idea of his 
behavior possesses that emotional tone which expresses 
itself in condemnation and censure. Each member of 
human society will, on an average, react to egoism with 
the same feelings for the same reasons. The blame and 
condemnation with which they oppose it is nothing but 
moral censure, moral condemnation. Thus the moral 
valuation made of selfishness appears to be the natural 
emotional reaction of society to the influence it is ex- 
posed to by egoistic persons. 
In any case this is the simplest explanation, and if it 



78 WHAT IS EGOISM? 

accounts for all relevant facts we shall not only have to 
retain it, but also we shall have to try to extend this same 
explanation to all other moral valuations. 

We have just expressed the view that the explanation 
of the moral appraisement of egoism can be carried 
through in an analogous manner for all moral valua- 
tions. If this opinion proves to be universally valid 
we shall be able to express the following law as a fun- 
damental ethical insight: the moral valuations of modes 
of behavior and characters are nothing but the emo- 
tional reactions with which human society responds to 
the pleasant and sorrowful consequences that, accord- 
ing to the average experience, proceed from those modes 
of behavior and characters. 

I consider this proposition to be correct. The fol- 
lowing observations are devoted to its proof. 



CHAPTER IV 
What Is the Meaning of "Moral?" 

i. The Morality of Demand and the Morality 
of Desire 

The single example of a moral value-judgment 
which has thus far concerned us was the moral con- 
demnation of egoism. We have taken this concept in 
the sense in which it implies moral disapprobation, 
and have determined its meaning more exactly. Our 
discussion was begun at this point purposely, because 
for our currently prevailing morality the criticism of 
selfishness is typical. 

It is characteristic of this morality that all of its most 
important demands end in the repression of personal 
desires in favor of the desires of fellow men. These 
demands require considerateness, reject egoism, and 
appear to range themselves against the self, in favor of 
the other person. (According to Fichte all immoral- 
ity has its basis in "selfishness.") Our morality is es- 
sentially a morality of renunciation. Among religions 
it is Christianity and Buddhism in particular whose 
moral precepts are of this character. In the Mosaic 
decalogue, likewise, curbing of the self is the chief 

79 



8o WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

postulate, and this finds its external expression in the 
negative form of most of the commandments: "Thou 
shalt not," "thou shalt not." The positive com- 
mandments (the third and fourth) demand consid- 
eration for the desires of God and parents. It is a 
morality of obedience. In Christianity the emphasis 
is on positive altruistic behavior, as opposed to selfish- 
ness: "Thou shalt love thy neighbor." 

The constant theme of this morality is consideration 
of others; in its precepts, too, our fellow men and so- 
ciety speak and express their desires and needs; they 
tell us how it is desired that we should act. Hence the 
demand character of this system, which Kant held to 
be the essence of morality. The morality of ancient 
classical times, the Socratic, Stoic, and Epicurean, is 
quite different. Its fundamental question is not, 
"What is demanded of me ?" but, "Hovij must I live to 
be happy?" It has its source in the desires of the indi- 
vidual, of the agent himself, and thus bears the charac- 
ter not of demand but of desire. We could ascribe 
autonomy to it, in opposition to the heteronomy of the 
morality of demand, if another meaning did not usu- 
ally lay claim to this expression. The ancient classical 
ethics is not an ethics of self-limitation, but of self- 
realization, not of renunciation, but of affirmation. 
The subjugation of selfishness is so little characteristic 
of it that, subsequently, objections were often made 
against its egoistic tendencies. But these objections are 
unjust, for condemnation of egoism and consideration 
for others and society (for example, the state) are pres- 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 81 

cnt in it with all desirable distinctness, although usu- 
ally not in the form of an original, ultimate obligation, 
but as a derivative demand. 

In general it should be noted that judgments of par- 
ticular acts in different moral systems deviate very 
little from each other. Base acts (at least within one's 
own society) are everywhere detested, and magnanim- 
ity everywhere praised; only the spirit or state of mind 
from which the valuation proceeds seems different, 
that is, the valuation appears to be justified differently. 

The search which we begin here for the meaning of 
the word "moral" would constitute, according to the 
considerations of Chapter I, a general preparatory task 
of ethics; and the systematic arrangements of all the 
cases of its use, in different times among different peo- 
ple, circles, and circumstances, would lead to a system 
of norms (or to several) upon which the causal expla- 
nation of ethics would have to base itself. But we 
renounce from the outset any attempt to develop such 
a system; we have passed at once to its peak, where 
the most general formulation of the concept of "moral 
good" is to be found. We do this because we desire 
to deal with the most general ethical problems, and not 
to concern ourselves with special moral valuations. 
This shortened procedure is possible because the tran- 
sition from the lower to the higher levels of the system 
is, in practice, always necessary and constantly made; 
so that we may presuppose the greater part of the task 
to be done, even though the results do not lie before 
us carefully formulated. Thus we see how little the 



82 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF " 

theory of norms, to which this formulation belongs, 
contributes to actual ethical knowledge. 

An essential difference between the morality of de- 
mand and the morality of desire, between the ethics 
of self-limitation and that of self-assertion, is not hard 
to find: at bottom there lies a different concept of the 
good. With Socrates the word "good" appears to have 
a unified meaning; in the Platonic dialogues there is 
talk of good shoes, a good cobbler, a good citizen, and 
so forth, without any difference in meaning being ap- 
parent. In Chapter I we considered the fact that the 
word "good" is also used in an extra-moral sense, and 
suggested that moral good is a species of the universal 
genus "good," being distinguished from this latter by 
certain specific differences, but having the most im- 
portant properties in common with it. Socrates and 
most of the ancients never doubted this, and considered 
the common element so exclusively that they failed al- 
together to inquire into the specific properties of the 
"moral" good. Aristotle did so and determined the 
specific difference very nicely when he said, When we 
call anyone a good cobbler or a good pilot or a good 
architect, we use the word in an extra-moral sense; but 
when we call him a good man, then we use the word 
with its moral meaning. 

However, the Aristotelian formulation is no more 
than a hint for us, which we improve and perfect by 
proposing the following, in order to express the actual 
meaning of the word: 

The word "good" has a moral sense when (i) it 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 83 

refers to human decisions, and (2) expresses an appro- 
bation by human society. 

In order to explain the words "approve" and "society" 
we add that when we say: the decision of an individual 
is "approved by society," this means: is desired by a 
large majority of those persons with whom the indi- 
vidual comes into contact through word or deed. It 
is essential to these statements that they be vague. 

For the Greeks, originally, "good" meant nothing 
but what is desired, that is, in our language, what is 
imagined with pleasure (fjficovri); therefore ancient 
ethics is for the most part a theory of pleasure, hedon- 
ism. Even today "good" means, in the most general 
sense, the same thing: a thing is good if it is as one de- 
sires it. But from this, under the influence of our 
morality of renunciation, the narrower meaning of the 
morally good has arisen. Good in this sense means 
merely what is desired by human society, something 
which confronts the individual as an alien desire, which 
may or may not coincide with personal desires. The 
desires of others are the demands which they make of 
individuals. Hence an ethics which concerns the good 
in this sense alone is not a theory of pleasure, but of 
what is obligatory; it is "deontology." 

The ethical theory of the Greeks was based on de- 
sires and not upon demands, for the Greek could not 
imagine otherwise than that the individual himself 
must be his own moral lawgiver; moral norms were 
of course, then, as in every community, also formulated 
as commands. Because of the fact that modern ethics 



84 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

makes central the facts of demand and renunciation, it 
runs the risk of putting senseless questions and going 
wholly astray; on the other hand, its path leads nearer 
to certain fundamental insights of great importance for 
the understanding of ethical matters. For, in fact, in 
the concept of renunciation or in the emphasis upon 
altruism lies a hint leading toward the most essential 
point of morality. 

2. Moral Demands as Expressions of the 
Desires of Society 

For us it is clear that there must be no insuperable 
opposition between an ethics as theory of pleasure and 
as theory of moral obligation; or, as we may put it, 
between the theory of goods or pleasures and the theory 
of duty; but the latter will be grounded by and de- 
duced from the former. For, according to our concep- 
tion, the moral demands or duties go back in the last 
analysis to the feelings of pleasure and pain of individ- 
uals, since they are nothing but the average, prevailing 
desires of society. It is, of course, comprehensible that 
in practice the morality of self-realization should ar- 
rive also at demands of renunciation, which appear to 
be necessary means to the end of happiness. Thus the 
ideals of the wise man and the saint approach one an- 
other; performance of duty appears as the condition of 
self-realization. 

If, on the other hand, the precepts of renunciation 
were something final and absolute, as their exponents 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 85 

would have us believe, and not derivable from any de- 
sires, there would be no bridge between happiness and 
virtue, there would be enmity or complete indifference. 
If a virtuous person should ever be happy this would 
be the merest accident, and if he were always happy 
this would be an incomprehensible miracle. A con- 
nection between the performance of duty and happi- 
ness exists, a reconciliation of the ethics of renunciation 
with the ethics of joy is possible, the agreement of their 
valuations in individual practical cases is explicable, 
only if moral commands themselves rise out of human 
needs and desires. We affirmed that this is actually 
the case (p. 78) when we formulated the hypothesis 
that the moral precepts are nothing but the expressions 
of the desires of human society; in the moral valuation 
of definite acts or dispositions as good or bad is mir- 
rored only the measure of joy or sorrow that society 
expects to receive from those acts or dispositions. 
Thus we see how very important is the validity of the 
proposition made at the end of the preceding chapter; 
let us now devote ourselves to its proof. 

In the thesis with whose proof we are concerned 
there are, strictly, two different assertions to be distin- 
guished: first, that, in fact, whatever is morally ap- 
proved does promise to increase the joys of human so- 
ciety; and second, that this effect expected by society 
is really the only reason why it is approved. It is clear 
that these assertions are to be distinguished carefully. 
It could be that everything called "morally good" by 
society did in fact serve to benefit society, and vice 



86 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

versa, but that the reason for calling it good and ap- 
proving it lay elsewhere. The case (of which we con- 
vinced ourselves in the discussion of egoism) is as fol- 
lows: the determination of the complete extensional 
equality of the concepts "morally good" and "what ad- 
vances the pleasure of society" leads any unbiased per- 
son to believe also in their intensional equality; and 
special opposing reasons would be necessary to make 
this belief appear to be unjustified. Without such op- 
posing reasons the inference to the identity of both con- 
cepts is simply obvious in terms of the method of em- 
pirical knowledge. If, in addition, we should succeed 
in deducing from psychological laws that behavior 
which is favorable to the genesis of pleasure in the 
human community must be approved by it, while what 
increases sorrow necessarily is subjected to its disap- 
proval (as we have seen in the case of egoism), then 
no one will be able to upset our conviction that this 
approbation and disapprobation is nothing but "moral" 
approbation and disapprobation. 

Accordingly, the proof of our thesis would involve 
two steps: (i) to show that in fact the moral predicate 
"good" is bestowed only upon such behavior as prom- 
ises the social group an increase in pleasure, and (2) 
to refute the reasons which lead many philosophers to 
believe that, despite the foregoing fact, the predicate 
"good" means something different from promising an 
increase of happiness or a decrease of sorrow for so- 
ciety. For if these reasons do not hold good the valid- 
ity of the second assertion is self-evident. 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 87 

3. Critique of Utilitarianism 

The first thesis which we have to defend and which 
asserts that "good" is what tends to further the happi- 
ness of society bears a special name in ethics; it is the 
moral principle of "Utilitarianism." It has this name 
because it says, roughly, "Good is what is useful (utile) 
to human society." The formulation of our thesis is 
perhaps not unessentially different from that which it 
received in the classical systems of Utilitarianism. 
These systems say (at least according to their sense) : 
"The good is what brings the greatest possible happi- 
ness to society." We express it more carefully: "In 
human society, that is called good which is believed to 
bring the greatest happiness." 

Is it necessary to point out the difference between 
these formulae? In the first it might seem (and this 
was actually the opinion of certain champions of the 
utilitarian principle) that it contains the absolute de- 
mand that everyone must set as the final goal of his ac- 
tion the happiness of the greatest number; while the 
second merely wishes to express, as a fact, the demands 
which society actually makes of its members. 

Whoever advocates a demand must make its content 
as precise as possible. Hence the Utilitarian who seeks 
a moral principle cannot be satisfied with the vague 
statement that good is what furthers the "happiness of 
human society," but must seek to make this latter con- 
cept more exact. The inevitable attempt to attain a 



88 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

more exact determination led Bentham to the famous 
Utilitarian formula that those acts are morally good 
which under given circumstances have the "greatest 
happiness of the greatest number of human beings" 
(or living creatures in general?) as their consequences. 
A few words can show the utter inapplicability of this 
formula. In the first place, the results of every act are 
simply incalculable, for they stretch on into time in- 
definitely; and even the resultant events of the near 
future cannot be predicted, for they depend more or 
less upon "chance," that is, slightly differing acts can 
have extraordinarily different effects. In the second 
place, "the greatest happiness of the greatest number" 
is a senseless conjunction of words, which can indeed 
be given a meaning by means of certain conventions, 
but such a conventional meaning, because of its arbi- 
trariness, will not express the thought which the for- 
mula would like to express. Furthermore, Utilitarian- 
ism did not attempt to find a meaningful convention, 
but believed that these words had a clear meaning, pre- 
supposing that one can speak of the pleasure of differ- 
ent persons as of something comparable in magnitude. 
And this is the fundamental mistake. If it has been 
shown (p. 40) that even the individual feelings of pleas- 
ure are not amenable to quantitative comparison, then 
this holds even more of the vague concept of happiness, 
which is difficult to construct in any way except as a 
sort of conjunction or "summation" of feelings of pleas- 
ure. The Utilitarian would find himself confronted 
by such questions as these; "How should I act when 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 89 

the circumstances are such that my conduct can lead 
either to a certain definite amount of happiness in each 
of four persons, or double that amount for each of 
two?" The absurdity of such a question is apparent; 
but the Utilitarian cannot avoid them; his formula 
makes sense only if he can tell us exactly what it means 
to say, "A is three-and-a-half times as happy as B." 

We are in a better situation with respect to this mat- 
ter than are the followers of Bentham; for we do not 
wish, as they do, to establish a formula or a command. 
We do not desire to construct a concept of the "good" 
which we should have to define exactly but we 
want only a simple determination of what, in human 
society, is held to be good. Thus we are not required 
to state of what the highest good consists, and which 
modes of behavior lead to it; we determine only that 
men believe, on the average, and are in wide agreement, 
that certain modes of behavior lead to the greatest com- 
mon good. The reasons for this belief do not at pres- 
ent interest us, and whether they are good reasons, 
whether they are valid, we are not required to know 
by our formulation of the question. 

One other important observation is here included: 
every philosopher, including the Utilitarian, knows of 
course that no one can predict the results of conduct 
with complete assurance, that this is always in part an 
effect of chance. If, despite this, Utilitarianism or any 
other, ethical theory apparently judges the moral value 
of a decision by its results, this can only be the average 
or probable result. It has always been evident that the 



90 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

decisions (the "intentions") alone are the objects of 
moral judgment. Therefore it is incorrect to distin- 
guish, as is often done, between an "ethics of intention" 
and an "ethics of result." There has never been an 
"ethics of result." 

4. The Good Appears to Society as the Useful 

In order to show that that is considered "morally 
good" which, according to the opinion of society, is to 
its advantage (pleasure increasing) we must establish 
that moral valuations of modes of behavior change 
when the structure of human society changes, and that 
this change takes place in a manner which is inevitable 
if the opinion entertained regarding the conditions of 
the welfare of society is determinative of that valua- 
tion. For if it appears that the actual alteration of 
moral valuations corresponds to changes of certain 
states of, and opinions in, the community, then we may 
with certainty assume that these states and views repre- 
sent the basis upon which the valuations rest. 

This is actually the case. Ethnography and history 
agree in teaching that the diversities in moral precepts, 
which change from people to people and epoch to 
epoch, always correspond to diversities in what, under 
the prevailing circumstances, is favorable to the wel- 
fare of the society; or rather to what is so considered. 
We here point to a single set of facts in which this 
alteration shows itself especially clearly, namely, the 
change in moral views correlated with the increase in 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 91 

size of the community in which they prevail. In such 
times and places in which the community of persons 
(determined by their instinctive drawing together in 
the common struggle for existence) extends over only 
a small tribe, a clan, or a family, the moral rules that 
are recognized demand consideration only for the 
members of the group itself; with respect to those who 
stand outside it there is no ethical obligation. Often, 
indeed, everyone who does not belong to the group is 
eo If so considered an enemy, an outlaw. It is well 
known that in primitive tribes under certain circum- 
stances the murder of a member of a neighboring tribe 
is considered to be as great a moral service as the mur- 
der of a member of one's own tribe would be a crime. 
And these valuations are not merely proclaimed ex- 
ternally and recognized by the individual because of 
the application of sanctions, but appear to him as the 
voice of his own conscience, which commands him 
with incontrovertible authority and terrible emotional 
force (for, obviously, the conscience is formed by ex- 
ternal suggestion, whose whisperings resound in the 
mind as through a powerful trumpet). We find a 
famous example of this in the writings of Darwin, 
who tells of the dreadful pangs of conscience suffered 
by an African savage who had neglected to take re- 
venge on a neighboring tribe for injury done him by 
some sort of magic. A missionary had impressed upon 
him that it is a great sin to murder a man, and the sav- 
age did not dare to carry out the act of vengeance. But 
the consciousness of his neglected "duty" oppressed 



92 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

him so much that he went about disturbed and upset, 
rejected food and drink, and could enjoy nothing. In 
short, he showed all the signs of an "evil conscience." 
Finally he could bear it no longer, stole away secretly, 
slew a member of the other clan and returned light of 
heart: he had performed his duty and pacified his con- 
science by means of the murder. Would anyone wish 
to deny that the feelings of the savage are "real" pangs 
of conscience, as these are felt by a moral civilized 
man? If so, we can only attribute this to prejudice, 
for one will search in vain for the difference. Of 
course, in general, the European feels scruples of con- 
science under different circumstances, namely, after 
committing murder, and not when the deed has been 
omitted; but even this does not hold without excep- 
tions. For in war the great majority of men consider 
the destruction of their enemies to benot only not for- 
bidden, but actually a moral obligation. 

The difference between the moral views of the Afri- 
can and a modern European in this respect is explained 
by the fact that the group which furnishes the standard 
for the formation of those views is for the savage the 
tribe or clan, but for the civilized man is extended to 
include a whole nation or state; and further upon the 
fact that the state of enmity is enduring for the one, 
and transitory for the other. And if to a philosopher 
war between two nations appears quite as immoral as 
a conflict between two armed bands of a single nation, 
this is because for him the human society which makes 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 93 

the moral laws has extended over the whole world: in 
his conscience re-echoes the voice of all humanity. 

What appears here in a single example holds univer- 
sally. The content of the moral precepts that hold in 
a community, and that are taken over completely into 
the moral consciousness of its members, depends en- 
tirely upon its living conditions, upon its size and 
strength, its relation to the surrounding world, its 
civilization, customs, and religious ideas. I forego the 
introduction of further evidence, and refer to Wester- 
marck's Origin and Development of Moral Ideas, and 
to Spencer's Data of Ethics, which contain rich mate- 
rial. We see in the dependence of moral valuations 
upon the states of human society a sure indication that 
the content of morality is actually determined by so- 
ciety. It also seems to be the moral lawgiver concern- 
ing whom (according to Chapter I) ethics must inquire. 
We shall soon see whether this result is final or re- 
quires a more thorough proof. 

5. The Formulation of Moral Laws Ta\es Place 
According to the Utilitarian Principle 

Closer examination of the content of moral precepts 
shows that the community anticipates a furtherance of 
its welfare from their observance. It is not necessary 
to prove this in particular cases, since it is generally not 
disputed. For whatever be one's opinion regarding 
the nature and origin of moral rules, it is generally be- 



94 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

licved that society is benefited if all of its members obey 
them. 1 For the confirmation of this we point out that 
everywhere the laws promulgated by the state (which 
are not, indeed, identical with moral laws, but which 
still should represent their essential minimum) are 
thought out with no other purpose in mind than to 
advance the general welfare. It is inconceivable that 
any modern lawmaker could give any other justifica- 
tion for the proposal of a law than this utilitarian one 
(the lawmaker always appears as a utilitarian because 
he says in justification of his proposals, "They are use- 
ful to society," not, "Society considers them to be use- 
ful"). Whenever legislatures or parliaments discuss 
a law or precept the discussion centers solely on the 
question, "Which decision will be most useful to so- 
ciety ?" No one asks, "Which decision is moral or has 
the greatest moral value?" It may happen that in de- 
bate mention is made of the "honor" of the community 
or the "holiness" of an institution is stressed, but such 
arguments are never directed against the increase of 
happiness, but are introduced only when it is silently 
assumed that the observance of them does not stand in 
opposition to society's striving for happiness. The law- 
makers have thus the unenviable task of deciding what 
in fact will be most advantageous to the welfare of the 
state or humanity. And they do not despair of the 
solution of this task only because they can, generally, 



1 An exception is found in Mandeville's famous The Fable of 
the Bees or Private Vices Public Benefits. 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 95 

replace it by an easier one, namely: to hinder what 
would directly injure society. In so doing they make 
the (not self-evident) assumption that the avoidance of 
immediate injury is likewise the path to the greatest 
general welfare. 

What holds of the formulated laws, of legality, also 
holds for the moral views of society, for the moral code: 
the conviction prevails that moral behavior furthers the 
general happiness, indeed that it is the necessary if not 
the sufficient condition of that happiness. The oppos- 
ing view has been held occasionally by a few individ- 
uals, but that need not surprise us, for there is hardly 
any possible opinion regarding matters of human im- 
portance which has not been expressed by someone. 
If many philosophers proclaim with great feeling that 
morality is independent of welfare, by saying that one 
must always do what is "right," even though one sees 
clearly that the greatest harm will result, then such a 
standpoint of "fiat justitia, pcreat mundus" does indeed 
partake of the sublime, which is always the attribute 
of the unconditioned; but no wise guide of a nation's 
destiny would actually assume the responsibility of act- 
ing according to that prescription. And to the blame 
he would thus receive from the absolutist philosopher 
would be opposed the praise that a grateful society 
would bestow upon him for not having sacrificed its 
well-being in favor of an abstract principle. Society 
would unquestionably consider his behavior to be 
morally good. Of course the divergent attitude of the 
philosopher must also be made intelligible; we must 



96 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

understand how he arrives at his approbations and dis- 
approbations. We shall deal with this question in a 
moment. 

6. Conclusions 

By means of considerations like the foregoing we ar- 
rive at the following results: 

(1) The meaning of the word "good" (that is, 
what is considered as moral) is determined by the opin- 
ion of society, which is the lawgiver formulating moral 
demands. Since, with respect to a social group, there 
can only be an average or prevailing opinion, one can- 
not raise an objection to this view based upon the fact 
that there are deviations from some of the usual norms. 

(2) The content of the concept "good" is deter- 
mined in such a way by society thati all and only those 
modes of behavior are subsumed under it which so- 
ciety believes are advantageous to its welfare and pres- 
ervation (which is indeed the presupposition of its wel- 
fare). 

Considering propositions (i) and (2) together we 
deduce from them, or consider the assertion justified, 
that: 

(3) The moral demands are established by society 
only because the fulfillment of these demands appears 
to be useful to it. 

We can also formulate proposition (3) by saying, 
"The good is good only because it is considered by so- 
ciety to be useful"; and in the last analysis this means: 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 97 

considered to be conducive to pleasure. Or also thus: 
the material meaning of the word "moral" exhausts 
itself in denoting what, according to the prevailing 
opinion in society, is advantageous (its formal meaning 
consists in being demanded by society). 

It is clear that a logical connection must exist be- 
tween (i) and (2); for the reason that moral behavior 
is demanded must somehow or other lie in the nature 
of morality, and if this nature is completely given by 
proposition (2) it must contain the grounds of (i). 
But this connection need not be as direct and simple 
as proposition (3) would make out. It might be that 
even though morality were undoubtedly advantageous 
to the general welfare it would be approved upon other 
grounds. In other words, it might be that the idea of 
moral behavior did not owe its pleasure-tone to belief 
in the usefulness of such behavior to society, but that 
this joy had some other origin, for example, in a "con- 
science," whose presence expressed itself in certain spe- 
cial feelings and ideas (or actually was composed of 
them) and whose origin constituted a special problem. 
We mention for example the metaphysical hypothesis 
that divine insight furnished man with a conscience in 
order to implant in him a motive of moral behavior, 
such behavior as would be (again according to the 
divine insight) in the last analysis most useful to him. 
We require no such hypotheses, however, for what they 
would explain is explained for us by known psycholog- 
ical relationships. As soon, that is, as one feels himself 
to be a member of society and feels his own good and 



98 WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 

evil to be bound up with that of others, the idea of a 
happy community must become a pleasant idea; and 
this emotional tone extends itself according to known 
laws to all modes of behavior which he supposes are ad- 
vantageous to the welfare of society. In other words: 
a social man desires that his environment be happy and 
unendangered, desires all modes of behavior which are 
conducive to this, values, approves and commends 
them, and condemns and persecutes contrary conduct. 
All these are only different ways of saying the same 
thing. 

Of course the processes whereby the general welfare 
becomes a pleasant goal are complicated; and one must 
not, above all, attribute too great a role to rational in- 
sight. For even if men thought much more and more 
accurately than they usually do about the consequences 
of action, such considerations would have but little 
influence in the realm of feelings. And these processes 
take place chiefly in this realm, in the absence of subtle 
thinking. But here we can appeal to a general prin- 
ciple which has otherwise proved to be valid in psy- 
chology and biology, namely, that the result of organic, 
unconscious, or instinctive processes is the same as 
would have resulted from a rational calculation. This 
principle is closely connected with that general "pur- 
posiveness" of the organic world which is usually called 
"teleology." If one would trace the development of 
these psychic processes, one must keep specially in mind 
that they have their origin in concrete situations, and 
that such abstract concepts as the "general welfare" are 



WHAT IS THE MEANING OF "MORAL?" 99 

quite useless in the formation of powerful centers of 
feeling. In what follows we shall have occasion to 
offer contributions to the psychology of moral valua- 
tion, but at present we are satisfied to see at least the 
path along which the human spirit necessarily arrives 
at the praise and approbation of "moral" behavior. 

With this we have not of course strictly shown that 
the valuation of morality, which we have deduced, is 
actually moral valuation (that it does not merely con- 
stitute the basis of a certain type of value of the moral 
life, a "utility value," but constitutes the whole of moral 
valuation); but we shall, according to our program, 
consider it certain and thus hold our proposition (3) 
(p. 97) to be true if we also succeed in showing that 
the most important attempt in ethics to conceive the 
nature of moral valuation differently cannot be carried 
out. Our only reasons for considering this attempt at 
all are historical; apart from them, considered factu- 
ally, what has been adduced appears to us to con- 
tain a sufficient foundation of our thesis, however in- 
exhaustive it may be. But since, especially at present, 
many philosophical writers represent a very different 
point of view, we turn to the critical considerations, 
which we proposed as the second stage in the proof of 
our thesis (p. 86). 



CHAPTER V 

Are There Absolute Values? 
i. The Theory of Objective Values 

The opinion we have to examine may best be ex- 
pressed negatively in the assertion that the moral value 
of a disposition cannot in any way be grounded in 
feelings of pleasure. Value is something wholly inde- 
pendent of our feelings, something pertaining to valu- 
able objects, in a definite amount and degree, quite 
independently of the way in which we react emotion- 
ally to them, and to whether anyone acknowledges the 
value or not. Pleasure, to be sure, is a value, but only 
one among many, and obviously not the highest. 
Often it is admitted that the valuable produces feelings 
of pleasure in the observer, but this fact is supposed 
to have nothing to do with the essence of the value, 
but is, in a sense, accidental. I say "in a sense," for 
many who hold this view do not wish, I believe, to 
deny that perhaps the generation of feelings of pleasure 
in the presence of something valuable is a natural law, 
and that a causal connection exists between the two. 
But they say that this is quite unessential, that if it were 
not so it would make no difference to the value of the 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 101 

valuable thing; this value would exist even if the law 
of nature read: "The idea of the valuable thing is quite 
indifferent to all men," or "extremely annoying" or 
"horrible." 

The role played in ethics by this theory of the ob- 
jectivity of value is too well known to require one to 
dwell upon it. It proclaims the existence of a system 
of values, which, like the Platonic ideas, constitutes a 
realm independent of actuality, and in which is exhib- 
ited an essential order of such a nature that the values 
compose a hierarchy arranged according to higher and 
lower. And its relation to reality is only established 
by the moral command, which runs, approximately, 
"Act so that the events or things produced by your ac- 
tions are as valuable as possible." 

The criticism which we make of this view is ex- 
tremely simple. Its main lines are prescribed by our 
philosophical method. We ask first, "What does the 
word value mean ?" or, which comes to the same thing, 
"What is the meaning of an assertion which ascribes a 
certain value to any object?" This question can be an- 
swered only by stating the method of determining the 
truth of a value judgment; that is, one must state ex- 
actly under what empirical conditions the proposition 
"This object is valuable" is true, and under what con- 
ditions it is false. If one cannot state these conditions, 
then the proposition is a meaningless combination of 
words. 

Thus we ask the philosopher, "How do you recog- 
nize the value of an object?" And since no one is 



102 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

here to answer (the author writes these lines in deep 
seclusion on the rocky coast of the Adriatic Sea) we 
shall search for the usual and possible answers together. 

2. Pleasure as the Criterion of Objective Value 

(a.) In case anyone (I do not know whether there 
is any such person) should answer that values are in 
fact to be recognized only in feelings of pleasure which 
valuable things awaken in us, and that also the rank of 
the value is disclosed to us only by means of the inten- 
sity of the corresponding feeling, and that in addition 
there is no other criterion of the existence and rank 
of the value, yet that nevertheless the value does not 
consist in the activity of producing pleasure, but is some- 
thing else, then we must accuse him of logical non- 
sense. However, we do it very unwillingly, for factu- 
ally we do not find anything to dispute regarding the 
consequences of his theory. The nonsense consists in 
the fact that with respect to all verifiable consequences 
his view is in complete agreement with our own (that 
"value" is nothing but a name for the dormant pleasure 
possibilities of the valuable object), but despite this he 
asserts that they are different. The proposition that 
"to be valuable" means something quite different from 
"to bring pleasure" presupposes that there is some prop- 
erty which belongs only to the valuable, and not to the 
pleasure-bringing: the assertion becomes senseless if 
pleasure-producing is the only characteristic of the valu- 
able. If we should peacefully grant the existence of 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 103 

"objective" value, this would be nothing but a content- 
less addition. Everything would remain as if it were 
essentially subjective, for we would be able to make an 
assertion about it only because of its pleasure conse- 
quences, as is also the case according to our own view. 
I add that from the criticized standpoint every feel- 
ing of pleasure must be interpreted as the sign of an 
objective value. If this held only in certain cases, but 
not in others, we should have to be able to say how the 
cases differed, and this would require a new criterion 
and the rejection of the original one, which was simply 
pleasure. The advocate of objective values requires, 
then, an empirical criterion of value which cannot be 
identical with pleasure. 

3. Objective Criteria of Value? 

(b.) It is natural to want to give an objective cri- 
terion for objective values just as we recognize that an 
animal is a camel by the fact that it has two humps, 
concerning whose existence one can convince himself 
by sense-perception. Sense-perception, whose value as 
a criterion for objectivity has often been disputed in 
epistemological considerations, may be unhesitatingly 
accepted as the judge in our problem, as in all ques- 
tions of daily life. Hence if value could be seen or 
touched as can a camel's hump, ethics would have no 
occasion to discuss its nature. But since this is not so, 
one seeks some objective fact which shall serve as the 
sign of values; and thus one asserts, for example, 



104 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

"Whatever furthers the progress of evolution is valu- 
able," or, "Whatever contributes to the creation of spir- 
itual possessions, for example, works of art, and science, 
is valuable," or similar statements. If I am not mis- 
taken, Wilhelm Wundt in his ethics of objective spir- 
itual products made such an attempt. 

We feel at once what is wrong in such attempts. 
Even if one should succeed in finding a formula which 
fitted everything generally considered to be valuable, 
such a formula, it seems to me, would always appear to 
be circular. Since, for example, what a "spiritual pos- 
session" is, what shall pass for an "upward evolution" 
(as opposed to downward) can only be determined by 
comparison with some standard. It cannot itself deter- 
mine the standard. And if, in order to escape the 
circle, one arbitrarily establishes what should be under- 
stood by spiritual possessions, and things of the sort, 
this determination would be arbitrary; at best one 
would have produced the definition of a concept, based 
upon opinion, which one decides to call "value"; but 
this would not offer a criterion for that which we all 
mean when we use the word "value." 

A fundamental error lies at the basis of the whole 
attempt: it consists in seeking value distinctions in the 
objective facts themselves, without reference to the 
acts of preference and selection, through which alone 
value comes into the world. 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 105 

4. Subjective Criteria of Value 

(c.) Thus there remains no alternative to locating 
the characteristic of value once more in an immediate 
datum and to finding the verification of a proposition 
concerning value in the occurrence of a definite experi- 
ence. Our own criterion is of this sort: the corre- 
sponding experience is simply the feeling of pleasure, 
with which we dealt at length in Chapter II. Accord- 
ing to our opinion the essence of value is completely 
exhausted by it. The opposing theory of absolute 
value cannot, as was shown in (0.), use pleasure as 
the characteristic of value; it must therefore assert the 
occurrence of a wholly different experience which indi- 
cates the existence of a value. This is, in fact, if I un- 
derstand them rightly, the opinion of the noteworthy 
representatives of that theory (of Brentano, and the 
schools following him). According to them we pos- 
sess the capacity of determining the existence of a value 
in much the same way as we are acquainted with the 
presence of a material object by means of perception. 
The role here played by sensation is there taken over by 
a specific experience, which one may call the feeling or 
experience of value, insight, or what not; without of 
course contributing anything to a closer description by 
this naming. In any case, it is always something ulti- 
mate, unanalyzable, which must appear when a value 
judgment is verified, and which one either has or does 



106 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

not have, concerning which therefore there can be no 
further discussion. 

What should we say regarding this theory? In so 
far as it asserts the existence of a special datum of 
consciousness, a "value-experience," any disagreement 
would be senseless, for each person alone can know 
what he experiences. One could simply accept or re- 
ject the theory without any proof. (I personally could 
not accept it, because I do not succeed in distinguish- 
ing between the feeling of pleasure that I have when I 
hear "Don Juan" or see a noble face or read about the 
personality of Abraham Lincoln, and an elementary 
value-experience which, according to that view, must 
first assure me that what gives me joy is also a value.) 

But the theory asserts not only the existence or oc- 
currence of a certain datum of consciousness, but asserts 
further that this informs me of something objective, 
independent of me, that it guarantees for me the exist- 
ence of an absolute value. Does this assertion also 
not require verification? That the criterion is finally 
found in a datum of consciousness, that is, in the realm 
of the "subjective," would not in itself be suspicious; 
for this cannot be avoided, and the example of percep- 
tion teaches us that "subjective" sensations can lead 
us to objects whose independence of us, and objectivity, 
leave for all practical purposes nothing to be desired. 
And in ethics we are concerned with practical knowl- 
edge in the significant sense. But the sensations are 
able to carry out that performance only because they 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 107 

obey very definite laws. The play of perceptions, how- 
ever colorful it be, exhibits a very definite regularity, 
which is expressed by the fact that we are able to make 
verifiable predictions concerning the occurrence of sensa- 
tions. (Regularity does not indicate something objec- 
tive, but is itself objectivity.) If something of the sort 
held of the hypothetical value-feelings, as holds for sensa- 
tions; if value propositions cohered in a consistent sys- 
tem, as do the propositions about perceptions, then value- 
feelings could guarantee objective values. But that is 
not the case. The chaos of valuations is proverbial, and 
there is no hope of putting value theory, ethics and aes- 
thetics, on a level with physics, which would otherwise 
be easy. 

Thus there is no possibility of passing from elemen- 
tary value-experiences to the justification of objective 
absolute values. But if one says that the justification 
lies already contained within the experience itself I can 
only answer that I cannot imagine how such an asser- 
tion would be verified, and that therefore I do not 
know what it means. 

5. Do Value Judgments Have the Validity of Logico- 
Mathematical Propositions? 

(d.) Perhaps many hold the comparison of abso- 
lute values to objective material bodies to be improper, 
because the realm of values seems incomparable to 
gross physical reality. At least we hardly ever find 



io8 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

the analogy to perception drawn. 1 Instead of it, the 
more often, another, that is, the value-propositions are 
compared to the propositions of logic or mathematics, 
and explained by means of them. Neither deals with 
"actual" objects, and the validity of both is of the same 
sort. In the example of logic or mathematics we see 
best, it is supposed, how it is possible, despite the sub- 
jectivity of our experience of evidence, to arrive at what 
is intrinsically valid, absolute, and existing independ- 
ently of any assent or any act of thought or feeling. 
The law of contradiction, and the proposition "Two 
times two equals four" hold simply, whether anyone 
thinks and understands them or not. As here with 
absolute truth, so there with absolute value. The no- 
tion of the objectivity of value is usually made plausible 
in this way (for example, see Nicolai Hartmann, 
Ethics), and generally it remains the only way. 

But, however misleading the argument is, our com- 
parison with perception and its objects is a thousand 
times better, even from the standpoint of the absolutist 
theory. A comparison of any propositions with those 
of logic (which in this context also include the mathe- 
matical) always leads to nonsense; for logic is simply 
not comparable to anything (I hope I may be forgiven 
this somewhat paradoxical statement, but the way in 
which even today the essence of logic is misunderstood 



1 Nevertheless the advocates of absolute values often say that 
these are intuitively known, and their whole outlook is thus 
called "intuitionism," a term in use in particular among English 
writers. But intuition signifies something similar to perception. 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 109 

demands forthright criticism). This is not the place 
for me to expand this point; I note briefly only that the 
propositions of logic and the so-called propositions of 
mathematics are tautologies, or tautology-like forms, 
that is, they express nothing whatever (they are merely 
rules for the transformation of propositions). It is to 
this alone that they owe their absolute (independent 
of every experience) truth, which is really only a mean- 
ingless limiting case of truth. Thus in logic it is not 
as, according to the hopes or statements of the absolut- 
ists, it should be in value theory: namely, that here, 
in some sense, there is a realm of non-actual essences, 
independent of us, but ready to be recognized by us at 
any time, or, perhaps, in the case of values, to be real- 
ized. Logical propositions furnish us with no knowl- 
edge whatever, they express no facts, and teach us 
nothing about what exists in the world, or how any- 
thing does or should behave in the world. Thus if the 
value-propositions were similar to them it would only 
follow that they too were mere tautologies, in all strict- 
ness saying nothing; a consequence that would cer- 
tainly cause us to wish value-propositions to have as 
little similarity as possible to those of logic. Judg- 
ments about value ought to tell us just what is most 
important. 

Tautological propositions can be formed about any- 
thing, and of course, about values. When, for example, 
I write the proposition: "If the value A is greater than 
the value B f then the value B is smaller than the value 
A 9 / I have clearly said in this true proposition nothing 



no ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

at all about values, but have merely shown the equiva- 
lence of two different modes of expression. Indeed the 
proposition is not a proposition of value theory, but 
belongs to logic. And so it is always: whenever I 
come upon a proposition that is true independently of 
every experience, I am in the realm of logic. Only the 
propositions of logic, and all of them, have this charac- 
ter. In this lies their peculiarity, which I spoke of 
before. 

Thus also in a comparison with logic and mathema- 
tics we fail to find a verifiable meaning in propositions 
about absolute values. 

6. The "Absolute Ought" 

(e.) Here it is necessary to bestow a moment's 
attention upon Kant's ethics. His concept of ought 
represents exactly what we have hitherto called "value- 
experience." There was undoubtedly at work in him 
a motive which presumably also plays a role in the 
genesis of modern absolutist theories: the desire to 
elevate ethics entirely above the empirical level. Kant 
showed correctly that the moral precepts have the 
character of demands, and that each appears to us as 
an "ought." But he could not bring himself to leave 
its empirical meaning to this word, in which alone it 
is actually used. Everyone knows this meaning: "I 
ought to do something" never means anything but 
"Someone wants me to do it." And in fact the desire 
of another, directed upon me, is described as an ought 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? in 

only when that person is able to add pressure to his 
desire and thus to reward fulfillment and to punish 
neglect, or at least to point out the natural consequences 
of observance or neglect. This is the meaning the 
word has in daily life; nor does it occur there with any 
other meaning. We call such a desire a command 
(imperative) ; therefore it is of the essence of the im- 
perative to be hypothetical, that is, to presuppose some 
sanction, a promise or a threat. 

According to our own view, developed in the previ- 
ous chapter, the lawgiver who sanctions the moral 
commands is human society, which is furnished with 
the necessary power to command. Thus we may 
rightly say that morality makes demands on men, that 
they ought to behave in certain ways; because we use 
the word "ought" here in exactly the determined em- 
pirical sense. But, as we said, Kant cannot be satisfied 
with this. No matter whom he might find to be the 
source of the ethical command it would always be 
hypothetical, dependent upon the power and desire of 
this being, ceasing upon his absence or with a change 
of his desires. Since Kant, in order to avoid the hypo- 
thetical, did not wish to make even God responsible 
for the moral rules, there remained for him nothing 
but a leap into the void. He explained that the ought 
proceeded from no "other"; it is an absolute ought, and 
the ethical command is a categorical, not a conditional, 
imperative. 

But we have seen that a relationship to a power which 
expresses its desires is essential to the concept of the 



ii2 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

ought, just as essential as the relationship to some con- 
ditions (sanctions) is for the concept of the imperative. 
These characteristics belong to the definition of both 
concepts as we know them. Thus, for example, the 
concept "uncle" is defined relative to nephews and 
nieces; an "absolute uncle" would be nonsense. Since 
Kant, for his concepts of the ought and of the impera- 
tive, expressly repudiates the relation to one who com- 
mands, and to sanctions, both terms must have for him 
a wholly different meaning from that explained by us. 
It is, of course, the privilege of every author to use 
words as he pleases, and to give the terms he finds in 
daily life a new meaning, if only he defines this mean- 
ing exactly and retains it. But Kant does not give a 
new definition. He speaks as if the word "ought" is 
used by him in the usual sense, minus only its relative 
character. However, this is a contradiction, for rela- 
tivity, the relation to another desiring person, is con- 
stitutive of the ought in its usual sense. It is just as if 
Kant had said, "I wish to use the phrase 'to take a 
walk' with such a meaning that I can say 'a walk is 
being taken' without anyone there who takes it." An 
ought without someone who gives commands is an 
uncle who is such, not relatively to some nephew or 
niece, but simply in himself. 

In order to rid the Kantian ethics of this nonsense 
we must use the word "ought" with a meaning which 
has nothing in common with its original meaning; 
and therefore the same word should not be used. The 
role which it plays, apart from that unfortunate ex- 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 113 

planation in Kant's ethics, is, as has been suggested, 
that which fell to the "value-experience" in the views 
considered earlier, with the here unessential difference 
that it exclusively represents the moral values: it is the 
"moral law in me." (By the "in me" there is appar- 
ently given to Kant another opportunity to introduce 
a lawgiver of the ought, namely the ego itself. How- 
ever, not the empirical ego otherwise the ought would 
simply be the expression of its will but the super- 
empirical "practical reason" of the ego, which makes 
it "autonomous." And in his metaphysics Kant fin- 
ally also adds the sanctions in the form of other- 
worldly rewards.) "The practical reason" which lays 
down the moral law is, however, either an empty word 
or it reveals itself in some verifiable experience. It 
could be defined only in terms of such. Accordingly, 
for Kant the ought is to be defined as the conscious- 
ness of moral value. But with this we arrive at the 
problem of section (*/.), and we may consider the un- 
tenability of this view to be established. 

Still, it may be asked, might there not perhaps be 
given with the word "ought" at least some hint regard- 
ing the kind of psychological properties the asserted 
"feeling of value" would have, so that we might know 
where to seek for such a subtle experience, alleged to 
be so different from every feeling of pleasure ? Is there 
not, perhaps, in consciousness a demonstrable expe- 
rience of the "ought" complementary to that of "voli- 
tion"? 

We must answer that volition itself is not an 



ii4 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

elementary experience, but is resolvable into a series of 
processes (cf. Chapter II), and therefore one cannot 
well speak of an elementary experience opposed to it. 
When the command of another person confronts me 
under the conditions described on page no, then definite 
conscious processes take place in me, which represent 
just that experience which in everyday life we call 
"ought." It is complex, yet not so difficult to analyze. 
The decisive thing is the consciousness, of "compulsion," 
which consists of the fact that a persistent idea is estab- 
lished by the one who commands, and is equipped by 
means of his sanctions with feeling tones so strong that 
they affect adversely the pleasure components of all 
other ideas, and (in the case of obedience) suppress 
them. The ought stands in opposition to something 
desired, but not to volition; the ought is rather a part 
of the motivation process, and as such itself belongs to 
volition, and does not stand in opposition to it. We 
seek in vain for another immediate experience of the 
ought. 

One more point. The ought, before it can, and in 
order that it may, occur must also be willed. Kant 
strove in vain to make conceivable 2 how the ought, 
which with him had the extremely abstract character 
of a moral "law," could be taken up into volition; and 
this difficulty seems to me to exist for every absolutist 



2 Kant, Critique of Practical Reason. "How a law can be 
immediately and in itself the determining ground of volition 
(which is the essence of all morality) is for human reason an 
insoluble problem." 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 115 

theory. In order that the valuable be actually sought 
and realized it must arouse our feelings. Why then 
does anyone oppose the recognition of the essence of 
value in this excitation of feeling? For one cannot 
make values comprehensible here below after they have 
been removed into a foteeovQcivtog tojtog. 8 The asser- 
tion that moral values in particular have nothing to do 
with pleasure and pain is certainly false, for no one can 
deny that a feeling of joy is bound up with the act of 
moral approbation, and that one always expresses moral 
blame unwillingly, with pain or anger. Otherwise 
there is no real disapprobation, but it is only pretended. 

7. The Emptiness of the Hypothesis of 
Absolute Values 

Thus we come to the second argument against objec- 
tive values, which is quite conclusive, and which frees 
us from and raises us above the hair-splitting that we, 
perhaps, began to feel in the line of thought of the first 
argument. This (beginning on p. 102) simply asked 
for the meaning of so-called absolute value judgments, 
and concluded that none could be shown, however one 
tried. 

But now let us assume that the desired meaning has 
been found, so that we are able to determine in some 
way that there is a hierarchy of objective values wholly 
independent of our feelings. We now consider "value" 



[Place above the heavens.] 



ii6 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

to be a property of objects, qualifying them in various 
forms (for example, beautiful, good, sublime, and so 
forth) and in different degrees. All these possible 
properties together form a system, and in each case is 
unambiguously determined which of these properties 
a specific object has, and to what degree; thereby 
assigning to it a definite position in the system of the 
value hierarchy. 

Good, we say, let it be so! What follows? What 
have we to do with that ? How docs it concern us? 

The only interest we could take in this realm of 
values would be a purely scientific interest; that is, it 
might be of interest to an investigator that the things 
in the world, in addition to other properties, also have 
these, and by means of them can be ordered in a cer- 
tain way; and he might devote much labor to the 
description of this system. But for life and conduct 
this arrangement would be no more important than, 
say, the arrangement of the stars in the order of their 
magnitudes, or the serial arrangement of objects accord- 
ing to the alphabetical order of their names in the 
Swahili language. 

This is no exaggeration or misrepresentation, but is 
actually the case. To my question, "What do these 
objective values mean to me?" the absolutist answers, 
"They constitute the guiding lines of your conduct! 
In setting up your goals of action you should prefer the 
higher to the lower." If I then ask, "Why?" the abso- 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 117 

lutist simply cannot give any answer. This is the 
decisive point, that because of his thesis of the inde- 
pendence of values, the absolutist has cut himself off 
from all possibility of giving any other answer to my 
question, "What happens if I don't do it?" than "Then 
you don't do it, that is all!" Should he answer, "In 
that case you are not a good man," then we should 
note that this answer is relevant and can influence my 
action only if I desire, or have reason to desire, to be a 
"good man," that is, only if it is presupposed that cer- 
tain feelings are connected with that concept. And 
just such a presupposition may not be made by the 
absolutist; he may not say, "You will be more highly 
respected as a good man, you will lead a happier life, 
you will have a better conscience, you will be more at 
peace with yourself," and so forth; for in doing so he 
appeals to my feelings, as though the value were really 
binding upon me only because it brought me joy; and 
this doctrine is expressly repudiated. Even though in 
every way it were pleasant to me to be a scoundrel, 
and if I had the cordial respect of others, genuine peace 
in my soul, and pure inner joy as a result (imagine this 
in a lively manner, though it is difficult to do so, be- 
cause the fact is otherwise), if, thus, my life were more 
agreeable, exalted and happier because of my failure 
to obey the moral laws, still the absolutist would have 
to say, "Yet you must obey them, even though you be- 
come extremely unhappy." Whether happy or un- 
happy, pleasant or unpleasant, all this has, for the in- 
tuitionist, absolutely nothing to do with moral value 



ii8 ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 

which has been emphasized by no one more sharply 
than by Kant. But in these philosophers we still 
always find a hidden appeal to the feelings, even 
though it consist only in the use of certain honorific 
terms, like "honorable" itself. 

Perhaps the philosopher is even proud that he can- 
not answer the question, "What do absolute values 
mean to me ? What happens if I pay no attention to 
them?" Perhaps he even despises our question. If so, 
we answer his proud silence with the statement that in 
all seriousness we simply have no concern with such 
values, to which it makes no difference whether we are 
concerned with them or not, whose existence has no 
influence upon our peace of mind, our joy or sorrow, 
upon all those things that interest us in life. Indeed 
we cannot be concerned with such "values," for (see 
Chapter II) only those objects can arouse our volition 
which in some way or other arouse feelings of pleasure 
or pain in us. They would not be values for us. 

Thus we conclude: if there were values which were 
"absolute" in the sense that they had absolutely nothing 
to do with our feelings, they would constitute an inde- 
pendent realm which would enter into the world of 
our volition and action at no point; for it would be as 
if an impenetrable wall shut them off from us. Life 
would proceed as if they did not exist; and for ethics 
they would not exist. But if the values, in addition to 
and without injuring their absolute existence, also had 
the property or power of influencing our feelings, then 
they would enter into our world; but only in so far 



ARE THERE ABSOLUTE VALUES? 119 

as they thus affected us. Hence values also exist for 
ethics only to the extent that they make themselves felt, 
that is, are relative to us. And if a philosopher says, 
"Of course, but they also have an absolute existence," 
then we know that these words add nothing new to 
the verifiable facts, that therefore they are empty, and 
their assertion meaningless. 



CHAPTER VI 

Are There Worthless Joys and 
Valuable Sorrows? 

i. The Relativity of Values 

After having answered in the negative the question 
of the existence of absolute values, we feel finally 
assured of the assertion that the sense of every propo- 
sition concerning the value of an object consists in the 
fact that this object, or the idea of it, produces a feeling 
of pleasure or pain in some feeling subject. A value 
exists only with respect to a subject, it is relative. If 
there were no pleasure and pain in* the world there 
would be no values. Everything would be indifferent. 

It is well to note in what sense relativity characterizes 
every value: its existence depends upon the being and 
the feeling of a subject, but this subjectivity is not 
caprice, it does not mean that the subject can at will 
declare the object to be valuable or valueless. So long 
as toothaches are painful they have no value for the 
sufferer, and he cannot alter this; otherwise he would 
certainly do so. When a specific object in a specific 
relation is presented to a specific subject, and the 
momentary constitution and disposition of the subject 
is fixed, then the feeling with which the subject reacts 



120 



ARE THERE VALUABLE SORROWS? 121 

to the constitution of the object is also determined, that 
is, it has at that moment an unambiguous value or 
disvalue. This fact is wholly objective; neither the 
subject nor the disinterested observer can explain it 
away in the least; the fact is just as "objective" as 
would be the existence of an "absolute" value. The 
relativity of values does not therefore mean a meta- 
physical relativity, so to speak, as if value were no 
longer tangible or definite. This seems so clear to me 
that I would not waste a word on it if misunderstand- 
ings regarding this point did not occur (as in Nicolai 
Hartmann's Ethics). The pleasure or pain which the 
subject experiences in valuing is certainly something 
absolute, for if the word "absolute" is permissible any- 
where, then it is certainly so in reference to such a final 
datum of consciousness. In order that an object be 
valuable to a subject, the object and the subject must 
be of a definite nature, and there must be a definite 
relation between them. If all this exists, then the 
object necessarily and unambiguously has a definite 
value for the subject. 

This doctrine of the relativity of values, in my 
opinion, does full justice in every way to their true 
nature. It is so natural and obvious that even in 
ancient times it was widely held. I believe that one 
can trace the derivation of values from pleasure in the 
Socratic theory; it was expressly formulated in the 
Cyrenaic school founded by Aristippus, a follower of 
Socrates, and since that time has remained in the history 
of ethics. In addition, the theory is in such complete 



122 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

agreement with experience as it expresses itself in hu- 
man institutions, that, had it not met with strong 
emotional opposition, no other view could have arisen. 
But propositions of the theory are of such a sort that 
the thoughts connected with them can easily give rise 
to unpleasant feelings, while the absolute value theory 
meets certain human needs, that is, its thoughts are 
received with pleasure. And since these emotional re- 
actions occur in the course of ethical considerations the 
disapprobation of one theory and the approbation of 
the other itself easily takes on the character of a moral 
valuation; and there arises that situation of a peculiar 
confusion of insight and valuation that makes ethical 
discussions so difficult, and makes observations like 
those of the preceding chapter necessary. 

2. The Prejudice Against pleasure 

A definite prejudice is to blame for the fact that the 
proposition asserting the relativity of value, and its 
dependence upon the pleasure of the evaluator, arouses 
unpleasant thoughts, and thus calls forth a disappro- 
bation which appears as moral disapprobation itself. 
We meet this prejudice in this context again and again, 
and it may be considered the typical prejudice of moral 
philosophers: the prejudice against "pleasure." We 
have touched upon it lightly in earlier chapters, but it 
is well to examine it again systematically, for in so 
doing we shall be able to clarify certain more funda- 
mental problems. 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 123 

Hence we seek the psychological cause of this preju- 
dice; and, according to the principle that an error is 
first overcome when it is not only refuted but when 
also its origin is explained, we shall only be safe from 
the main errors of ethics when we have found that 
cause. 

Our question is: Why does one rebel against the 
recognition of pleasure as the final measure of all value, 
including moral value ? It will be answered when we 
explain psychologically why the word "pleasure" or 
words having similar meaning has the tendency to be 
unpleasant. We must, conversely, also seek the reason 
why suffering and grief, and similar states, which seem 
to be genuinely unpleasant, are yet not considered alto- 
gether valueless. It is from just this fact that many 
infer that the true standard of value, according to 
which not every pain is valueless, and not every pleasure 
valuable, must be other than pleasure. 

We consider these points in turn: 

(i) The cause of the evil repute of the word "pleas- 
ure," or related terms, lies, in my opinion, only in those 
mutual human influences which can in the widest 
sense be called "education." 

All education concerns the transformation of man, 
the alteration of his dispositions; it consists in the 
strengthening or forming of certain impulses, and the 
weakening or removal of others. That is (cf. the 
definition of impulse in Chapter III), education at- 
tempts to equip certain ideas with a greater pleasure- 
tone and to make others, on the contrary, have as little 



124 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

as possible, or even to make them very unpleasant. In 
education as it actually takes place (and I speak not 
only of the education of children, but of every moral 
influence exerted by men upon one another) the 
second, negative, method which tries to repress and 
dam up the existing impulses is used preponderantly. 
It has indeed long been a reasonable demand of peda- 
gogy to prefer the positive method, to strengthen and 
develop the desirable impulses, instead of spending all 
energy upon overcoming the undesirable; but this 
latter method is much easier, and it is also usually con- 
sidered more urgent first to protect society from injuries 
that can come to it from the unbridled impulses of its 
members; the cultivation of useful dispositions is 
carried on only secondarily. Therefore it happens that 
education for the most part works by means of restric- 
tions and prohibitions; the state, for fxample, sanctions 
its laws by means of punishments for transgression 
alone, not by means of rewards for obedience. And 
thus we explain the fact, to which attention was called 
in the beginning of Chapter IV, that our whole moral- 
ity exhibits in such high degree a prohibitory character. 
The essence of prohibition consists in the fact that 
we are told, "You must not do what you would like to 
do." Something, the idea of which is originally pleas- 
ant, is declared to be bad by the moral precept; and the 
impression arises that in general what brings pleasure 
is always bad. The fact that for the most part I come 
in contact with moral rules and educative measures 
only when someone wishes to change something in me 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 125 

(otherwise they would not be required) has the con- 
sequence that what is commanded by morality always 
appears to be what one would not do of one's own self, 
naturally. I am firmly convinced that this is the 
correct, startlingly simple explanation of the fact that 
nature and morality appear to many philosophers as 
opposites, that Kant believes it necessary to distinguish 
between man as a natural creature and man as morally 
rational, that for Fichte virtue is nothing but the "over- 
coming of outer and inner nature," that James defines 
moral conduct as that which proceeds in the line of 
greatest resistance (while conversely, nature follows the 
principle of least resistance). According to these 
theories the moral is never the natural, and morality is 
never self-evident. 

How clearly we now see through the psychology of 
all those philosophers who reject pleasure as the stand- 
ard of value! Morality, in order to attain its ends, 
must remove the pleasure-tone from certain ideas, tear 
away their seductive finery, put desired goals in a bad 
light, make alluring ones appear suspicious. How 
easily it can happen that in this process of exerting 
moral influence the peculiar purpose and meaning of 
morality is seen, even though it is really only instru- 
mental. Although at first it never occurred to moral- 
ity to abhor pleasure as such, must it not almost neces- 
sarily come, habitually, to treat pleasure as something 
better avoided, as something dangerous, low, and com- 
mon ? But if pleasure is the only value, indeed if it is 
valuable at all, morality could not possibly warn 



126 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

against all possible satisfactions; hence pleasure must 
be something disreputable. However, it was not 
noticed that originally no moral precept ever warned 
against pleasure as such, but always only against defi- 
nite activities or objects which were pleasant. Yet if a 
child is constantly warned against poisonous mush- 
rooms, must it not in the end fear all mushrooms and 
hold them always in suspicion; even though the warn- 
ing ultimately did not concern mushrooms, but only 
poison ? 

Not that moral teachers have never made a clear 
distinction between valuable and evil pleasures, be- 
tween permissible and unpermissible joys. For they 
have used the principle of reward also, and the pleasure 
that serves as the reward must of course be "good." 
But it is, again, very characteristic that especially in 
religions the tendency, at least, e^sted to banish as 
many as possible of the natural feelings of pleasure to 
the realm of prohibited things; so that this realm in the 
case of the extremists, the ascetics, finally included 
all natural pleasure. Thus arises the opposition of 
"earthly" and "heavenly" joys; the former are all 
worthless, only the other-worldly joys are good. It 
would be the task of a sensible education to return the 
heavenly joys to earth again. 

Who knows whether moral sermons, by means of 
suggestion, have not given the impulse to many a 
pessimism, which in turn easily found further reasons 
for the worthlessness of pleasure, for example, that 
every joy contains within itself the germ of future 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 127 

sorrow, just because, perhaps, every pleasure must end, 
and this is always painful. 

The modern philosopher of value does not go so far 
as to consider value and pleasure as opposites, but he 
supports the suggestion of the moralist in so far as he 
grants to pleasure no moral value, and therefore rejects 
it entirely as a standard of value. I repeat that this 
view is explained in a very large part simply by the 
method of moral education, which must declare so 
many pleasant things to be reprehensible, and thereby 
brings pleasure as such into disrepute. 

3. Happiness and Sorrow as Mixed States 

(2) The consideration of the second explanatory 
ground of that view leads us to more weighty matters. 
This second reason lies, we noted, in the fact that in 
our judgments on the value of a life we do not at all 
rate the unpleasant experiences, pain and sorrow, only 
negatively. We believe on the contrary that they can 
at least serve to give to life that richness which is pre- 
supposed by the highest value. For what kind of life 
do we call the most valuable? Is it not that to which 
we ascribe nobility and greatness? And do not these 
words mean something altogether different from a 
maximum of pleasure ? Again and again we hear that 
if one strives for greatness he must renounce happiness. 
"The fate of the great men of history has not been 
happy," says Hegel. If it is true that the highest in 
life cannot exist without sorrow and pain, then, so it 



128 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

seems, pleasure is not simply the valuable, but must 
give up its rank as the standard of value to something 
altogether different. 

Everyone feels that behind such objections there 
stands some kind of serious and significant truth, and 
that superficial arguments will be of no avail against 
it. Such would be an argument which said that a life 
of nobility and greatness is in fact valuable only for 
others who profit by the deeds of the genius; those who 
enjoy his achievements value and praise his life. But 
for himself it has actually little value; unless an exces- 
sive desire for power and ambition is thus satisfied in 
him, whereby compensation is made for the burdens 
he took upon himself. 

This argument is invalid: in the first place because 
the nobility and moral greatness of a human life is not 
always measured by successful deec^, that is, according 
to its social utility; and, in the second place, because 
the great man himself, even without desire for power 
and fame, can feel the value of an heroic existence so 
strongly that despite his "unhappiness" he would 
change with no one to whom life's joys came in a less 
adulterated form. 

Thus it requires more penetrating considerations to 
see whether the situations described do not require us 
to revise our view of the nature of value. What we 
have to do is, again, only this, to ask: "What is the 
actual meaning of the words like 'happiness' and 
borrow' in those cases where a 'higher' but sorrowful 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 129 

life is contrasted with a lower' but happy one, and 
praised as the more valuable?" 

The word "happiness" has in any case such a vague 
meaning that in different contexts very different things 
are meant. The same holds, moreover, of the Greek 
term ei)8ai|jiovia, while, for example, the Latin bcati- 
tudo has a more definite coloring, corresponding to 
the German Seligkfit. In the polemic against the 
eudaemonistic way of thinking, the vague expression 
"happiness" is commonly understood as if it meant 
something like enjoyment, comfort, gratification. 
These words also, of course, having little of the exact- 
ness of scientific terms. The cited aphorism from 
Hegel, on the happiness of the great men of history, 
continues, "They never attain peaceful enjoyment!" 
Is the assertion that a noble life is more valuable than 
a happy one to say only that greatness is incompatible 
with "peaceful enjoyment"? This would gladly be 
granted, even by him who holds that greatness and 
happiness are not mutually exclusive, and who is of 
the opinion that all nobility finally depends upon some 
feelings of pleasure; he need only deny the identifica- 
tion of happiness with peaceful enjoyment, and re- 
member that the strongest feelings of pleasure are 
connected with other states than "peaceful enjoyment." 
And he would certainly be right! 

But in this way only a very crude difficulty would be 
overcome. The question troubling us would still be 
far from settled. Granted human nature and condi- 



130 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

tions of life to be what they are, it must be admitted 
that a human life can become more valuable through 
sorrow. Thus suffering must be valuable either di- 
rectly or indirectly, that is, either contain pleasure itself 
or constitute the necessary condition of it. Otherwise 
the statement cannot be validly maintained that value 
is determined by pleasure alone. Is anything like this 
possible? 

It seems to be impossible only so long as we forget 
that happiness and sorrow are terms of very indefinite 
meaning, and therefore need not at all coincide with 
the pair of concepts pleasure, pain, which we assume as 
strictly defined psychologically, and use with a con- 
stant meaning. Dostoevsky, who certainly did not 
reflect less than other men on the value of life, puts 
into the mouth of one of his heroes the question (in 
Letters from the Underworld}, "WJiat is better, cheap 
happiness or noble sorrow?" And he considers the 
answer to be so self-evident that he neglects to give it, 
but has the hero repeat, "Well, which is better?" 
Here, there is added to the words "sorrow" and "happi- 
ness" an adjective that would result in a contradiction 
in terms if by happiness were meant something wholly 
pleasant, and by sorrow pure pain. For "cheap" is a 
disparaging description here: what is thus described 
must show some speck of pain on its otherwise brilliant 
garb; and conversely, so long as a sorrow can still be 
"noble" it is not a pure pain, but still bears some bright 
star on its dark raiment. On the other hand, Dos- 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 131 

pure meaning of beatitude \ in The Brothers Kara- 
mazov he has the old man, Zosima, say, "For men are 
made for happiness. Whoever is completely happy is 
worthy to say to himself: I have fulfilled God's will on 
this earth. All teachers, all saints, all saintly martyrs 
have been happy." Thus it is clear (and with the 
extreme complexity of life really self-evident) that 
words like "happiness," "unhappiness," "pleasure," 
"sorrow" are used in life and poetry for complex states 
having mixed components of feeling. The psycholo- 
gist, who by his analysis must expose those pure tones 
which he calls "pleasure" and "pain," deals with ab- 
stractions and arrives at formulations which must 
appear paradoxical. (The law of motivation enunci- 
ated in Chapter II, and the reduction of all value to 
pleasure are such formulations.) When even such an 
elementary sensation as pain can, according to the 
circumstances, possess pleasant as well as unpleasant 
components it is no wonder that more complicated 
psychic states have a structure even more difficult to 
discover. 

From considerations such as these we form the con- 
jecture that "suffering," when it is valued positively 
and viewed as a desirable constituent of life, designates 
without exception a compounded state (or better, 
structurally complicated, for in the true sense nothing 
psychic is "compounded"), in which the psychologist 
can- point out the feeling components that are to be 
made responsible for the "value." 



i 3 2 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

4. Associative Pleasure in Sorrow 

We speak first of the simple, almost trivial case, that 
a state which "in itself" (that is, under usual condi- 
tions, and without special relation to past and future 
things) is unpleasant obtains a pleasure component 
because it is associated with ideas which are strongly 
colored by pleasure. They have this coloring either 
because they relate to previously had joyful experiences, 
or because they relate to future states which are pictured 
as joyful. Everyone can easily find hundreds of ex- 
amples in his own experience for each of these cases. 
To the first sort belong all those in which an ugly object 
is cherished because cheerful memories are joined to it, 
or where for the same reason various unpleasant sensa- 
tions lose their unpleasantness; even bad odors are 
sometimes valued. I once heard of a worker who was 
in the habit of opening a gas-cock to enjoy the odor; 
he had been employed in a gas-plant and had evidently 
had a pleasant time there. 

We have cases of the second sort wherever one under- 
takes a painful performance for the sake of its effects; 
the idea of these makes the activity pleasant. To very 
many persons all "labor" seems to be of this sort. Con- 
versely, every overcoming of difficulty easily comes to 
be considered unpleasant, as a mere means to an end, 
which it need not in the least be (this observation is 
important for the valuation of an "heroic" life). 

But above all we should think of what in the widest 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 133 

sense can be called a promise or a threat, reward or 
punishment. Every pleasure can be called a reward 
if it characterizes a state which is the effect of definite 
behavior, and has the consequence that the idea of this 
result, and thereby the behavior leading to it, itself 
becomes pleasant. The representation of that future 
state is then called "hope," and there are doubtless but 
few states of intensive pleasure in human life to which 
feelings of hope do not somehow contribute. Perhaps 
in general, hope (longing is related to it) is the source 
of the happiest feelings. If we should destroy them, so 
that of every pleasure only the momentary present 
component remained, so to speak, this would at least 
be a pretty wretched remainder. This fact alone 
appears to render unjustified the attitude of those 
moralists and philosophers who look disdainfully upon 
the principle of reward or compensation, who see but 
a very crude method in its application, and who reject 
entirely the fact that it is used in ethics to locate the 
value of suffering, also only in part, in the reward for 
suffering. This is, on the contrary, a correct explana- 
tion. That it is so simple does not justify us in reject- 
ing it as a superficial eudaemonistic construction. 

That eudaemonistic explanations are considered 
superficial, even immoral, can be understood from the 
considerations of the first part of this chapter. For the 
same reason one seeks to defend the religions, especially 
Christianity, against the charge of exhibiting eudae- 
monistic tendencies in arousing other-worldly hope. 
But this seems to me to be altogether useless and super- 



134 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

fluous. It is not true that reference to compensation 
by future happiness for suffering is incompatible with 
true magnanimity, or indicates an appeal to "egoism" 
(cf. Chapter III); consolation and reward are much 
rather the expression of kindness. And kindness too 
is noble. Some of the most beautiful passages of the 
Gospels owe their beauty to the subjoined promises: 
"Blessed are they which are persecuted for righteous- 
ness' sake, for theirs is the kingdom of heaven." 
Often it is the references to future joys alone that give 
even the formulations of moral precepts their grandeur, 
by placing men in relationships affording wide per- 
spectives in which things assume their proper value. 
The "Judge not!" obtains its force only from the added 
phrase, "That ye be not judged." 

5. Is Sorrow a Necessary Condition of Pleasure? 

Hitherto we have dealt only with the simple (but 
nevertheless important) idea that suffering is valuable 
whenever it represents the path to joy; the valuation of 
the end being carried over to the means, according to 
well-known laws. We might now attempt to general- 
ize this thought to the more important observation 
that the path to joy always leads through suffering, that 
they are connected by a law of nature. 

This law could only be the law of contrast, and it 
would in this case say that never-ending states of pleas- 
ure could not be felt as such (thus really would not be 
such) unless they were interrupted by pain: as, for ex- 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 135 

ample, the Pythagoreans supposed that we did not hear 
the music of the spheres, solely because they sounded a 
continuous monotone. Pleasure would only be possi- 
ble after antecedent pain. 

This inference is erroneous, even though the law of 
contrast holds. To be sure, we would never speak of 
the value of health if there were no illness; praises of 
spring would not be sung if it did not follow winter, 
and if the whole year rounded out equably; but from 
this it only follows that some change is necessary if 
lively feelings are to occur. Just as winter is not merely 
a miserable season but has its own joys, though dif- 
ferent from those of summer, so it would suffice if dif- 
ferent qualities of pleasure alternated with each other, 
or if states of highest joy followed indifferent or mildly 
pleasant ones; the former would stand out from the lat- 
ter quite well enough. Thus the necessity of pain as 
the pre-condition of pleasure cannot be deduced in this 
manner. At most one could say that the transition 
from a joyful to a less joyful state is under all condi- 
tions painful; but then the observation again becomes 
trivial and does not solve our real problem. 

Hence, even though here we cannot offer a proof, it 
still seems to be a fact of experience (I am of course not 
altogether sure of it) that the most profound joys of 
life are actually not possible unless, previously, grave 
feelings of pain have been experienced. It seems that 
the soul requires them in order to become receptive of 
the sublimest pleasures. This would indeed be a de- 
plorable fact, and not one we would want to palliate 



136 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

by saying that it is not in the least deplorable. But, if 
it really exists, then we should understand better why 
a human life can attain its highest value only by pass- 
ing through the extremes. A life such as the modest 
poet Morike prayed for: 

Wollest mit Freud en 
Und wollest mit Leiden 
Mich nicht uberschuttenl 
dock in der Mitten 
Liegt holdes Bescheiden. . . .* 

could not be truly great, not because it lacked the deep- 
est suffering, but because of the absence of the greatest 
joys, the path to which seems indeed to lead only 
through pain. 

6. The Bliss of Suffering 

The value which, thus far, we have been able to as- 
sign to "suffering" was not inherent in it, but accrued 
to it only to the extent to which it was a means to pleas- 
ant ends. Is this the only kind of value that is to be 
found in it? Does it explain adequately the feeling, 
which upon deeper reflection one can hardly resist, that 
suffering has the important function in life of protect- 
ing it from "shallowness," where shallowness is the op- 
posite of "depth," a word by which one certainly wishes 
to designate what is most valuable in life ? It seems to 



1 [Let me not be overwhelmed with joys and with sorrows, 
for gentle moderation lies in the mean. , . .] 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 137 

me that what we have hitherto discovered is insufficient 
to do justice to these matters. Consequently we are 
faced by the question of whether there is not either a 
value wholly independent of pleasure, or whether in 
the states called "sorrowful" there are not still to be 
found some pleasure components, which belong there 
by their very nature, as it were, and are not introduced 
by a comparatively external association. 

I shall say at once that in my opinion the word "suf- 
fer," in its significant sense, is always used only for 
mixed states, for complicated experiences whose feeling 
tones are never wholly and purely pain. We remarked 
earlier that emotions of wholly unmixed pain are rare, 
and occur only in the cases of unmitigated aversion and 
disgust. It is only an end with such accompanying af- 
fects that can never be willed; and this with the neces- 
sity of a natural law (cf. Chapter II). Most forms of 
disagreeable things tend to have a hidden pleasure 
component, as it were, and this holds even of anger, 
fear, care, and of mourning. Even the profound grief 
with which we stand at the deathbed of a loved one is 
permeated by the peculiar remote sweetness from 
which the thought of death is seldom free, and upon 
which perhaps rests the feeling of its sublimity. 

Such involved states, by virtue of their richer struc- 
ture, naturally constitute the field of poetry. There 
the bliss of sorrow is praised again and again, and if 
the poet longs for bitterness (Heine) it is the sweetness 
of bitterness which makes it an object of ardent desire. 
Where this problem becomes most clearly visible is in 



138 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

tragedy. Since Aristotle, ever new attempts have been 
made to explain the pleasure in tragedy, and the ex- 
planations remain unsatisfying so long as they (as did 
that of Aristotle) refer the joy in the tragic to subse- 
quent associations. The pleasure lies rather in part in 
"suffering" itself, and for this component the catharsis 
and reconciliation, whose role in tragedy may other- 
wise be great enough, is no longer necessary. Thus 
Gerhart Hauptmann in Michael Kramer says, "Even 
what serves to humble us is at once glorious and ter- 
rible." 

It has in general not escaped the notice of the poets 
that experiences of "suffering" are not wholly disagree- 
able, not altogether painful; and they have often in their 
manner expressed this, saying that joy and sorrow are 
in essence related. In Anatole France we read (La Vie 
en Fleur, the end), "On aime aussija vie, la doulour- 
euse vie, parcequ'on aime la douleur. Et comment ne 
I'aimerait on pas? Elle ressemble a la joie, et parjois 
se confond avec elle." 2 

We have now to formulate that fact or to discover 
that general truth which lies at the base of such state- 
ments as the one just cited. What lies behind the 
"similarity" of pleasure and sorrow, here affirmed? 

According to the established method of psychology, 
we shall consider for the solution of our problem the 
external mode of appearance of the effect, the behavior 



2 [One loves life also, sorrowful life, because one loves sor- 
row. And why shouldn't one love it? It resembles joy, and 
is sometimes confused with it.] 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 139 

exhibited by a joyful and a suffering person. And at 
once it strikes us that in addition to differences there 
are very remarkable agreements to be observed. It is 
very significant that suffering and great joy have in 
common in their expression such a pronounced phe- 
nomenon as tears. "Les haul plaisirs sont ceux qui 
font prcsque pleurcr" 3 (Guyau, Vers d'un Philosophe, 
p. 139). A man weeps when he suffers, and tears 
come to his eyes when he experiences great joy, even 
(and this is important for us) in the presence of a noble 
deed, or when he hears of a generous reconciliation; in 
short, whenever he has elevated "ethical" feelings. 
Pure pain (the feeling of something repulsive, or sim- 
ply offensive) brings no tears; we do not weep, but 
scream or groan when in great pain (Laokpon). 

What is common to the joyful and sorrowful situa- 
tions in which men weep ? Evidently a powerful con- 
vulsion of man's whole nature, in which, however, the 
force is not the decisive thing, but rather the fact that 
the whole person is affected to a depth which very few 
impressions can reach. These are of course only fig- 
urative expressions. Translated into the language of 
psychology, they state that in such powerful experiences 
we have to do with certain functions of the soul (one 
can also say "physiological functions" without altering 
the sense) which can be aroused in the most diverse 
ways, but which are very difficult to arouse, and which 
for the volitional life have a fundamental significance; 
so that its character has an essential dependence upon 

8 [The great pleasures are those that nearly make us weep.] 



i 4 o ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS 

them. They are made active by pleasant as well as un- 
pleasant powerful stimuli; but this activity itself is al- 
ways pleasant. These functions constitute something 
elevated and great in men in the double sense that their 
power in the psychic life is enormous, and that they are 
the source of very intense joys. Moments in which 
one becomes aware of their activity are moments of 
exalted feeling. Apart from certain exceptions, every 
vehement psychic process, every deployment of power, 
and lively activity is pleasant. If, however, the proc- 
ess penetrates to the depths of the soul one has feelings 
of sublimity ranging from a transitory "touching" emo- 
tion to the highest unwavering inspiration, observable 
in world-shaking deeds. 

Perhaps, for obscure reasons, suffering rather than 
joy has the power of moving the soul to its inmost 
depths pain stirring it as a sharp plow turns the soil. 
(The word "pathos," which we use approximately 
with the meaning of "inspiration," actually means "suf- 
fering.") If this were true, we should better under- 
stand why suffering is so eloquently praised as some- 
thing great and holy, and why the poet believed that 
heavenly powers reveal themselves in it: 

Wer nie sein Brot mit Trdnen ass, 
wer nie die fammervollen Ndchte 
auf seinem Bette weinend sass, 
der \ennt euch nicht, ihr himmlischen Mdchtel * 

(Goethe) 



4 [Who has not eaten his bread in tears, nor sat weeping on 
his bed through nights of misery, knows ye not, ye heavenly 
powers!] 



AND VALUABLE SORROWS? 141 

But I believe that one could with the same justifica- 
tion say (and Goethe also would willingly have said) 
that who does not know the heavenly powers has never 
experienced the ecstasies of pure joy. Nietzsche was 
probably right in his aphorism that pleasure is pro- 
founder than affliction. Indeed there is no essential 
reason, and our considerations led to none, why intense 
joys alone should not suffice for us to rise to true great- 
ness, to reach the ultimate depths of our nature, and to 
attain all of the sublimities of life. That suffering 
more easily succeeds in stirring the soul into great con- 
vulsion, making it ready for the highest joys, is prob- 
ably connected with the fact that in general the most 
intense pains yield the strongest impulses. A painful 
state obviously presses more violently toward a change 
than does a pleasant one. We run most rapidly when 
escaping a danger, more easily, however, when striving 
to reach a goal. Then we enjoy the effort itself and 
are not in a hurry. Thus it happens that great art de- 
rives more readily from sorrow than from pleasure, 
that almost all the great artists have also suffered 
greatly. 

Der Lorbeerfyanz ist, wo er dir erscheint, 
Ein Zeichen mehr des Leidens als des Gluc\$? 

(Goethe, Tasso) 

The sufferer calls more force into play, he is more in 
need of the work of art, which liberates him and brings 
salvation. 

5 [The laurel-wreath ... is a symbol more of sorrow than 
of happiness.] 



142 ARE THERE WORTHLESS JOYS? 

If in this manner pain releases the strongest psychic 
powers, still it is no law of nature that intense joy could 
not do the same; and experience teaches that this ac- 
tually happens, though examples of it are rarer. We 
must in any case desire that they become more fre- 
quent; nor is there visible reason why, with advancing 
civilization, development should not take place along 
this line. Indeed, perhaps true progress in civilization 
consists in just this, that suffering become more and 
more unnecessary for the release of powerful pleasure- 
bringing forces, this role being taken over more and 
more by joyful inspiration, as we observe it occasionally 
in especially favored men. 

In this chapter we have reached the following re- 
sults: the opinion that pleasure is often not, or not at 
all, valuable rests upon a certain prejudice whose origin 
has been disclosed and which has thus been rendered 
harmless. The opinion that "suffering" is valuable is 
correct, but only because the generally very complex 
state designated by this word is always shot through 
with certain feelings of pleasure to which the value can 
be referred. What holds of sorrow holds a fortiori of 
all other things, that is, they owe their value to the joy 
they promise, which is the only measure of their value. 



CHAPTER VII 

When Is a Man Responsible? 
i. The Pseudo-Problem of Freedom of the Will 

With hesitation and reluctance I prepare to add this 
chapter to the discussion of ethical problems. For in 
it I must speak of a matter which, even at present, is 
thought to be a fundamental ethical question, but 
which got into ethics and has become a much discussed 
problem only because of a misunderstanding. This is 
the so-called problem of the freedom of the will. 
Moreover, this pseudo-problem has long since been 
settled by the efforts of certain sensible persons; and, 
above all, the state of affairs just described has been 
often disclosed with exceptional clarity by Hume. 
Hence it is really one of the greatest scandals of phi- 
losophy that again and again so much paper and print- 
er's ink is devoted to this matter, to say nothing of the 
expenditure of thought, which could have been ap- 
plied to more important problems (assuming that it 
would have sufficed for these). Thus I should truly be 
ashamed to write a chapter on "freedom." In the 
chapter heading, the word "responsible" indicates what 
concerns ethics, and designates the point at which mis- 

143 



i 4 4 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

understanding arises. Therefore the concept of re- 
sponsibility constitutes our theme, and if in the process 
of its clarification I also must speak of the concept of 
freedom I shall, of course, say only what others have 
already said better; consoling myself with the thought 
that in this way alone can anything be done to put an 
end at last to that scandal. 

The main task of ethics (of which we convinced our- 
selves in Chapter I) is to explain moral behavior. To 
explain means to refer back to laws: every science, in- 
cluding psychology, is possible only in so far as there 
are such laws to which the events can be referred. 
Since the assumption that all events are subject to uni- 
versal laws is called the principle of causality, one can 
also say, "Every science presupposes the principle of 
causality." Therefore every explanation of human be- 
havior must also assume the validity of causal laws; in 
this case the existence of psychological laws. (If for 
example our law of motivation of Chapter II were in- 
correct, then human conduct would be quite unex- 
plained.) All of our experience strengthens us in the 
belief that this presupposition is realized, at least to the 
extent required for all purposes of practical life in in- 
tercourse with nature and human beings, and also for 
the most precise demands of technique. Whether, in- 
deed, the principle of causality holds universally, 
whether, that is, determinism is true, we do not know; 
no one knows. But we do know that it is impossible 
to settle the dispute between determinism and indeter- 
minism by mere reflection and speculation, by the con- 



WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 145 

sideration of so many reasons for and so many reasons 
against (which collectively and individually are but 
pseudo-reasons). Such an attempt becomes especially 
ridiculous when one considers with what enormous ex- 
penditure of experimental and logical skill contempo- 
rary physics carefully approaches the question of 
whether causality can be maintained for the most mi- 
nute intra-atomic events. 

But the dispute concerning "freedom of the will" 
generally proceeds in such fashion that its advocates at- 
tempt to refute, and its opponents to prove, the validity 
of the causal principle, both using hackneyed argu- 
ments, and neither in the least abashed by the magni- 
tude of the undertaking. (I can exclude only Bergson 
from this criticism, with whom, however, this whole 
question is not an ethical but a metaphysical problem. 
His ideas, which in my opinion will not stand epistemo- 
logical analysis, are of no significance for us.) Others 
distinguish two realms, in one of which determinism 
holds, but not in the other. This line of thought 
(which was unfortunately taken by Kant) is, however, 
quite the most worthless (though Schopenhauer con- 
sidered it to be Kant's most profound idea). 

Fortunately, it is not necessary to lay claim to a final 
solution of the causal problem in order to say what is 
necessary in ethics concerning responsibility; there is 
required only an analysis of the concept, the careful de- 
termination of the meaning which is in fact joined to the 
words "responsibility" and "freedom" as these are ac- 
tually used. If men had made clear to themselves the 



146 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

sense of those propositions, which we use in everyday 
life, that pseudo-argument which lies at the root of the 
pseudo-problem, and which recurs thousands of times 
within and outside of philosophical books, would never 
have arisen. 

The argument runs as follows: "If determinism is 
true, if, that is, all events obey immutable laws, then 
my will too is always determined, by my innate char- 
acter and my motives. Hence my decisions are neces- 
sary, not free. But if so, then I am not responsible for 
my acts, for I would be accountable for them only if I 
could do something about the way my decisions went; 
but I can do nothing about it, since they proceed with 
necessity from my character and the motives. And I 
have made neither, and have no power over them: the 
motives come from without, and my character is the 
necessary product of the innate tendencies and the ex- 
ternal influences which have been effective during my 
lifetime. Thus determinism and moral responsibility 
are incompatible. Moral responsibility presupposes 
freedom, that is, exemption from causality." 

This process of reasoning rests upon a whole series of 
confusions, just as the links of a chain hang together. 
We must show these confusions to be such, and thus 
destroy them. 

2. Two Meanings of the Word "Law" 

It all begins with an erroneous interpretation of the 
meaning of "law." In practice this is understood as a 



WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 147 

rule by which the state prescribes certain behavior to 
its citizens. These rules often contradict the natural 
desires of the citizens (for if they did not do so, there 
would be no reason for making them), and are in fact 
not followed by many of them; while others obey, but 
under compulsion. The state does in fact compel its 
citizens by imposing certain sanctions (punishments) 
which serve to bring their desires into harmony with 
the prescribed laws. 

In natural science, on the other hand, the word "law" 
means something quite different. The natural law is 
not a prescription as to how something should behave, 
but a formula, a Ascription of how something does in 
fact behave. The two forms of "laws" have only this 
in common: both tend to be expressed in formulae. 
Otherwise they have absolutely nothing to do with one 
another, and it is very blameworthy that the same word 
has been used for two such different things; but even 
more so that philosophers have allowed themselves to 
be led into serious errors by this usage. Since natural 
laws are only descriptions of what happens, there can 
be in regard to them no talk of "compulsion." The 
laws of celestial mechanics do not prescribe to the 
planets how they have to move, as though the planets 
would actually like to move quite otherwise, and are 
only forced by these burdensome laws of Kepler to 
move in orderly paths; no, these laws do not in any 
way "compel" the planets, but express only what in 
fact planets actually do. 

If we apply this to volition, we are enlightened at 



148 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

once, even before the other confusions are discovered. 
When we say that a man's will "obeys psychological 
laws," these are not civic laws, which compel him to 
make certain decisions, or dictate desires to him, which 
he would in fact prefer not to have. They are laws of 
nature, merely expressing which desires he actually has 
under given conditions; they describe the nature of the 
will in the same manner as the astronomical laws de- 
scribe the nature of planets. "Compulsion" occurs 
where man is prevented from realizing his natural de- 
sires. How could the rule according to which these 
natural desires arise itself be considered as "compul- 
sion"? 

3. Compulsion and Necessity 

But this is the second confusion fo which the first 
leads almost inevitably: after conceiving the laws of na- 
ture, anthropomorphically, as order imposed nolens 
volens upon the events, one adds to them the concept 
of "necessity." This word, derived from "need," also 
comes to us from practice, and is used there in the 
sense of inescapable compulsion. To apply the word 
with this meaning to natural laws is of course senseless, 
for the presupposition of an opposing desire is lacking; 
and it is then confused with something altogether dif- 
ferent, which is actually an attribute of natural laws. 
That is, universality. It is of the essence of natural 
laws to be universally valid, for only when we have 
found a rule which holds of events without exception 



WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 149 

do we call the rule a law of nature. Thus when we 
say "a natural law holds necessarily" this has but one 
legitimate meaning: "It holds in all cases where it is 
applicable." It is again very deplorable that the word 
"necessary" has been applied to natural laws (or, what 
amounts to the same thing, with reference to causal- 
ity), for it is quite superfluous, since the expression 
"universally valid" is available. Universal validity is 
something altogether different from "compulsion"; 
these concepts belong to spheres so remote from each 
other that once insight into the error has been gained 
one can no longer conceive the possibility of a con- 
fusion. 

The confusion of two concepts always carries with it 
the confusion of their contradictory opposites. The op- 
posite of the universal validity of a formula, of the 
existence of a law, is the nonexistence of a law, inde- 
terminism, acausality; while the opposite of compulsion 
is what in practice everyone calls "freedom." Here 
emerges the nonsense, trailing through centuries, that 
freedom means "exemption from the causal principle," 
or "not subject to the laws of nature." Hence it is be- 
lieved necessary to vindicate indeterminism in order to 
save human freedom. 

4. Freedom and Indeterminism 

This is quite mistaken. Ethics has, so to speak, no 
moral interest in the purely theoretical question of "de- 
terminism or indeterminism?," but only a theoretical 



150 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

interest, namely: in so far as it seeks the laws of con- 
duct, and can find them only to the extent that causal- 
ity holds. But the question of whether man is morally 
free (that is, has that freedom which, as we shall show, 
is the presupposition of moral responsibility) is alto- 
gether different from the problem of determinism. 
Hume was especially clear on this point. He indi- 
cated the inadmissible confusion of the concepts of 
"indeterminism" and "freedom"; but he retained, in- 
appropriately, the word "freedom" for both, calling the 
one freedom of "the will," the other, genuine kind, 
"freedom of conduct." He showed that morality is 
interested only in the latter, and that such freedom, in 
general, is unquestionably to be attributed to mankind. 
And this is quite correct. Freedom means the opposite 
of compulsion; a man is free if he does not act under 
compulsion, and he is compelled or lyifree when he is 
hindered from without in the realization of his natural 
desires. Hence he is unfree when he is locked up, or 
chained, or when someone forces him at the point of a 
gun to do what otherwise he would not do. This is 
quite clear, and everyone will admit that the everyday 
or legal notion of the lack of freedom is thus correctly 
interpreted, and that a man will be considered quite 
free and responsible if no such external compulsion is 
exerted upon him. There are certain cases which lie 
between these clearly described ones, as, say, when 
someone acts under the influence of alcohol or a nar- 
cotic. In such cases we consider the man to be more 
or less unfree, and hold him less accountable, because 



WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 151 

we rightly view the influence of the drug as "external," 
even though it is found within the body; it prevents 
him from making decisions in the manner peculiar to 
his nature. If he takes the narcotic of his own will, we 
make him completely responsible for this act and trans- 
fer a part of the responsibility to the consequences, 
making, as it were, an average or mean condemnation 
of the whole. In the case also of a person who is men- 
tally ill we do not consider him free with respect to 
those acts in which the disease expresses itself, because 
we view the illness as a disturbing factor which hinders 
the normal functioning of his natural tendencies. We 
make not him but his disease responsible. 

5. The Nature of Responsibility 

But what does this really signify? What do we 
mean by this concept of responsibility which goes along 
with that of "freedom," and which plays such an im- 
portant role in morality ? It is easy to attain complete 
clarity in this matter; we need only carefully deter- 
mine the manner in which the concept is used. What 
is the case in practice when we impute "responsibility" 
to a person? What is our aim in doing this? The 
judge has to discover who is responsible for a given act 
in order that he may punish him. We are inclined to 
be less concerned with the inquiry as to who deserves 
reward for an act, and we have no special officials for 
this; but of course the principle would be the same. 
But let us stick to punishment in order to make the 



152 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

idea clear. What is punishment, actually? The view 
still often expressed, that it is a natural retaliation for 
past wrong, ought no longer to be defended in cultivated 
society; for the opinion that an increase in sorrow can 
be "made good again" by further sorrow is altogether 
barbarous. Certainly the origin of punishment may 
lie in an impulse of retaliation or vengeance; but what 
is such an impulse except the instinctive desire to de- 
stroy the cause of the deed to be avenged, by the de- 
struction of or injury to the malefactor? Punishment 
is concerned only with the institution of causes, of mo- 
tives of conduct, and this alone is its meaning. Punish- 
ment is an educative measure, and as such is a means 
to the formation of motives, which are in part to pre- 
vent the wrongdoer from repeating the act (reforma- 
tion) and in part to prevent others from committing a 
similar act (intimidation). Analogously, in the case 
of reward we are concerned with an incentive. 

Hence the question regarding responsibility is the 
question: Who, in a given case, is to be punished? 
Who is to be considered the true wrongdoer? This 
problem is not identical with that regarding the orig- 
inal instigator of the act; for the great-grandparents of 
the man, from whom he inherited his character, might 
in the end be the cause, or the statesmen who are re- 
sponsible for his social milieu, and so forth. But the 
"doer" is the one upon whom the motive must have 
acted in order, with certainty, to have prevented the 
act (or called it forth, as the case may be). Considera- 



WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 153 

tion of remote causes is of no help here, for in the first 
place their actual contribution cannot be determined, 
and in the second place they are generally out of reach. 
Rather, we must find the person in whom the decisive 
junction of causes lies. The question of who is re- 
sponsible is the question concerning the correct point 
of application of the motive. And the important thing 
is that in this its meaning is completely exhausted; be- 
hind it there lurks no mysterious connection between 
transgression and requital, which is merely indicated 
by the described state of affairs. It is a matter only of 
knowing who is to be punished or rewarded, in order 
that punishment and reward function as such be able 
to achieve their goal. 

Thus, all the facts connected with the concepts of 
responsibility and imputation are at once made intelli- 
gible. We do not charge an insane person with re- 
sponsibility, for the very reason that he offers no uni- 
fied point for the application of a motive. It would 
be pointless to try to affect him by means of promises 
or threats, when his confused soul fails to respond to 
such influence because its normal mechanism is out of 
order. We do not try to give him motives, but try to 
heal him (metaphorically, we make his sickness re- 
sponsible, and try to remove its causes). When a man 
is forced by threats to commit certain acts we do not 
blame him, but the one who held the pistol at his 
breast. The reason is clear: the act would have been 
prevented had we been able to restrain the person who 



154 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

threatened him; and this person is the one whom we 
must influence in order to prevent similar acts in the 
future. 

6. The Consciousness of Responsibility 

But much more important than the question of 
when a man is said to be responsible is that of when he 
himself feels responsible. Our whole treatment would 
be untenable if it gave no explanation of this. It is, 
then, a welcome confirmation of the view here de- 
veloped that the subjective feeling of responsibility 
coincides with the objective judgment. It is a fact of ex- 
perience that, in general, the person blamed or con- 
demned is conscious of the fact that he was "rightly" 
taken to account of course, under the supposition that 
no error has been made, that the assujped state of affairs 
actually occurred. What is this consciousness of hav- 
ing been the true doer of the act, the actual instigator? 
Evidently not merely that it was he who took the steps 
required for its performance; but there must be added 
the awareness that he did it "independently," "of his 
own initiative," or however it be expressed. This feel- 
ing is simply the consciousness of freedom, which is 
merely the knowledge of having acted of one's own de- 
sires. And "one's own desires" are those which have 
their origin in the regularity of one's character in the 
given situation, and are not imposed by an external 
power, as explained above. The absence of the external 
power expresses itself in the well-known feeling (usu- 



WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 155 

ally considered characteristic of the consciousness of 
freedom) that one could also have acted otherwise. 
How this indubitable experience ever came to be an 
argument in favor of indeterminism is incomprehen- 
sible to me. It is of course obvious that I should have 
acted differently had I willed something else; but the 
feeling never says that I could also have willed some- 
thing else, even though this is true, if, that is, other mo- 
tives had been present. And it says even less that under 
exactly the same inner and outer conditions I could also 
have willed something else. How could such a feel- 
ing inform me of anything regarding the purely theo- 
retical question of whether the principle of causality 
holds or not ? Of course, after what has been said on 
the subject, I do not undertake to demonstrate the prin- 
ciple, but I do deny that from any such fact of con- 
sciousness the least follows regarding the principle's 
validity. This feeling is not the consciousness of the 
absence of a cause, but of something altogether differ- 
ent, namely, of freedom, which consists in the fact that 
I can act as I desire. 

Thus the feeling of responsibility assumes that I 
acted freely, that my own desires impelled me; and if 
because of this feeling I willingly suffer blame for my 
behavior or reproach myself, and thereby admit that I 
might have acted otherwise, this means that other be- 
havior was compatible with the laws of volition of 
course, granted other motives. And I myself desire the 
existence of such motives and bear the pain (regret and 
sorrow) caused me by my behavior so that its repetition 



156 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

will be prevented. To blame oneself means just to 
apply motives of improvement to oneself, which is usu- 
ally the task of the educator. But if, for example, one 
does something under the influence of torture, feelings 
of guilt and regret are absent, for one knows that ac- 
cording to the laws of volition no other behavior was 
possible no matter what ideas, because of their feeling 
tones, might have functioned as motives. The impor- 
tant thing, always, is that the feeling of responsibility 
means the realization that one's self, one's own psychic 
processes constitute the point at which motives must be 
applied in order to govern the acts of one's body. 

7. Causality as the Presupposition of Responsibility 

We can speak of motives only in a causal context; thus 
it becomes clear how very much the concept of respon- 
sibility rests upon that of causation, that is, upon the 
regularity of volitional decisions. In fact if we should 
conceive of a decision as utterly without any cause (tins 
would in all strictness be the indeterministic presuppo- 
sition) then the act would be entirely a matter of chance, 
for chance is identical with the absence of a cause; there 
is no other opposite of causality. Could we under such 
conditions make the agent responsible? Certainly not. 
Imagine a man, always calm, peaceful and blameless, 
who suddenly falls upon and begins to beat a stranger. 
He is held and questioned regarding the motive of his 
action, to which he answers, in his opinion truthfully, 
as we assume: "There was no motive for my behavior. 



WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 157 

Try as I may I can discover no reason. My volition was 
without any cause I desired to do so, and there is sim- 
ply nothing else to be said about it." We should shake 
our heads and call him insane, because we have to be- 
lieve that there was a cause, and lacking any other we 
must assume some mental disturbance as the only cause 
remaining; but certainly no one would hold him to be 
responsible. If decisions were causeless there would be 
no sense in trying to influence men; and we see at once 
that this is the reason why we could not bring such a 
man to account, but would always have only a shrug of 
the shoulders in answer to his behavior. One can easily 
determine that in practice we make an agent the more 
responsible the more motives we can find for his con- 
duct. If a man guilty of an atrocity was an enemy of 
his victim, if previously he had shown violent tenden- 
cies, if some special circumstance angered him, then we 
impose severe punishment upon him; while the fewer 
the reasons to be found for an offense the less do we con- 
demn the agent, but make "unlucky chance," a momen- 
tary aberration, or something of the sort, responsible. 
We do not find the causes of misconduct in his charac- 
ter, and therefore we do not try to influence it for the 
better: this and only this is the significance of the fact 
that we do not put the responsibility upon him. And 
he too feels this to be so, and says, "I cannot under- 
stand how such a thing could have happened to me." 
In general we know very well how to discover the 
causes of conduct in the characters of our fellow men; 
and how to use this knowledge in the prediction of their 



158 WHEN IS A MAN RESPONSIBLE? 

future behavior, often with as much certainty as that 
with which we know that a lion and a rabbit will behave 
quite differently in the same situation. From all this 
it is evident that in practice no one thinks of question- 
ing the principle of causality, that, thus, the attitude of 
the practical man offers no excuse to the metaphysician 
for confusing freedom from compulsion with the ab- 
sence of a cause. If one makes clear to himself that a 
causeless happening is identical with a chance happen- 
ing, and that, consequently, an indetermined will would 
destroy all responsibility, then every desire will cease 
which might be father to an indeterministic thought. 
No one can prove determinism, but it is certain that we 
assume its validity in all of our practical life, and that 
in particular we can apply the concept of responsibility 
to human conduct only in so far as the causal principle 
holds of volitional processes. 

For a final clarification I bring together again a list 
of those concepts which tend, in the traditional treat- 
ment of the "problem of freedom," to be confused. In 
the place of the concepts on the left are put, mistakenly, 
those of the right, and those in the vertical order form 
a chain, so that sometimes the previous confusion is the 
cause of that which follows: 

Natural Law. Law of State. 

Determinism (Causality). Compulsion. 

(Universal Validity) . (Necessity) . 

Indeterminism (Chance). Freedom. 

(No Cause) . (No Compulsion) . 



CHAPTER VIII 
What Paths Lead to Value? 

Prepared by the questions already asked, and, let us 
hope, by the answers given, we turn now to consider 
the main ethical problem. Following the considera- 
tions of Chapter I, we could give it no other form than, 
"Why does man act morally ? (or, "Why is he moral ?" 
But this comes to the same thing, for in the end his 
character can be known only through his conduct). 
Since, in two earlier chapters, we attempted to answer 
the questions "What are the motives of human con- 
duct?" and "What is the meaning of moral?" it 
appears that we need only unite the results there found 
to have the solution of our problem at hand. 

This shall, in fact, be our procedure. But in carry- 
ing it out we see that we touch on all of the points 
which, in discussions of moral matters, constitute the 
most important topics of dispute. In order to be able 
to decide this dispute we have, in the remaining 
chapters, analyzed certain questions whose answers 
are presupposed by many of the following considera- 
tions. In such considerations we come upon questions 
which are not only the most important human ques- 
tions, but which are the only important questions. 
For only those things are important which relate to 

159 



160 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

values, and it lies in the nature of the problems of value 
that all without exception are affected in some way 
by the main problem of ethics. Of course this is not 
the place in which to decide practical moral problems, 
but we shall at least have to establish general principles 
with whose help such decisions may be facilitated, 
wherever it is possible. 

The answer to the question of what in general is 
the motive of human conduct ran: in the case of con- 
scious volitional conduct (ethics is not interested in 
other activities) men are always determined by feel- 
ings, and in such a manner that they always strive for 
that goal, among those considered, the idea of which 
is characterized, at the time of choice, by the least pain 
or the greatest pleasure (the nature of this comparison 
of magnitudes has been carefully elucidated). 

And the answer to the question,," What is the mean- 
ing of moral ?" was, "That conduct which society be- 
lieves will best further its own welfare." 

If we put the two results together we see that the 
main problem, "Why do men act morally?" will be 
solved as soon as we can show how the idea of the 
things which appear useful to society can also be pleas- 
ant for the individual agent himself. Moreover, the 
explanation must make clear why this is not always so, 
for there are also cases of immoral conduct. 

First, we must take care to understand what is meant 
by "explanation" in this context. In many cases it is 
certainly quite impossible to give a psychological ex- 
planation of why a definite experience is pleasant. 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 161 

Thus it is an ultimate, irreducible fact that a sweet taste- 
sensation is generally pleasant, while, on the contrary, 
a very bitter or sour one is unpleasant; and the same 
holds of the feeling components of every sensuous 
experience. There are at best but physiological or 
biological explanations for the joy we experience in a 
saturated color, in the sexual act, in the satisfaction of 
thirst, and so forth; and these do not interest the 
philosopher. These facts have never been considered 
as problematic. The philosophers have never asked, 
"Why does it please men to eat, to dance, to rest?" 
They asked only, "How can it please men to do what 
pleases other si" 

Therefore there are two classes of joys: those which 
we take as natural, elementary, not in need of any 
explanation; and those which do not seem to be self- 
evident, but excite philosophic wonder. To this latter 
class aesthetics and ethics owe their existence. Their 
task is to explain why feelings of pleasure (or pain) 
occur also where, at first, we do not expect them (with 
what reason, though?). The joys of the second sort 
can, evidently, be explained only because they can be 
referred to those of the first kind. Knowledge always 
consists only in such a reduction of what is to be ex- 
plained to something not requiring explanation. Thus 
it must be shown how the aesthetic and ethical joys 
and valuations are derived from or compounded of 
"natural" or "primitive" feelings of pleasure. We shall 
speak later of the psychological laws which govern the 
"combination" of feelings. At present the following 



162 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

problem faces us: what are the primitive feeling re- 
actions which may be considered so natural that an 
explanation of all the remaining ones, which refer to 
them, will satisfy us as a complete explanation? 

i. What Are the "Natural" Impulses? 

Most philosophers have been altogether too naive 
in their assumptions regarding what they considered 
to be primitive human nature. They are most to blame 
if they failed to see the problem, and thus failed to 
indicate by what means they actually wished to make 
their explanation proceeding as they did from some 
confused idea of man as a naturally egoistic creature. 
How confused such an idea is was shown in Chapter 
III. The for the most part obscurely expressed funda- 
mental idea was, perhaps, that tjie natural impulses 
are those which are absolutely necessary for mere bio- 
logical existence, hence those directed upon ingestion, 
warmth, and reproduction. Thus other men are con- 
sidered only as so many obstacles to the satisfaction 
of one's own impulses; for other men, too, claim the 
things needed for existence. And because men quar- 
rel mutually over these things there arises the "war 
of all against all," which Hobbes assumed to be the 
primitive state, since he, in fact, began with the de- 
scribed presuppositions. Now it is undoubtedly true 
and interesting that, beginning with these assump- 
tions, one can deduce the necessity of ending the bel- 
lum omnium contra omnes by, as it were, a peace, and 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 163 

reaching a modus vivendi in which each leaves to the 
others a part of the world's goods, in order thus to 
enjoy his own share in safety. As we see, in this man- 
ner one easily gains the insight that for a human being 
of such nature it would be best (and indeed the best 
thing for the preservation of his life) if each one ob- 
served such rules of conduct, approximately, as are 
actually established by the legislation of a state. 

But the question of what would be the best for a 
man is to be sharply distinguished from the other 
question, of why he actually does what is best. In 
order to answer it, following this line of thought, we 
must now make an assumption regarding the indi- 
vidual's intelligence. If everyone possessed the keen 
understanding of Hobbes, and knew how to use it in 
making his decisions, then under certain conditions a 
sufficiently strong motive could be formed for the dis- 
covery of and obedience to such a rule of behavior: the 
idea of the personal joy to be obtained by obeying the 
law would constitute such a motive, because of a trans- 
ference of its pleasure-tone to the idea of the means 
leading to this end. But since in fact the intellectual 
capacities are not so great, and since mere intellectual 
operations have very little influence on the feelings, 
the motive of proper conduct is not the result of such 
a calculation. Additional motives must be supplied, 
and society introduces sanctions, that is, threatens trans- 
gression of the rules with artificial punishment. And 
now the motive does not consist in the joy of the fore- 
seen natural consequences of the act, but in the fear 



164 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

of the consequences of wrong conduct, that is, fear of 
pain. In this fear lies the beginning of what is called 
conscience; of its further development, whereby it be- 
comes relatively independent of external sanctions, one 
can, to a certain extent, also give a psychological ex- 
planation. 

But this whole chain of reasoning has little value, be- 
cause it begins with a fictional human nature which 
quite definitely does not correspond to reality. The 
most important ties that naturally bind men to their 
environment are here left out of account. Just as one 
cannot think of man's nature apart from his breath- 
ing, which joins him with the external world, so we 
cannot consider his nature independently of the human 
atmosphere in which he lives from his birth on. In 
other words: the social impulses, by virtue of which 
the behavior of others constitutes aji immediate source 
of pleasure and pain for him, are just as "natural" as 
the most primitive bodily needs; and are not derived 
from them in some roundabout way. If such genesis 
of the social impulses must be assumed anywhere, it 
has long since been completed on prehuman evolu- 
tionary levels; these impulses are present in some form 
or other in all higher animals. The need for compan- 
ionship is found very widespread in the herd instinct, 
and the same holds of those instincts which aid in the 
rearing of the young; and hundreds of similar exam- 
ples are generally known. Ought the philosopher to 
search for their genesis, and meddle in biology? He 
will certainly not desire to undertake this task: his 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 165 

interests lie in another direction, and he must formu- 
late his questions so that they may be answered by 
an investigation of the human soul alone. 

2. New Formulation of the Question 

But, if Hobbes' fiction is not acceptable, what other 
point of departure shall we accept? What then are 
the "natural" human dispositions? Which of man's 
possible ends-in-view can we assume to be naturally 
pleasant, and not surprising and in need of explana- 
tion? Shall we add to hunger, thirst, and the sexual 
impulse, say, the mother instinct, and the impulse to- 
ward companionship, and four or five other inclina- 
tions, and then on this new basis begin Hobbes' whole 
deduction anew? In this manner the philosopher 
would win himself no great merit. Of course, with 
the help of the social impulses it would be easier for 
him to explain the observance of laws, and the moral 
behavior proceeding from this, than it would be upon 
the basis of the Hobbesian presuppositions. He would 
be able to ascribe to the altruistic inclinations a part in 
the stirrings of "conscience," and would stay closer to 
the facts in his considerations. But his explanation 
would never be able to do full justice to the facts, for 
the selection of impulses which he assumes to be 
"natural" would always remain arbitrary. It would 
always be a matter for doubt whether other equally 
primitive dispositions were not to be added, or whether, 
on the contrary, the number assumed could not be 



166 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

reduced. But as long as this is the case, the whole 
deduction loses its peculiar interest: if one may suppose 
the most diverse social inclinations to be proper to 
human nature, then moral conduct in general ceases 
to be surprising. One is convinced in principle that 
morality is in complete conformity with human nature, 
and it becomes a question of secondary importance as 
to which impulses in particular must be adduced to 
give an account of why men actually do what society 
demands of them. 

This whole explanatory procedure is unsatisfying be- 
cause it fails to emphasize what, at bottom, most in- 
terests the philosopher, namely, the differences in hu- 
man behavior. He desires to explain morality, and 
therefore must assume men to be creatures endowed 
with definite dispositions. The interest not only of 
the moralists, but also of the psycl^logists, is centered, 
primarily, upon the question: Why does this man have 
feelings in conformity with moral laws, while that 
man does not ? Why is one man good, the other bad ? 
What does the one have which the other lacks ? And 
to this is joined the practical problem of how he can be 
supplied with what he lacks. 

In these questions we are not at all helped by the 
distinction between natural and derived impulses. We 
shall not wish to asume that the "bad" man is natural, 
and that the "good" man has, in addition to the prim- 
itive dispositions, certain others developed from them; 
we shall, rather, accept every inclination which we 
find in men as belonging to human nature, exclud- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 167 

ing only those which are notoriously morbid, and gen- 
erally recognized as such (in which we need not draw 
the boundaries too sharply, and in any case we shall 
include the characteristic of rarity in the criterion of 
morbidity). And now our task would be to explain 
moral and immoral decisions in particular cases, or 
rather in typical cases, by indicating which of the avail- 
able stock of impulses have actually been functioning 
as motives. 

The solution of the problem thus formulated would 
be extremely difficult. It would require an under- 
standing of the realm of impulses and their nuances 
and demand an insight into the laws of emotional life 
which we do not possess. And even if we did possess 
such knowledge its application would meet with the 
greatest difficulties because of its extreme complexity. 
Therefore it is necessary to simplify the problem 
further, so that we may ignore the concrete obstacles 
and speak only of those general principles necessary for 
the solution of the problem. 

To this end we turn our attention to a further cir- 
cumstance, which our considerations have neglected 
hitherto. We have viewed man's inclinations as fixed 
constituents of his nature or character, but it is their 
essential property to be, to a considerable degree, 
changeable. The impulses do not form a solid frame- 
work of the soul, but constitute rather a plastic mass, 
which, under the influence of the environment, is 
constantly changing. The philosopher has a much 
greater interest in these changes than in individual 



i68 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

differences of conduct and character. The question 
of their origin and disappearance is more important 
than that of their differences, and by the transforma- 
tion of these inclinations those differences can be cre- 
ated or destroyed; or, to put it crudely, a better man 
can be made of a bad one. Although the impulses 
are of many forms and their connections very com- 
plicated, there is, following from their nature, a simple 
law governing their changes, to which all of them are 
subject. Hence, what is most important in them for 
us is open to knowledge; without its being necessary 
for one to fall into the difficulties which, because of 
the complexity of the psychic life, grow out of a strict 
explanation of human decisions. If, in this manner, 
we pay less attention to the dispositions themselves 
than to the laws governing their changes, we introduce 
a differential calculus, as it were, instead of the usual 
one; and the form of the question must be altered. 
Therefore we renounce the attempt to give an explicit 
answer to the question of why men are moral. And 
we do this with no regret, because everything important 
concerning it is implicitly answered by the reply to the 
question which we now ask: by what means are human 
dispositions toward moral behavior increased or de- 
creased? 

This form of the question will forthwith undergo a 
further change, and then take, approximately, the form 
which we have already given it in the chapter heading. 
For the present we see, at least, why the main question 
(the answer to which constitutes, according to the con- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 169 

siderations of Chapter I, the ultimate goal of all ethical 
inquiry) could not appear in the present chapter head- 
ing. 

3. Moral Suggestion 

The influences which affect a man's inclinations for 
a change, favorably or unfavorably, can be grouped, 
roughly, into those which influence him from without, 
and those which result from his own conduct. The 
division is not precise, for the external world is usually 
more or less involved in influences of the second sort; 
but it serves our present purpose. 

We need devote only a brief discussion to the factors 
of the first sort, as being less important to ethics. In 
doing so we exclude purely physical or physiological 
factors, because they do not enter into this context 
(even though the opinion has been expressed that future 
science will control human character merely by the in- 
fusion of certain hormones), and restrict ourselves to 
those of psychology. Here we come upon suggestion, 
which plays a role from childhood up in the formation 
of desires and inclinations, the importance of which 
can hardly be overestimated. A thing can become the 
goal of desire if, without giving any reasons, it is but 
constantly praised. If we always hear that a thing is 
good, even though it is not stated why or for what it is 
good, the idea of that thing becomes pleasant; we de- 
sire to make its acquaintance or to possess it. If we 
see many desiring the same thing, if, say, we observe 



170 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

how an irresistible current draws individuals and na- 
tions to the south or the west a similar desire awakens 
in us. The best-known example of the process of mak- 
ing the idea of an object pleasant by means of sugges- 
tion, and thus making the object itself into a goal of 
desire, is the advertisement. In order to achieve its 
astonishing effect it needs, often, only to associate the 
name of the object with an attractive picture; the 
pleasure in the picture alone has the consequence that 
the beholder likes to think of the object; it becomes 
valuable to him. Of course, if, in addition, it does 
not possess some utility, the purchaser will be deceived, 
and will reject the advertisement as misleading. But 
because of the difficulty, frequently, of determining its 
utility value, suggestion often remains the only source 
of the pleasure which the object is able to produce. 

What is the case with morality? Its precepts, too, 
can be made valuable by praise; for the method of 
suggestion is, in principle, applicable to every object. 
And in fact this means is used to create motives for 
moral conduct; the educator presents moral behavior 
to the child as the most excellent of all goals, he takes 
every opportunity of extolling the grandeur of noble 
deeds, of recommending noble persons as patterns that 
cannot be lauded too highly. Certainly in such a man- 
ner joy is aroused in good deeds and in good men, and 
the desire is created of emulating them. Here there 
is, of course, at once added a second motive, difficult 
to separate from the first: if good deeds are really 
universally praised and the doer of them enjoys the 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 171 

respect of his fellow men, then the obedient pupil will 
share in this welcome consequence of good behavior; 
and thus new motives are added. To be sure, experi- 
ence can teach him later that noble conduct is often 
misinterpreted, and earns him persecution instead of 
honor and recognition. And this would work against 
the pleasure induced by suggestion, as in the case of 
a cheap article greatly praised in advertisement, if the 
suggestion is not so formulated as to run no risk from 
this quarter. As a matter of fact the good educator 
does not speak of external results; he lauds decisions 
which are made independently of another person's 
knowledge, and says that the good which is done se- 
cretly is especially praiseworthy. In this manner the 
emphasis upon the pleasure produced by suggestion is 
separated from other motives. Of course an unpleas- 
ant motive can be created in the same way: the expres- 
sion of universal disgust for a definite mode of behavior 
makes the idea of it unpleasant also, even though no 
reason for the disgust be given. 

This process of forming motives by suggestion is 
thoroughly effective, and there are no objections to it. 
Or might it be condemned "from the moral standpoint" ? 
Clearly only if the value of a thing lay entirely in the 
fact that it was universally praised; in which case it 
would not seem to us to be genuine, but only, as it 
were, a soap bubble, which would collapse at the first 
impact. It would be a piece of worthless paper which 
passed from hand to hand in a closed envelope and was 
acknowledged as payment by everyone because each 



172 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

believed that a check lay within until someone opened 
the envelope and cried "Fraud!" 

One renders no great service to morality by wishing 
to brand the opening of the envelope itself as immoral 
conduct, that is, to ban the question, "Why in the 
world should morality be praised?" (which Kant and 
the champions of absolute value theories are inclined 
to do). Thus Nietzsche might come along and say: 
behold, I have been the first to unveil so-called morality, 
and what did I find? Merely that the traditional 
precepts have indeed a real value, but only for those 
who impose them upon others and who do not them- 
selves obey; for these others the precepts have only the 
value induced by suggestion, by which the masters 
delude them, and otherwise none at all. 

Still, it might be possible that society, which, as we 
saw, is the originator of moral ^precepts, resembles a 
dishonest merchant who praises worthless goods for his 
own ends. If this were so, then of course my moral 
behavior would bring joy to others (the society which 
commands is always composed of the others. I cannot 
count myself of their number), but for me my behavior 
would have only an apparent value which the others 
were clever enough to suggest to me. But such is not 
in the least the case. And should an individual once 
doubt this and, untroubled by moral commands, give 
free rein to his impulses, society would at once react 
with the imposition of sanctions, and would, by pun- 
ishment, show him a true value of morality, consisting 
simply in avoiding these sanctions. 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 173 

And thus we would arrive at the other external fac- 
tors which, in addition to suggestion, influence human 
inclinations: namely, punishment and reward, which 
see to it that in fact feelings of pleasure are the result 
of following desired modes of conduct, and that pain 
is the consequence of forbidden conduct. The ideas 
of such results are then stressed correspondingly and 
function as motives. 

But these matters have already been touched upon 
several times, and are familiar to every child. Con- 
sideration of these external factors in the formation and 
repression of dispositions leads only to insight into rela- 
tively external processes, and makes intelligible only 
the roughest outlines of conduct, as we noticed pre- 
viously. Suggestion and reference to social sanctions 
are of course only the most primitive means of the pro- 
duction of motive feelings; the subtle influences which 
most interest the philosopher are not to be attained by 
their help. We already know that the social impulses 
themselves contribute stronger and more permanent 
motives. 

Hence it is time to turn to those character-forming 
influences which come from within and are established 
by one's own acts. 

4. Motive Feelings and Realization Feelings 

All volitional conduct comes to pass in this manner: 
one of several different conflicting ends-in-view finally 
gains the foreground of consciousness and represses 



174 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

the others; this, of course, occurs as soon as the positive 
difference between its feeling-tone and those of the 
others passes beyond a certain point, so that the most 
pleasant or least painful idea emerges victoriously. 
The feeling connected with the idea (that is, with the 
so-called end-in-view), in particular the feeling joined 
to the victorious idea, we called the motive feeling. 
And it was one of our most important observations 
that the feeling which the idea of a definite state 
awakens in us need not be at all similar to the feeling 
which belongs to the state itself when it is realized. 
We shall call the latter the realization feeling. A real- 
ization pleasure as well as a realization pain can thus 
correspond to a motive pleasure, and vice versa. We 
must, as we stated earlier, distinguish sharply between 
the idea of a pleasant state and the pleasant idea of a 
state. < 

Hence an unpleasant effect can be imagined with 
pleasure, that is, can be desired and willed. It is this 
fact to which one can rightly point in order to refute 
the thesis, carelessly formulated by hedonism, that men 
can seek nothing but "happiness." For happiness con- 
sists always of pleasant states. It is not the case that 
a de facto unpleasant state can be a goal only so long 
as its true feeling components are not known; but a 
man can very well know that he is proceeding toward 
unhappiness and still do so. 

In spite of this, in the thesis of the exclusive striving 
for happiness there lies, deep within, a kernel of truth; 
and I deliberately described it as carelessly "formu- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 175 

lated." It is not merely the fact that all volition is 
determined just by the excess of pleasure in the motive 
experienced by him who wills, although this is im- 
portant enough; for this fact signifies that, in the last 
analysis, it is always only a matter of the feelings of 
the agent; that there is no possibility of influencing 
him in any other way than by arousing his own feel- 
ings; that, above all, there is no bridge from man to 
man which does not first lead over individual feelings. 
Here lies the source of the final, awful loneliness of 
man, from which there is no escape, because each in- 
dividual, each consciousness is enclosed within itself; 
so that its feelings can be only its own feelings and 
can never be felt also by another. The social impulses, 
too, but institute a mutual dependence among the 
feelings of different individuals; they cannot make 
these feelings identical, and one tries in vain by means 
of a metaphysic of "universal will" or "super-individual 
spirit" to conjure away the difficulty. 

It is, I say, not alone this fact of the exclusive deter- 
mination of the will of each individual by his own 
pleasure which constitutes the real essence of the propo- 
sition expressing the universal striving for happiness, 
but a different fact, the consideration of which will 
now lead us to the most important regularity which 
underlies the transformation of impulses by conduct. 
I refer to the fact that there is a certain dependence 
between the motive pleasure and the realization pleasure 
or pain, even though this is not so simple as hedonism 
assumed: namely, that the motive feeling and the real- 



i;6 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

ization feeling must either be both pleasant or both 
painful; that therefore, for example, the idea of a 
pleasant end must necessarily be a pleasant idea of the 
end. Experience teaches us that this is not always so, 
and often not even when the person who wills is per- 
fectly aware of the pain joined to the state for which 
he strives. However, two things may be said here in 
order to mitigate the importance of the facts which 
argue against the happiness thesis. 

First, one could say that the states thus striven for 
are, at best, of the "suffering" variety whose mixed 
character we have expressly indicated, and that their 
pleasure components had, perhaps, something to do 
with the possibility of such motivation. I believe that 
there is some truth in this argument, that, thus, the 
representation of a purely repulsive, hopeless condition 
may not be pleasant; and that jn the suffering which a 
resigned person takes upon himself there is always also 
represented a state of satisfaction in the consummated 
act; but this would alter nothing in the fact that suffer- 
ing is chosen in preference to other, pleasant situations. 

And, secondly, one might think that the idea of an 
unpleasant end could be pleasant only in so far as it 
did not picture the end itself exactly, and left out es- 
sential or other features. If one should picture the 
end to oneself with perfect liveliness, as it in fact will 
be when realized, and neither obliterate nor palliate 
anything in the idea, then it must certainly exhibit the 
same feeling components as the end itself would, were 
it realized. In this argument, too, there may be some 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 177 

truth; but since the agreement between the idea and 
what the idea represents can never be perfect, and since 
we must deal with psychic processes as they actually 
take place, we cannot make this argument basic. 

5. The Assimilation of Motive Feelings to Realization 

Feelings 

Now it seems to me that behind these objections 
there lies a real point, namely: the discrepancy between 
the motive feeling and the realization feeling, even 
though it cannot be denied, still represents a situation 
which cannot endure. That is, whenever such a dis- 
crepancy between the feelings occurs, forces are at 
once set to work to equalize them. By means of the 
natural process which leads from motives through con- 
duct to realization and then to new motives and con- 
duct, the impulses (which are the dispositions to have 
definite feelings in the presence of definite ideas) are 
transformed, so that the motive feeling and realization 
feeling come into agreement with one another. 

The mechanism according to which this takes place 
is easy to understand. If a goal that is thought of 
with pleasure is actually attained and arouses strong 
feelings of pain in the agent, then the pain will, in the 
future, associate itself with the newly formed ideas of 
one's goal, and will work against the pleasure tone 
which it formerly had. Upon repetition this tendency 
will increase, and so on until the goal no longer can be 
desired, because at last to the pain of the realization there 



178 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

corresponds a painful motive. If, conversely, a condi- 
tion at first shunned is realized once or often against 
the wishes of the individual, so that the joy which 
actually lies within it is experienced by him, it will 
inevitably come to pass that the idea of that state slowly 
(or even suddenly) becomes pleasant, and that thus 
an inclination arises to renew it. And further, if a 
situation that hitherto had been always pleasant in its 
realization somehow ceases to be so, for example, be- 
cause of a physiological process ("satiety" and so forth) 
then the pain now experienced in it will presently be 
transmitted to the idea of the situation; and the im- 
pulse directed upon it disappears. This is all nothing 
but the usual process of "experience," and one can 
easily find hundreds of examples of it in daily life. It 
is obvious that this process, as is the case with every 
natural process, can be cut across by others with an 
opposite effect; thus insane ideas or constant and sys- 
tematic obstacles can hinder the accommodation of 
motive feelings to realization feelings in special cases. 
We take cognizance of this in saying only that there is 
a tendency toward assimilation of that discrepancy. 
But this tendency is in the long run insurmountable; 
and, since we assert its existence, we have actually 
formulated a general rule which governs the whole 
emotional life, and which can serve us as a guide in the 
solution of our problem. 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 179 

6. The foundation of Hedonism 

What follows from the principle of the assimilation 
of motive feelings to realization feelings ? 

First, that a complex of dispositions in which these 
disagree cannot be stable, but bears within itself the 
tendency toward change as experience progresses. If 
we wish to generate lasting dependable dispositions in 
a person, we must take care that the realization pleasure 
contains what the motive pleasure promises. In other 
words: the principle of assimilation makes it impos- 
sible to prescribe a definite mode of behavior per- 
manently to a man if obedience to the rule brings him 
only an increase in pain. Expressed still otherwise: 
the motive pleasure can be permanently kindled only 
by realization pleasure; in all other attempts to nourish 
it, it is finally extinguished. Of course, fixed (innate) 
impulses can be so powerful in the case of a definitely 
formed physiological constitution that the principle of 
assimilation remains powerless against them, at least 
during the individual's lifetime; and then we ascribe 
a "morbid" strength to them. But such inclinations 
as we produce in men (by means of education in its 
widest sense) have no prospect of survival if the prin- 
ciple works against them. Only those desires are 
stable, only those inclinations guarantee harmony which 
are directed toward truly pleasant ends, or, if one pre- 
fers, toward happiness. This seems to me to be the 



i8o WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

truth which underlies the assertion that man can strive 
only for happiness. 

If to the motive pleasure there corresponds a pure 
realization pain, then the individual feels himself some- 
how deceived, even if he knew beforehand that the 
result would cause him suffering. He feels himself 
betrayed by his desires. We can now say that there is 
only one way to create motives of conduct which will 
prevail against all influences; and this is by reference 
to actual happy consequences. 

This is, of course, an ancient truth. We know that 
it expresses nothing more than the principle upon which 
rests punishment and reward and the procedure of sanc- 
tions in the state, in religion, and in daily life. And 
of course, when we claim the way of sanctions as the 
only ultimate one in the case of moral behavior also, 
this seems to be a very uninspiring attitude, upon which 
recent ethics looks down with contempt. Such con- 
tempt is perhaps justified in reference to the extremely 
primitive argument with which hedonism and eudae- 
monism are accustomed to defend their position; but 
the above derivation has nothing in common with such 
arguments, and neither do the traditional hedonistic 
formulations coincide with our thesis, which says only 
that invincible motives for obeying moral rules exist 
only when pleasure follows upon such obedience. 

If we review for a moment, we see that we have now 
provisionally answered the question, "How are human 
dispositions toward moral behavior strengthened or 
weakened ?" in such a manner that we say: the dispo- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 181 

sitions toward moral conduct in a man can, indeed, be 
strengthened by external means, such as suggestion 
and artificial punishment and rewards; but the in- 
clinations thus created must be transient and be wiped 
out, inevitably, by the process of assimilation if moral 
conduct is not itself a source of pleasure, or does not 
disclose such sources. But if it does, then the motives, 
whatever be their origin, will be strengthened and 
made firm by this same process; and they will have 
the tendency to become permanent impulses. 

Therefore, in order to know the laws that govern 
the origin of inclinations toward moral behavior, it is 
necessary, above all, to investigate the pleasure value 
of such behavior itself. Everything depends upon 
whether it is valuable for the agent himself, that is, 
whether it is productive of pleasure. For if this be 
not the case the fairest motives run the danger of losing 
all their power. And they must finally lose it (per- 
haps only in the course of generations). If we imagine 
the associational assimilative process, whereby this oc- 
curs, transported into the light of reflective conscious- 
ness, we can say: a moment arrives at which a man 
finds no satisfactory answer to the question: why in 
the world should I act in this manner? other than: 
because it brings me happiness! It follows from the 
universally valid law of volition that he can will only 
such ends as are valuable for him. However, he will 
then distinguish genuine from spurious values: both 
are real, but the latter can be destroyed by the assimila- 
tive process. Spurious values exist by virtue of the 



182 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

pleasure which belongs to the idea of the end alone, 
and not to the end itself; while genuine values consist 
in those feelings of pleasure with which the end itself 
is experienced. 

Thus we are confronted by the question: are the 
ends commended to us in the moral precepts really 
genuine values for the individual, or do they consist 
in the feelings of pleasure with which society has been 
clever enough to equip the ideas of the ends desired 
by itself? We are confronted by the ancient problem: 
does virtue lead to happiness ? 

Should the answer chance to be in the affirmative we 
should certainly be quite satisfied, and should believe 
ourselves to have solved the fundamental ethical prob- 
lem in so far as this can be done by means of general 
considerations. But if, as many philosophers suppose, 
a negative answer must be given, we shoulS still like 
to know (running the risk that those philosophers will 
consider such a question unworthy) what does lead to 
happiness, if not virtue ? And, hence, we finally reach 
the question that constitutes our present chapter head- 
ing. We seek the path that leads to value; after finding 
it we shall see whether it is the same as the path of 
moral conduct or not. 

7. Happiness and the Capacity for Happiness 

In these final considerations we have several times 
used the word "happiness" somewhat carelessly, though 
we are aware of the considerable vagueness in its mean- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 183 

ing, which renders it unfit for the expression of precise 
thoughts. We have, evidently, used it as simply 
synonymous with pleasant states; but much more lies 
in the meaning of the word, namely, a superlative. 
By it we wish to designate not just any pleasant state, 
but those of maximum pleasure, the most joyful ex- 
periences. Indeed, many would hesitate to use the 
word at all for individual states, and would say that a 
life through which were spread many moderate joys 
contained more happiness than one which consisted 
of a few moments of the highest bliss, separated by 
long intervals of great pain. The essential immeasure- 
ability and incomparability of feelings, which we 
touched upon in Chapters II and IV, seem to make 
comparisons of happiness senseless and the word itself 
meaningless; but still there must, obviously, be some 
sense in which to make such distinctions in an individ- 
ual's life, for they do play an important practical role. 
And for our purposes, too, these distinctions are indis- 
pensable; for it would not in the least suffice to find the 
path to just anything valuable: we must rather seek 
the path to what is most valuable. If any more definite 
meaning can be found for this superlative, nothing 
would stand in the way of designating it by the word 
"happiness." For he who has seen, with us, that 
values are to be founded only upon feelings of pleasure 
will at once identify the concept of happiness with that 
of the most valuable. 

Hence it must be possible to find some substitute for 
the meaningless summation or addition of experiences 



184 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

of pleasure, by means of which they can somehow be 
compared and put into an order. We succeeded in find- 
ing a substitute in certain psychic processes for the 
pleasure factors which strive with one another in the 
motivation of volitional conduct (p. 40). However, 
here where we are not concerned with adjacent moti- 
vating feelings but with realization values, the difficulty 
is greater. I can offer no universally valid substitute; 
but perhaps it will suffice to point out a very important 
one, which fits definite cases, and which may possibly 
be generalized. If we think of two joys of which the 
one after enjoyment leaves a man essentially unchanged, 
while the gratification of the other makes a repetition 
of it or the enjoyment of another either difficult or 
impossible, then we shall be able to say of the second 
that, in all probability, it makes life less rich in pleas- 
ure, even if considered in itself it should be very great. 
Hence, we shall ascribe a much greater "happiness- 
value" to the first. (As an example of the second kind 
we may mention the use of poisonous intoxicants, or 
intense sensual pleasures which have a stupefying ef- 
fect, and so forth.) Thus we have here the possibility 
of speaking of the contribution of a particular joy to 
the "total pleasure," or of its effect upon the "totality 
of happiness," without having to perform any addition, 
and without thinking of the concept of the total sum 
itself. And we make use of this possibility by con- 
sidering the effect of the gratification of impulses upon 
the capacity of men for future feelings of pleasure; in 
short, upon their capacity for happiness. And there- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 185 

fore we take a step forward. For if we shall not be 
able to indicate more exactly the way leading to what 
is most valuable (and we certainly shall not be able 
to do so) we shall have pointed out, at least, a very 
important sign-post if we say it would in any case lead 
through such modes of behavior as least reduce the 
capacity for happiness, or perhaps even increase it. 
The capacity for feelings of pleasure is a property of 
the human constitution, and as such may be difficult 
to conceive, but it is still infinitely more easily compre- 
hended than the nebulous, ever-elusive concept of hap- 
piness itself. 

8. The Happiness Value of Social Impulses 

With the means now at our disposal, even though 
they are meagre enough, we can begin to advance 
toward the solution of our problem. If the mode of 
behavior leading to the most valuable life is that which 
procures for a man the greatest joys, along with the 
least restrictions on his capacity for happiness, then the 
immediate question is: what are the inclinations from 
which such behavior proceeds? 

More penetrating investigations than these can be 
must examine the various sorts of human impulses 
with respect to their power for bringing happiness; we 
rest satisfied with pointing out the most impressive 
facts which especially distinguish individual groups of 
motives. Here experience teaches us something which, 
strangely, is viewed by most people as very surprising, 



i86 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

and so paradoxical that they do not believe it at all, and 
actually are of the opinion that experience teaches us 
just the contrary; while it is in fact anything but won- 
derful. I have no doubt that experience indicates very 
clearly that the social impulses are those which best as- 
sure their bearers of a joyful life. 

The social impulses are those dispositions of a person 
by virtue of which the idea of a pleasant or unpleasant 
state of another person is itself a pleasant or unpleasant 
experience (also the mere perception of another creature, 
his presence alone, can, by virtue of such an impulse, 
elicit feelings of pleasure). The natural effect of these 
inclinations is that their bearer establishes the joyful 
states of others as ends of his conduct. And upon 
realization of these ends he enjoys the resultant pleas- 
ure; for not only the idea, but also the actual perception 
of the expression of joy pleases him. Hence there is a 
genuine value, for there is an agreement of the motive 
feeling and the realization feeling. 

The reason that the happiness value of social in- 
clinations seems a priori incredible to many philoso- 
phers lies clearly in the fact that these impulses are 
directed toward another's welfare; and must not the 
impulses which bring happiness to their bearer be 
directed, rather, toward his own welfare ? This view so 
widely held is in truth extremely shortsighted, and at 
its roots lie all of those misunderstandings which stand 
in the way of the insight into the facts described in 
Chapters II and III. There simply is no impulse 
directed toward "personal welfare/' and there can be 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 187 

none; for the very concept contains a sort of vicious 
circle. "Personal welfare," that is, one's own satisfac- 
tion, consists just in the gratification of impulses an 
impulse directed toward the satisfaction of all impulses 
is obviously nonsense. In itself (that is, apart from 
consequences) what an impulse is directed toward is 
quite indifferent to the resultant joy, and there is not 
the least essential reason why, for example, the pleasure 
in filling one's stomach should be in any way distin- 
guished from the joy one has upon looking into eyes 
shining with happiness. The latter joy may be more 
difficult to understand in biological-genetic terms, but 
this, above all, concerns neither the philosopher nor 
the psychologist. 

If I may consider this last example, the coarseness of 
which be forgiven, the above-mentioned criterion of 
the conservation of the capacity for happiness can be 
illustrated. The satisfaction of hunger as the condition 
of existence is of course also a presupposition of future 
joys. But it is common knowledge that the satisfaction 
of the impulse of nourishment is "salutary" only within 
definite limits; an excess can so alter the whole consti- 
tution that one's entire life becomes poorer, in that 
(even apart from direct illness) the ability to enjoy 
the highest pleasures is itself stifled by excessive gratifi- 
cation of the palate. And the same seems to hold of 
all impulses which correspond to immediate "bodily" 
needs: unrestrained gratification of these impulses 
diminishes the realization pleasure; and processes 
which dull the senses and result in enervation lead to 



i88 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

a reaction in the organism which diminishes its ca- 
pacity for happiness. Such impulses are indeed very 
necessary, but their happiness value is relatively small. 
Physiologically there corresponds to them a robust but 
coarse mechanism which is set in motion by strong 
sensory stimuli, but which fails to penetrate the higher 
centers, where the correlate of complicated, delicate 
"higher" inclinations is to be sought. Their satisfac- 
tion reacts quite differently upon the organism, making 
it ever more differentiated and more susceptible to new 
joys, indeed more sensitive on the whole. 

Thus we meet with the distinction and opposition of 
the "lower" and "higher" pleasures, which is really 
fundamental for the conduct of life, and has rightly 
played the greatest role in the wisdom of all ages. To 
be sure, it has often been misunderstood, as if it dealt 
with a primary distinction between "good" nd "bad" 
pleasures; and has increased the prejudice against 
"pleasure" and aided the theories of absolute value, 
which we saw to be so pernicious to ethics. Its true 
nature, however, is to be found only in the facts just 
described. 

Now the social impulses, too, belong to the "finer," 
"higher" group of impulses which presuppose a more 
complicated psychic life. No one will suppose that 
these impulses can have a "pernicious" effect upon the 
psychic constitution of their bearers; but the positive 
influence their application and satisfaction exercise 
upon the differentiation of the soul, which thereby be- 
comes susceptible of ever finer moods, is too little 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 189 

emphasized. Even friendly association with animals 
clearly has this effect. We must add, also, the external 
happy consequences. The social impulses constitute a 
truly ingenious means of multiplying the feelings of 
pleasure; for the man who feels the pleasures of his 
fellow men to be a source of his own pleasure thereby 
increases his joys with the increase in theirs, he shares 
their happiness; while the egoist is, so to speak, re- 
stricted to his own pleasure. The objection that social 
feelings have as a consequence the sharing of sorrow is 
partly justified, but does not weigh so heavily, because 
suffering too gives scope to the satisfaction of the social 
impulses, in that one can work for its alleviation. 
Further, there belong to the external happy conse- 
quences those of which one is, perhaps, first inclined to 
think; namely, the reactions produced in the objects of 
the social impulses. In part the bearer of such impulses 
himself will be chosen as a preferred object of the social 
impulses of others; and in part society guarantees him, 
as a very useful member, all possible advantages. 

Pessimists like to point to instances where such 
"natural reward" of social behavior fails to be made, 
and the benefactor reaps ingratitude and envy, or is 
ridiculed and abused. It is true that under such un- 
favorable circumstances pain can be added to the pleas- 
ant result which is always connected with the satisfac- 
tion of social impulses; pain which sometimes even 
annuls the pleasure, and thus counteracts and finally 
overcomes the motive pleasure (embitterment). But 
these are really unusual circumstances, and it is cer- 



ipo WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

tainly unnecessary to take them into consideration in 
the description of the normal working out of social 
impulses. Experience on the average (there is in these 
matters only an average experience) does not confirm 
pessimism. For this reason at the very beginning of 
this discussion I advisedly pointed to experience as fur- 
nishing the proof that the social impulses increase the 
capacity for happiness; and this makes the deductive 
derivation unnecessary. 

However, the clearest hint that experience offers us 
in this respect is the fact that the highest feelings of 
happiness ever known to us are due to a social impulse: 
namely, love. No one has yet succeeded in making at 
all intelligible why it is that the greatest bliss is joined 
to this most perfect of social impulses, and it has been 
attempted but very rarely. Was the discouragement 
due perhaps to the magnitude of the tack? In any 
case the explanation does not lie in the inner union 
with bodily needs, which we have in the case of sexual 
love. For, however important this connection be (it 
proves, as it were, the nobility and equal rank of the 
sensual pleasures) yet these things are separable, and 
are often really separated. And thus we see that mu- 
tuality, that is, the social motive, plays the chief role, 
and not the specific contact, the bodily motive. There- 
fore we may take the most exalted fact of all experience 
as an indication that those inclinations which are 
directed upon the joys of others bear the greatest possi- 
bilities of happiness. 

It is not necessary for our general purpose to con- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 191 

sider the different varieties and nuances of social im- 
pulses; but so much may be mentioned: the description 
here given applies to the inclinations which relate in- 
dividual to individual rather than to the more diffuse 
impulses of "universal love of mankind," "feelings of 
solidarity," "love of one's own nation," and so forth. 
These, for the most part, deserve to be viewed with a 
certain distrust; for often with them the concern is 
with a very pleasing idea, cherished and protected in 
the mind, rather than with the actual happiness of 
others. An impulse which, for example, directs itself 
upon the "greatest happiness of the greatest number," 
as utilitarianism must demand in order to realize its 
moral principle, seems to me to be an absurdity. Gen- 
uine sympathy can develop only on the basis of definite 
qualities of the beloved: it does not require any adap- 
tation of others to one's own way of thinking (which 
intolerant demand is characteristic of many forms of 
"universal love of mankind"). 

9. Virtue and Happiness 

The form in which the social impulses express them- 
selves is good conduct, or altruism. This opposition to 
egoism is one of the most essential marks of moral 
behavior. Hence, in any case, the most important 
motives of morality are found in the altruistic impulses, 
and many have thought the only ones; thus, for exam- 
ple, with Schopenhauer, who wished to derive every 
moral disposition from sympathy, and with many Eng- 



192 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

lish moral philosophers who declared sympathy to be 
the source of all virtues. However this may be, if 
these same dispositions which lead to the greatest pos- 
sibilities of pleasure are identical with those from which, 
for the most part, virtuous conduct springs, this means 
that virtue and happiness have the same causes, that 
they must go hand in hand. 

I am firmly convinced that experience clearly dem- 
onstrates this dependence. I have never been able 
to conceive how this can be denied, and am always 
astonished at the superficiality of the observations and 
arguments by which men seek to prove that happiness 
and morality have nothing to do with one another; 
indeed to prove that virtue is detrimental to felicity, 
and that a robust egoism must be recommended to him 
who seeks happiness. What is usually said in con- 
firmation of this opinion? Well, one {feints out that 
the rich and powerful, and all those who "prosper," 
do not usually tend to be the best, and cites some poet- 
ical words describing how the scoundrel drives along 
"in a golden coach," while the good man stands by 
the wayside bowed down with misery. 

Two points should be noted regarding this argument. 
In the first place, these philosophers for whom virtue 
and bliss cannot be separated far enough still presup- 
pose for the sake of the argument a concept of "happi- 
ness" which they would never seriously accept in prac- 
tice, and with which they can do far less than justice 
to human nature. Consider what Kant himself in his 
argumentation pictured as the earthly gifts of fortune! 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 193 

No, the majority of men know very well that wealth, 
for example, is of no very great value, and much prefer 
to be surrounded by love, to have well-bred children, 
and so forth; and the philosopher will not readily 
admit that the "scoundrel" has any prospect of sharing 
in such goods. 

And secondly, the described opposing arguments 
quite misunderstand the true meaning of the state- 
ments regarding the happiness value of virtue. The 
fate of a man depends to a great extent upon circum- 
stances which are quite independent of his conduct, 
for example, upon "chance," upon the path taken by 
a bullet, or by a tiny bacillus; and only a fool could 
believe that virtue is a means of avoiding the great 
misfortunes to which life is, to such a degree, subject. 
Our statement, therefore, obviously cannot assert (as 
many Stoics sought to assert) that virtue guarantees a 
joyful life, but only that it leads to the greatest hap- 
piness possible under the given external conditions of 
life; and it can of course assert this only with probabil- 
ity. For an accident can always put an end to every- 
thing; as it can suddenly change everthing for the 
better hence it is clear that no rule of life, no general 
proposition concerning the effect of any behavior can 
take it into account. The blows of fate cannot be in- 
fluenced, and have nothing to do with morality; but 
what our mood is under given external conditions, and 
what kind of influence the blows have upon us, does 
depend upon our impulses and behavior. The virtu- 
ous man and the scoundrel are equally subject to 



i 9 4 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

chance, the sun shines upon the good and the evil; and 
therefore the assertion regarding the relation between 
virtue and happiness says only that the good man al- 
ways has better prospects of the most joyful life than 
does the egoist, that the former enjoys a greater capacity 
for happiness than does the latter. 

If the virtuous man has better prospects, that is, a 
greater probability of joy, then, on the average, good 
men must be happier than egoists. And experience so 
clearly confirms this that it must be visible to every 
open eye. Is not the good man also the more cheerful ? 
Does not the eye of one who looks with love upon his 
fellow men shine with a joy which we seek in vain in 
the cold glance of the egoist? Here again we are fur- 
nished with a very remarkable indication of the truth 
of what we are saying. For, if we apply to the smile 
the approved method of studying affects in the form 
of their externalizations, which served us earlier in our 
consideration of tears, we see that the same delightful 
play of facial muscles is at once the expression of both 
joy and kindness. Man smiles when he is gay, and 
also when he feels sympathy; kindness and happiness 
have the same facial expression; the friendly man is 
also the happy man, and vice versa. I believe that 
there is no clearer indication of the inner relationship 
of happiness and a noble disposition than that which 
nature itself offers. 

The happiness of love and the phenomenon of the 
smile seem to me to be the two important facts upon 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 195 

which ethics can base itself as upon the firmest data of 
experience. 

10. The Moral Principle: Be Ready for Happiness 

Let us pause and reflect for a moment. 

Thus far in answer to the question: what paths lead 
to the highest values? we have discovered at least that 
the guide to them is found in the social impulses. This 
does not answer the question completely, for further 
sign-posts and indications will be required; but we put 
aside this point for a moment. Now, since those al- 
truistic inclinations are, we said, identical with those 
from which "moral" behavior for the most part pro- 
ceeds, the way sought is also that which leads to 
morality. But to the concept of morality, which we in- 
vestigated in Chapter IV, there is joined an indefinite- 
ness of no small degree. We found that those disposi- 
tions are called moral which human society believes 
are most advantageous to its general welfare. Hence 
the content of the concept depends not only upon the 
actual living conditions of society, but also upon the 
intelligence of the class which determines public opin- 
ion, and upon the richness of its experience. This con- 
fusion and relativity is unavoidable; it is one of those 
facts which confront the philosopher and make the 
concept of a good disposition as unclear as that of "good 
weather." There remain, of course, enough universal 
moral precepts concerning which there is no difference 



196 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

of opinion; and many of these are common to the most 
dissimilar of nations and eras (if the concept of an 
altruistic disposition did not possess such a universal 
significance, independently of the nature of the culture 
involved, we should not have been able to arrive at our 
present results). But it remains unsatisfying that the 
definition of morality by the opinion of society makes 
meaningless a question which the philosopher (here 
becoming a moralist) would very much like to ask: 
namely, whether what society holds to be moral really 
is so. The attempt of utilitarianism to make the ques- 
tion sensible and subject to a decision miscarried, be- 
cause the real "greatest happiness of the greatest num- 
ber" is not a tangible concept (Chapter IV). 

We now see the great advantage of our formulation 
of the question. We did not begin by seeking the 
causes of "moral" dispositions, but sought the disposi- 
tion which is most valuable for the agent himself, 
which, that is, leads with the greatest probability to 
his happiness; and thus we eliminated any reference 
to the opinions of society. And we excluded the in- 
tangible concept of happiness, replacing it by the con- 
cept of the capacity for happiness, with the clear realiza- 
tion that the matter concerns this alone. And thus, it 
seems to me, the otherwise disturbing relativity and 
confusion of the problem is removed in so far as this 
is at all possible. Now, perhaps, a little light can be 
thrown back upon such dubious concepts as the utili- 
tarian concept of "general welfare." Here too, we 
should prefer to speak of the maximum capacity for 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 197 

happiness of a society, and consider it to exist when 
each individual has attained his greatest capacity for 
happiness. We must always refer to the individuals, 
because, strictly speaking, pleasure and pain, happiness 
and sorrow, exist only for them. With the most 
sharply defined question there would, perhaps, be given 
the possibility subsequently of speaking of a standard 
of morality, and of judging whether different moral 
views correspond to it or not. The philosopher could, 
for his purposes, define as moral that behavior by means 
of which an individual furthered his capacity for hap- 
piness, and could designate the precepts of society as 
"truly" moral if this criterion fitted them. We must 
not forget, however, that he would in this fashion 
establish nothing but a definition, at bottom arbitrary, 
as is every other. He cannot force one to accept it, 
and cannot elevate it into a "postulate." I would hold 
it practical to accept this definition, because the end it 
establishes is that which dc facto is most highly valued 
by mankind. 

The formulation of a "moral principle," too, would 
be possible on this basis; and it would run, "At all 
times be fit for happiness," or "Be ready for happiness." 

Everyone knows, or experience teaches him as he 
grows older, that happiness seems to vanish in direct 
ratio to the eagerness with which it is pursued. One 
cannot pursue it, one cannot seek it; for it cannot be 
recognized from afar, and only unveils itself suddenly, 
when present. Happiness, those rare moments of life 
in which the world by a coincidence of apparently in- 



198 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

significant circumstances suddenly grows perfect, the 
contact of a warm hand, the look of crystal clear water, 
the song of a bird, how could one "strive" for such 
things? Nor does it depend upon these things, but 
only upon the soul's receptivity which they find await- 
ing them. It depends upon the capacity of the soul 
to respond to the proper vibration, upon its strings not 
having lost their tension by reason of the tones hitherto 
drawn from them, upon the approaches to the highest 
joys not being choked with filth. But for all of these, 
for the receptivity and purity of the soul, one can pro- 
vide. He cannot attract happiness to himself, but he 
can so arrange his whole life that he is always ready 
to receive it, */ it comes. 

Therefore it seems to me that the idea of the capacity 
for happiness must everywhere be made central in 
ethics. And if a moral principle is neetled it can only 
be one which rests upon this concept, as does the 
formula just proposed. Therefore it is truly amazing 
that readiness for happiness nowhere plays an impor- 
tant role in ethical systems; I cannot remember ever 
having come upon the concept in an important place, 
except in a pompous disguise which ill becomes it, and 
renders it unrecognizable. In Kant and others one 
finds it said that one should not strive for happiness, 
but should seek to be worthy of happiness. Very true! 
But what does it mean to be worthy of happiness? 
Does this word express some mysterious property of 
a man or of his conduct, a mysterious relation to a 
possible reward? Or is there here an all-too-human 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 199 

transference of meaning from daily life, where we call 
a man worthy of a thing if he does not abuse it ? Very 
likely the latter. But then it is at once clear that the 
word means nothing but capacity for happiness. The 
man who is able to appropriate the value of valuable 
things in the form of intense feelings of joy makes 
just the right use of them. Nature is not miserly nor 
thrifty, and makes no condition to the loan of its fa- 
vors except that one be capable of receiving them. 
To be capable of happiness is to be worthy of happi- 
ness. Whoever is able and ready to share in the joys 
of the world is invited to them. 

ii. Morality without Renunciation 

A necessary condition of the capacity for happiness 
is the existence of inclinations in which the motive 
pleasure and pleasure of realization do not clash; and 
all conduct and motives which strengthen such incli- 
nations are to be accepted as leading to the most valu- 
able life. Experience teaches that these conditions are 
fulfilled by the social impulses, hence by those inclina- 
tions which have as their goal the joyful states of other 
creatures; with them there is the least probability that 
the joys of realization do not correspond to the motive 
pleasure. They are, if we use the philosophical defi- 
nition of morality recommended upon p. 197, the moral 
impulses par excellence. 

I am, in fact, of the opinion that those philosophers 
are quite right (they constitute the majority, I believe) 



200 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

who find the essence of moral dispositions in altruism. 
We recognized that its essence lies in considcratcness 
for one's fellow men; in accommodation to and 
friendly understanding of their needs lies the very es- 
sence of the moral character, or at least that aspect which 
signifies the "performance of duties toward others." 
Considerateness consists in the constant restraint and 
restriction of the non-altruistic impulses; and one can 
perhaps conceive all civilization as the colossal process 
of this subjugation of egoism, as the powerful means 
which ultimately serves to bring about a harmony 
among the inclinations of all persons. Now, it would 
seem as if this must be a very painful process for the 
individual, because apparently it demands the partial 
suppression of impulses, calls for renunciation and 
resignation. But this is illusory, for such restriction 
is, quite apart from this, necessary and salutary for 
the individual, since the unrestricted development of 
these impulses (as we saw on p. 184) has very painful 
consequences, and does not therefore lead to the most 
valuable life in any case. This holds to such a degree 
that often the altruistic inclinations are far from suffi- 
cient, and other impulses must be added to hold the 
primitive forces in check. These impulses correspond 
to the "duties with respect to oneself," including 
chiefly the so-called "higher" enjoyments: pleasure in 
knowledge and in beauty, or the joy in exceptional per- 
formances of all sorts (that is, in manual skill, in sport, 
and competition). 
As soon as the altruistic and the last-mentioned 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 201 

"higher" impulses are developed to a sufficient degree 
the process of subjugation is completed, and there is 
no longer any talk of "renunciation"; for proper con- 
duct (that is, conduct which makes one ready for 
happiness) now flows quite of itself from the har- 
monious nature of the man. He no longer falls 
into "temptation"; "moral struggles" no longer occur 
in him; that is, the dangerous ends-in-view, which 
could seduce him from his path, no longer have as 
powerful a pleasure tone as do the opposing inclina- 
tions, and are suppressed by the latter. There is no 
longer required a strong excitation of pain to deter 
him from these ends pain heretofore in part threat- 
ened from without by natural or artificial sanctions, 
and in part from within by "conscience," whose in- 
nermost component is doubtless nothing but the fear 
of injuring one's capacity for happiness, one's purity. 
To be sure, before this stage is reached in which the 
good is done "willingly," long periods of the develop- 
ment of civilization must pass, during which strong 
feelings of pain are necessary for the motivation of good 
behavior, so that it results only from the "compulsion" 
of duty and conscience (Kant, too, described the 
obedience to duty as unpleasant); but it would be a 
perversion to see the essence of morality in this, and 
to wish to find morality only where compulsion and 
conflicts trouble the soul. This is characteristic rather 
of the lower levels; the highest level of morality is 
the peace of "innocence." 
This is, of course, wholly attained by no one. And 



202 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

thus civilization works ceaselessly with all its means 
to establish motives for altruistic conduct; and, rightly, 
also lays much stress upon the outer form of consider- 
ateness, politeness and good manners, which, estab- 
lished by suggestion and custom, are able, by pene- 
trating from the surface inwards, to influence impor- 
tant inclinations in no small degree. 

The social impulses stand so much in the foreground 
for moral behavior that in comparison the encourage- 
ment given by the other impulses which increase the 
capacity for happiness (scientific, aesthetic, and so 
forth) plays a minor role. The little said regarding 
them may suffice. 

In them and in the altruistic inclinations lie the 
roots of the most valuable conduct. That, in rough 
outline, is the answer to the fundamental question of 
ethics. * 

12. Personality and Kindness 

But, with respect to the altruistic inclinations, we 
must consider briefly an objection which the reader 
must have long since had at the tip of his tongue. 
The unrestricted development of such inclinations, he 
will say, can certainly not lead to the valuable, and will 
not, in fact, be considered moral. To respect every 
desire of one's neighbor, to give in to every sympathetic 
impulse results, finally, neither in the highest measure 
of joy for the individual himself, nor indeed for the 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 203 

others; in such a case one no longer speaks of kind- 
ness, but of weakness. 

This is correct; and we must add a supplement in 
order to distinguish genuine kindness from the super- 
ficial variety which is nothing but lack of strength, 
and which is injurious to the capacity for happiness. 
What we have here is a special case of a general kind 
of disposition which exists whenever a man easily 
gives in to impulses of the moment, without, so to 
speak, first consulting the other impulses. In such a 
case the single dispositions are but loosely joined to- 
gether, as it were; they can be excited separately, with- 
out the others thereby coming into play. The unity 
which constitutes a strong character is lacking. In a 
strong character it is as if the inclinations were all 
directed from one fixed center; every act has con- 
sequences. These are actually generated in the fol- 
lowing manner: the separate dispositions hinder or 
favor one another, so that a definite orientation of the 
will seems to arise; they constitute a firmly knit sys- 
tem, a hierarchy, whose parts cannot be disturbed 
without the others responding. The whole man, as 
it were, enters into each act; and this constitutes the 
firmness and consequential nature of his character. 
To this is opposed instability and fickleness, which 
evidently have their causes in the fact that the sep- 
arate inclinations are relatively more independent of 
one another; so that, as we say, the right hand knows not 
what the left hand does. The necessary mutual influ- 



204 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

cnce and correction is lacking. However, the intellect 
can be of some assistance here, for by means of a fitting 
association of ideas it sometimes sees to the excitation 
of the proper corrective impulse. 

Thus, for instance, a man can be cruel and ambi- 
tious without his altruistic inclinations interfering. 
And the latter can occasionally come into play, and 
then we tend to say: at bottom he is not a bad man, 
but a weak man. If another lacks the evil inclinations 
and is driven by altruistic impulses which do not 
work in harmony, we say: he is good-natured, but 
weak. Weakness, therefore, is nothing but disorder, 
the lack of a hierarchical system among the impulses. 

But if a firm order does exist, then out of good na- 
ture comes true kindness, which does not give ear to 
every request, does not raise every weakling to his 
feet, but first encourages him to risd of his own 
strength. Farther-seeing social inclinations stand over 
the shortsighted, helping and hindering; together they 
constitute a harmonious system, which gives to all 
conduct that peculiar aspect of being under control 
which distinguishes the strong character. Hence, 
when the social inclinations of a person are detri- 
mental to his capacity for happiness, what is required 
is not their weakening, but, much rather, to order and 
bring them together into a system. Ethics is but little 
concerned with isolated inclinations apart from the 
others; what is important is their cooperation. And 
thus we see substantiated Shaftesbury's old truth, that 
in the moral character there exists a harmony of differ- 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 205 

ent inclinations. Together they form a balanced sys- 
tem. A man must react as a whole to every influence, 
never with only a small part of himself. In this way 
is developed that directness and consistency of life 
without which the capacity for the highest happiness 
is unthinkable. 

If we group the totality of the altruistic impulses 
under the name of \indness, and designate the firm 
interconnection of all impulses as personality, then 
we may say that personality and kindness are the basic 
conditions of a valuable existence. 

13. Ethics of Duty and Ethics of Kindness 

Two views stand sharply opposed in recent ethics. 
According to the first, moral values have nothing to do 
with pleasure and pain; all natural inclinations belong 
to man's animal nature, and he rises above this only 
if his acts are not determined by the natural feelings 
of pleasure and pain, but by those higher values. 
According to the second view, moral behavior, also, 
has its origin in pleasure and pain; man is noble be- 
cause he enjoys such behavior; the moral values rank 
so high because they signify the highest joys; the values 
do not stand above him but reside within him; it is 
natural for him to be good. 

In the preceding observations I have quite unam- 
biguously and, as I think, with perfect consistency 
sided with the second view, and have defended its 
standpoint in the analysis of the first. I have attempted 



206 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

to answer the ethical questions with constant refer- 
ence to the answers given by the advocates of that 
view; indeed it often appeared to me that by far the 
greater part of our discussion was made necessary only 
by the existence of this first view, and that everything 
that was otherwise to be said in favor of the other 
standpoint must appear really trivial and self-evident 
to the reader. 

We can set the two standpoints in opposition as the 
ethics of duty and the ethics of kindness, and in con- 
clusion once more compare their essential characteristics. 

The ethics of duty arises from the desire to place 
the foundation of morals upon absolutely firm ground, 
or perhaps even to make a foundation superfluous by 
positing morality itself as absolutely certain. 

We have had to renounce any absolutely certain 
ground, for we were able to show only that a good per- 
son would in all probability live a most valuable life. 
But this is a sacrifice that every empirical ethics must 
make to truth; and it is at least a foundation, while 
the ethics of duty ultimately contents itself with mere 
asseverations. In addition, the sacrifice has no prac- 
tical significance, for in life, indeed ultimately in sci- 
ence as well, we deal always with probabilities only. 
Moral rules, too, must refer to the average. We must 
equip a locomotive with great power even though it 
can become extremely dangerous if the switch is set 
improperly; we must tell the child to keep to the 
walk and out of the street, even though this advice 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 207 

may prove fatal if by chance a tile should fall from 
the roof. Theoretically we must, of course, grant 
(and we can reproach the empiristic ethical theories 
with lacking the spirit to make this admission) that 
cases occur (but very rarely) in which obedience to 
moral commandments clearly would not lead to the 
highest possible joy (for example, in the case of a 
person mortally ill, for whom it would no longer make 
sense to preserve his capacity for happiness) ; but it is 
one of the imperfections of the world, to be accepted 
with the others, that in such extreme cases morality 
becomes valueless. 

Thus the renunciation of an absolute foundation be- 
comes easy for us; it is indeed no sacrifice to give up 
the unattainable. 

According to our view one who does the good be- 
cause of duty stands on a lower level than one who 
does it because of an inclination, to whom it has be- 
come quite natural; and if we must speak of morality 
only in the first case, then all of our endeavors should 
be bent upon making morality superfluous. Instead 
of holding with Kant we agree with Marcus Aurelius, 
who said: in the stage of perfection "thou wilt do what 
is right, not because it is proper, but because thereby 
thou givest thyself pleasure." 

The ethics of duty has known well how to make use 
of the intensity of the moral feelings, of the exalted 
nature of morality. It arouses these feelings in the 
reader so that he is ashamed of questioning too pene- 



208 WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 

tratingly into the foundations of morality (yet this is 
his sole task, as a philosophical investigator). The 
most frequently cited passage in the Kantian ethics is 
an example of the appeal to the reader's feelings. The 
passage, which, to be sure, has a kind of beauty, runs: 
"Duty, thou exalted great name, that containest noth- 
ing in thee amiable or ingratiating, but demandest sub- 
mission; yet to bend the will dost menace naught, which 
were but to arouse natural aversion and fear; only a law 
dost thou establish, that of itself finds entrance into feel- 
ing, and yet acquires a reluctant reverence (if not always 
obedience) before which all inclinations are silent, 
though in secret they are opposed; what thy worthy 
origin, and where find the root of thy noble descent, 
which proudly resists all kinship with the inclinations, 
from which root derives the infle^ble condition of that 
value men alone can give themselves?" 

It is obvious that the ethics of kindness, if it wished, 
could make exactly the same use of the exalted nature 
of moral feelings; for it emphasizes the emotional 
character of morality much more. It can only be to 
its credit that morality is thus, in general, drawn closer 
to humanity. Hence the philosopher of kindness 
could direct an apostrophe to kindness, which could be 
patterned after the Kantian hymn to duty, word for 
word, and would run as follows: 

Kindness, thou dear great name, that containest 
nothing in thee demanding loveless esteem, but prayest 
to be followed; thou dost not menace and needst not 



WHAT PATHS LEAD TO VALUE? 209 

establish any law, but of thyself findest entrance into 
feeling, and willingly art revered; whose smile dis- 
arms all sister inclinations; thou art so glorious that 
we need not ask after thy descent, for whatever be thy 
origin it is ennobled through thee! 



Index 



Activity and conduct, 31 
Altruism: 

and social impulses, 75 

and sympathy, 58 
Aristippus and hedonism, 121 
Aristotle: 

on the good man, 82 

on tragedy and pleasure, 138 

B 

Beethoven, 66 

Bentham and "greatest happi- 
ness" principle, 88 
Bergson, on causal principle, 

M5 
Brentano and his school, on 

value, 105 
Buddhism and renunciation, 

79 
Butler, Bishop, on selfishness, 

74 



Calculus ' of pleasures and 

pains, 39 

Capacity for happiness, 196 
Categorical imperative, 62, 112 



Causality: 

and responsibility, 156-158 

principle of, 
and determinism, 144 
and science, 144 
Cause: 

analysis of, 25 

and ethical explanation, 25 

and regularity, 27 
Chance: 

and indeterminism, 156 

effects of, 88 
Christianity: 

and renunciation, 79 

criticism of, 134 
Civilization, tentative defini- 
tion of, 200 
Classical ethics and happiness, 

80 

Compulsion and laws, 147 
Conduct: 

and causes, 26 

and moral judgment, 26 
Conscience, 91 

and fear, 201 

its origin, 164 

metaphysical theory of, 97 
Contrast, law of, 135 



Dante, quoted, JQ 



21 x 



212 



INDEX 



Darwin, on primitive con- 
science, 92 

Definitions, relation to sci- 
ence, 6 

Deontology, 83 
"Determinism" and "free- 
dom," 146 
Dostoevsky: 

Letters from the Under- 
world, quoted, 130 
The Brothers Karamazov, 

quoted, 131 
Duty: 

and pleasure, 84 
ethics of, 205 
Kantian hymn to, 208 



Egoism: 
analysis of, 69 
and inconsiderateness, 73, 

75 

and law of motivation, 56 

and morality, 57 

and personal welfare, 68 

an impulse? 57, 63, 74 

immoral, 76 

why condemned, 77 
End-in-view, as motive, 34 
Ethics: 

and decisions, 32 

and "determinism or inde- 
terminism," 150 

and explanation, 23-25 

and mere activity, 31 

a science, i 

as factual science, 20 

as "ideal" science, 22 



Ethics (Cont.): 

as normative science, 17 

goal of, i 

method, psychological, 28 

of duty, 205 

of kindness, 205 

part of linguistics ? 6 

subject matter of, 2 
Eudaemonism, criticism of, 

133 

Explanation: 
Hobbes on ethical, 165 
nature of ethical, 161 



Feelings: 

and perceptions, 70 
assimilation of motive to re- 
alization, 177 

motive and realization, 174 
Fichte: * 
on immorality, 79 
on virtue, 125 
France, Anatole, La Vie en 

Fleur, quoted, 138 
Freedom: 

analysis of, 150 
and exemption from causal- 
ity, 149 

consciousness of, 154-155 
Freedom of will, a pseudo 
problem, 143 



Goethe, quoted, 140, 141 
Good: 
a mere abstraction, 24 



INDEX 



213 



Good (Cont.): 
and desires, n 
and the useful, 96 
different concepts of, 13 
formal characteristics of, n 
material characteristics of, 

ii 
not object of "moral sense," 

9 
productive of pleasure, 86- 

9i 

"Good," the: 
definition of, 5 
extra-moral sense of, 24, 82 
indefinable? 8 
meaning socially deter- 
mined, 96 

ostensive definition of, 9 
Gospels, the, quoted, 134 
Guyau, Vers d'un Philosophe, 
quoted, 139 

H 

Happiness: 

analysis of, 182 

and chance, 193 

and social impulses, 186, 190 

and virtue, 85, 192 

cannot be sought, 198 

capacity for, 185 

degrees of, 184 

in hedonism, 174 

mixed with sorrow, 127 

synonyms of, 129 
Harmony in moral character, 

204 

Hartmann, Nicolai, Ethics, 
108, 121 



Hauptmann, Gerhart, Michael 

Kramer, quoted, 138 
Hedonism, 83 
and happiness, 174 
its true foundation, 179 
Hegel, quoted, 127, 129 
Heine, 137 
Hobbes, on man's primitive 

state, 162-165 
Hope, its nature, 133 
Hume, 143 

on freedom of will and con- 
duct, 150 
Hypothetical imperative, in 



I 



Ideas: 

characterized by pleasure or 

pain, 37 
general, 63 
Impulses: 
analysis of, 59 
changeable, 167 
the "natural," 162-166 
the social, 164 

and universal will, 175 
Inconsiderateness, the essence 

of egoism, 75 
Inspiration, basis in pleasure, 

4 6 

Intelligence and moral con- 
duct, 163 
Intuitionism, 108 



J 



James, William, on moral con- 
duct, 54 



214 



INDEX 



K 

Kant, 61, 62, 172 
and categorical imperative, 

in 
and existence of moral will, 

22 

and law of motivation, 42 
Critique of Practical Rea- 
son, quoted, 114 
hymn to duty, 208 
on "absolute ought," no 
on being worthy of happi- 
ness, 198 

on causality, criticized, 145 
on disinterested pleasures, 

74 
on essence of morality, 80 

on happiness, 192 

on natural and moral man, 
125 

on obedience to duty, 201 
Kepler's laws, 147 
Kindness vs. weakness, 202 



Laofoon, 139 
"Law," meanings of, 146 
Legislators as utilitarians, 94 
Love a social impulse, 190 

M 

Mandeville, Fable of the Bees, 

94 
Marcus Aurelius, quoted, 207 



Mill, J. S.: 

on "desired" and "desir- 
able," 18 
on "to desire" and "to find 

pleasing," 52 
Moral: 
conduct, motivation of, 43, 

181 

judgments, analysis of, 78 
justification as relative-hypo- 
thetical, 17 
law: 

author of, n 
Kant's, criticized, 113 
material and formal mean- 
ings of, 97 
principle: 
and norms, 15 
"Be ready for happiness," 

197 

highest cannot be justi- 
fied, 23 

rules as probable, 206 
sense a useless hypothesis, 9 
systems and multiplicity of 

principles, 16 
valuation, analysis of, 99 
Moralist and philosopher, 20 
Morality: 

a vague concept, 195 
and altruism, 200 
and innocence, 201 
and renunciation, 79, 199 
and welfare, 95 
defined by opinion of soci- 
ety, 195 

one or many? 13 
Morike, quoted, 136 



INDEX 



215 



Mosaic decalogue and renunci- 
ation, 79 
Motivation: 
and experience, 178 
and general ideas, 64 
and happiness, 179-180 
law of, 30 

and heroism, 45 

and human institutions, 

5<> 

and sacrifice, 43 
explained and defended, 

4i 
its significance for ethics, 

53 

not tautologous, 51 
Motive, the most pleasant idea, 
37-39 



N 

Necessity and universal valid- 
ity, 149 

Neo-Kantians* mistaken view 
of data, 3 

Nietzsche, 141, 172 

Normative science and ethics, 

23 

Norms: 
and definition of "Good," 

15 % 

as empirical rules, 14 
can explain, not justify, 17 
derivation of, 14 
expressions of fact, 15 
given, not established, 21 
justification of highest, 

senseless, 18 



Objectivity defined in terms of 

regularity, 107 
"Ought," analysis of, 110-114 



"Pathos," its meaning, 140 
Personality, analysis of, 205 
Pessimism: 

and moral sermons, 126 

validity of, 189 

Philosophy and unity of sci- 
ence, 29 
Pleasure: 

and duty, 84 

and pain, calculus of, 39 

as disreputable, 125 

"good" vs. "bad," 126 

"higher" and "lower," 188 

not itself a motive, 71 

prejudice against, 122 
Principle of causality: 

and determinism, 144 

and science, 144 
Punishment: 

and motives, 152 

function of, 151 
Pythagoreans on music of the 
spheres, 135 

R 

Responsibility: 
analysis of, 151 
and causality, 156 
and motive application, 153 
and punishment, 152 
consciousness of, 154 



2l6 



INDEX 



Schiller, quoted, 47 
Schopenhauer: 

and the moral problem, 
28 

on impulses, 57 

on Kant, 145 

on sympathy, 191 

on will, 62 

Science, its objects given, 4 
Self, relation to impressions, 

Self-preservation not egoistic, 

72 
Shaftesbury, on harmony in 

moral character, 204 

Smile, relates virtue and hap- 
piness, 194 

Social impulses: 
analysis of, 186 
and happiness, 186 
guide to happiness, 195 

Socrates, on good, 82 

Sorrow: 

a condition of pleasure? 134 
mixed with happiness, 
127 

Soul, purity of, 198 

Spencer, Data of Ethics, 93 

Spinoza, on self-preservation, 

72 
State, pleasant, idea of, 49 

Stoics on virtue and happiness, 

193 

Suffering, its pleasure com- 
ponent, 136 

Suggestion a source of value, 



Tautology, nature of, 109 



U 

Utilitarianism: 

and greatest happiness prin- 
ciple, 196 

and sympathy, 191 
critique of, 87 



Valuations as facts, 21 
Value: 

and ethics, 159 
and suggestion, 170 
as subjective, 105 
spurious vs. genuine, 181 
Value judgments compared to 
logical propositions, 107 
Values: 
absolute: 

and emotions, 118 
criticized, 115 
objective: 

and pla tonic ideas, 101 
and pleasure, 102 
criticism of, 101 
independent of pleasure, 

100 

theory of, 100 
relativity of, 120 
Virtue and happiness, 85, 182, 
192, 194 



INDEX 



217 



W 

Wealth of little value, 193 
Welfare, personal: 

analysis of, 58, 63, 187 
not a motive, 65 
Westermarck, Origin and De- 
velopment of Moral 
Ideas, 93 



Will: 

analysis of, 33 
and desire, 52 
and innervation-sensation, 

34 
not a power or substance, 

35 
Wundt, Wilhelm, 104 



